English
日本語
Infinity Nikki Personal Data and Privacy Policy
Last Updated: [2024-12-02]
Effective Date:[2024-12-02]
Preamble
Infinity Nikki Personal Data and Privacy Protection Policy
(hereafter referred to as "Privacy Policy” or “Policy”) is
made by and between you (hereafter referred to as “you/user”) and Infold Pte. Ltd. (hereafter referred to as “Infold” or “we”) whose registered office is at6 Raffles Quay, #14-06, Singapore.
Infold takes the protection of your personal data and privacy very seriously. To safeguard your legal rights when using the services we provide, including your interactions with us, registration, and use of our games as well as registration and use of other products or services we offer (hereafter referred to as "services"), we have created this Privacy Policy. It aims to explain how we collect, use, store, share and transfer such data when you use our services. Additionally, it outlines the ways we provide you to access to, update, control and protect this data. Specifically, if you use our services in South Korea,
인폴드 유한책임회사 개인정보 수집 및 이용 안내
shall apply; if you use our services in Japan,
『インフィニティニキ』プライバシーポリシー
shall apply.
WE STRONGLY RECOMMEND THAT YOU READ THIS PRIVACY POLICY CAREFULLY AND IN ITS ENTIRETY, FULLY, PAYING PARTICULAR ATTENTION TO THE TERMS MARKED IN BOLD. PLEASE MAKE CHOICES THAT YOU DEEM APPROPRIATE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE GUIDELINES OUTLINED IN THIS PRIVACY POLICY. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE TO THE CONTENT OF THIS POLICY, IT MAY IMPACT OUR ABILITY TO PROVIDE OUR SERVICES EFFECTIVELY OR TO DELIVER THE EXPECTED SERVICES.
If you are a child (the specific age is determined according to the definition of “child” age in the laws of the country or region where you reside, for example, under 14 years old in South Korea, or under 13 years old in some other countries and regions) or do not meet the age requirement for using Infold game services in your country/region, you are not allowed to use our Services. If your age exceeds the age of a child stipulated in the laws of your country and region but you are a minor (the specific age is determined according to the definition of “adult” age in the laws of the country or region where you reside, for example, under 19 years old in South Korea, and under 18 years old in some countries and regions) or are otherwise ineligible as stated above,, you must read this Policy accompanied by your parents or legal guardians and use our Services only after obtaining the consent of your parents or guardians to all this Policy. These requirements also apply to all modifications or changes to this Privacy Policy.
PLEASE BE AWARE THAT WE DO NOT COLLECT PERSONAL DATA FROM MINOR USERSunder the age of 13 OR USERS WHO DO NOT MEET THE AGE REQUIREMENT SPECIFIED BY YOUR COUNTRY/REGION TO USE THE GAME SERVICE. IF YOU ARE THE GUARDIAN OF A RELEVANT MINOR AND YOU FIND THAT YOUR MINOR HAS USED OUR SERVICES AND SUBMITTED THEIR PERSONAL DATA, PLEASE INSTRUCT THEM TO STOP USING OUR SERVICES IMMEDIATELY AND INFORM US PROMPTLY SO THAT WE CAN TAKE APPROPRIATE MEASURES ACCORDINGLY. WE ALSO PROVIDE A REMINDER IN THE ANNEX OF THIS POLICY ACCORDING TO THE PERSONAL DATA PROTECTION REQUIREMENTS OF DIFFERENT COUNTRIES/REGIONS. IF YOUR COUNTRY/REGION IS LISTED IN THE ANNEX, PLEASE READ THE RELEVANT REGULATIONS IN DETAIL.
If you have any questions or concerns about this Privacy Policy or other relevant matters after reading the entire Policy, please contact us through the channels set in the Section “Contact Us” herein, and we will respond to you as soon as possible.
This Privacy Policy will provide you with information on:
I. How We Collect and Use Your Personal Information
II. How We Use Cookies and Similar Technologies
III. How We Process, Share, Transfer, and Disclose Your Personal Information
IV. How We Store and Protect Your Personal Information
V. Your Rights to Manage Personal Information
VI. Protection of Minor Information
VII. Update of the Privacy Policy
VIII. Miscellaneous
IX. Contact Us
I. How We Collect and Use Your Personal Information
According to the requirement of relevant laws and regulations or for the functionality of specific services, we collect, store and use the following information about you. The lawful collection, storage, and use serve the purpose of providing or optimizing our services, or user experience and ensuring the security of your account.
You understand and agree that: some individual services may necessitate enabling specific access permissions on your device to facilitate the collection and use of information related to those permissions. You also understand and agree that failing to provide such information may hinder your ability to register as a user, enjoy specific services provided by us, or achieve the intended results of using the relevant services.
For users of our game products, the game itself may be unavailable if the necessary information is not provided to build a user profile and identify the user, depending on the operation of the game system.
Should we use your information for purposes other than those described below, we will provide further explanation and seek your consent.
1. Personal Information You Provide
(1) When you register, log in, and undergo identity verification, you provide your Infold account (such as the email address or third-party account you used to register or log in to your Infold Account) as credentials for logging into the game, creating your username and password. The information you provide will be used to determine your age when using our services. Providing false information will result in the inability to use our services or may subject you to corresponding restrictions during service usage. You agree that we may collect your online identification information (including account number, password and IP address) and information on your commonly used personal device (including hardware serial number, hardware model, MAC address of the device, OS type, OS version, device name, carrier). This information will be used to identify you as our user and provide you with basic services. Please note that if you use an Infold Account registered or logged with third-party accounts (such as PlayStationNetwork account, Apple Account, Google Account, Facebook Account, etc.) to access Infold Games, subject to applicable laws and with your consent, we may obtain information generated or shared through your use of a third-party account to register/log in to your Infold Account, which may include  your unique identifier, account name, personal avatar and list of friends of such third-party account.
This information is used to store your registration and login information, enabling you to log in to our system on different devices. If you do not consent to the authorization of such information, you will not be able to use your third-party account to register or log in to your Infold Account and thereby access our products and services.
We need to remind you that you can only register as our user and access our services when you provide true and accurate information as described above. Failure to provide such information will result in the inability to log in or use all or part of our services.
(2) When you set to customize your character information, you may submit or edit your nicknames, personal taglines, and avatars.
(3) Information you submit through our customer service or for participating in the activities or questionnaire surveys held or conducted by us, including your name, gender, mobile phone number, telephone number, address, educational attainment, occupation, and personal income. We would like to remind you in particular that the submission and modification of the above information may be subject to special rules of the relevant interface If the aforementioned rules are inconsistent with the rules of this Privacy Policy, we will obtain your consent separately. If you choose not to participate in such activities or questionnaire surveys, or not to provide the above information to our customer service personnel, your access to other services will not be affected.
(4) In certain services, to facilitate the delivery of goods or services to you, you are required to provide the personal information of the recipient, including name, delivery address, postal code, contact number, and payment status. Specifically, we may share some of your information with third-party logistics or delivery parties during the shipping and delivery process in order to ensure safe, smooth, and accurate delivery of goods or services to you. Failure to provide such information will prevent the completion of the relevant delivery service. However, this will not affect your normal use of other features within our services.
(5) information you share with other parties through our services, and information you provide to us and store when you use our services.
2.Your information Shared by Other Parties
(1) Your information shared by other parties when they use our services.
(2) We may obtain information generated or shared by you when you use a third-party partner’s products or services. Please read the user agreement or privacy policy of the third-party partner’s product or service carefully.
3.  Your Information We Obtain
When you use our services, we may collect the following information based on the following usage patterns:
(1) In order to ensure your normal use of our services, maintain the proper functioning of the game’s basic features, optimize product, performance, enhance your gaming experience, and protect your account security, we may collect information related to your device or software. This includes the device identifier provided by your mobile device, web browser or other programs used to access our services (for example, Android ID, GAID for Android; IDFV, IDFA for iOS; motherboard serial number, CPUID, product ID, hard drive serial number, Machine GUID for PC; DUIDs for PlayStation; the validity, reset availability by the user, and acquisition method may vary for different identifiers). The unique device identification information is used solely during your use of the services we provide and is essential for service provision. Additionally, we collect device MAC address, device name, device settings and environment, device manufacturer, device time zone, device type, device model, device version, device serial number,
OS type and version, system start up time (mobile device only), system activation time (iOS only)
, IP address
, carrier information,
mntID (iOS only), network type (Wi-Fi/5g/4g/3g/2g; wired network for PC), Wi-Fi status, Wi-Fi MAC address,
Log information (Network diagnostic logs),
application ID, client version,
installer name, hardware and software feature information,
hardware model, hardware serial number (SN), SD card data (internal/external SD card capacity, list of file names in SD card application cache directory), application name and version, SDK version,
screen resolution and size (or device resolution),
language region and country,
battery and power status (mobile device only), CPU architecture information, timestamp, whether root/jailbreak, memory size and remaining memory, Google Advertising ID (Android only), emulator information (Android only), device landscape and vertical screen information, memory module information (PC only), graphics card information (PC only), whether to enable auxiliary functions (Android only), Baseband version (mobile device only), screen brightness (mobile device only), analog positioning switch (mobile device only), whether to enable ADB (Android only), SIM card status (mobile device only), acceleration sensor.
(2) When you interact with other players in the game through text, pictures, and other means, we will collect and store the information you send. This is done for the purpose of filtering pornographic, violent, political, or abusive content, as well as malicious advertisements and other inappropriate materials. The aim is to create a clean and safe gaming environment.
(3) When you use our services, we may collect your game log data, including your login logs, item logs, game battle logs, purchase logs, activity logs, upgrade logs and friend logs. This allows you to review your gaming history in the client, and the data will be used for statistical analysis in-game operations, addressing customer complaints, conducting anti-cheat analyses aimed at optimizing the gaming experience. Moreover, to enhance your gaming experience, we may synchronize the aforementioned data with the subsequent versions of the game or our other products you use.
(4) When you make purchases within the services provided by Infold, we will collect your
top-up records and your transaction records
. This is done to facilitate your review of transaction records and maximize the protection of your virtual property. Top-up records and transaction records are considered sensitive information. The collection of this information is necessary for us to provide consumption services, and transactions cannot be completed without such information.
(5) When you contact us, we may collect your
communication or call records
, including the contents or the contact information you leave. This is done to facilitate communication with you, help you resolve a problem, or record the resolution and outcome of the relevant issue.
(6) When you copy information from our products for sharing or receive shared information within our products, we need to locally access
your device’s clipboard
to read the information for the purposes of benefits, event participation, and sharing. We will only read information relevant to our services for verification and will not store such information. We will not collect any unrelated information from your clipboard.
(7) In order to ensure the security of your game account and create a fair, sound and safe gaming environment, we will collect your
information from your device (such as ID, serial number, manufacturer, device name, type and version, model, and style of the device), device identifier [for example, board ID (motherboard UUID), CPUID, product ID, hard drive serial number, Machine GUID , for PC],
memory module information (PC only), graphics card information (PC only), online identification information, network type, carrier information, game channel sources, battery and power status (mobile device only), whether to enable auxiliary functions (Android only), Baseband version (mobile device only), system activation time (mobile device only), screen brightness (mobile device only), analog positioning switch (Android only), whether to enable adb (Android only), and SIM card status (mobile device only). This information will be used to combat activities that may undermine the fair gaming environment or interfere with the normal operation of our game services (for example, such information may be used to detect piracy, screen plugins, and anti-cheat).
(8) Device permissions: During your use of our services, we will request permissions to access your system in specific business scenarios (the specific permissions may vary depending on the model and system version of the device you are using). This is to facilitate the collection and use of the corresponding information and enable the corresponding product functions and business scenarios. We will seek your consent before obtaining permission, and you can choose whether to authorize it or not. These system permissions include:
n Android
a.  Notification permissions: Notifications may include alerts, sounds, and icons and these settings can be configured in the app settings. We will use your notification permissions when you enable push notifications (for activities like energy recovery, event notifications, weekly missions, and background playback). Specifically, in some versions of the operating system, you may need to enable the precise alarm clock permission, otherwise, you may not be able to use the push function normally.
b. External storage rights: We will read and write your external storage rights when you use the in-game photo function (such as saving pictures and screenshots to your device), and send photos to customer service.
c. Camera permissions: We will use your camera permissions when you use QR code, and send photos to customer service.
d. Front-end service permissions: We will obtain your front-end service permissions when you use the download feature.
n iOS
a.  Notification permissions: Notifications may include alerts, sounds, and icons and these settings can be configured in the app settings. We may use your notification permissions when you enable push notifications (for activities like energy recovery, event notifications, weekly missions, and background playback).
b. Album access: we may use your album access when you use the in-game photo function (such as saving pictures and screenshots to your device), and send photos to customer service.
c. Camera access: We may use your camera access when you send photos to customer service.
d. Device network access: we may use your device network access during login, updates, service usage, network environment security checks, network connection status, and network speed measurement.
e. Microphone permissions: We may use your microphone permissions when recording with the camera during your interaction with customer service.
You may manage (enable/disable) the aforementioned permissions at any time on the System Settings page of your device.
Please note that: by enabling any permission, you authorize us to collect and use the relevant information to provide you with the corresponding services. Disabling any permission withdraws, the corresponding authorization, and as a result, we will no longer collect and use the relevant information based on such permission, making it impossible to provide you with the services corresponding to such permission. However, your decision to disable any permission will not affect our previous collection and use of information based on your authorization.
Please be aware that the access names may differ from one terminal to another due to variations in terminal devices and different operating systems. If you need to disable the permission enabled for using the above specific functions, most mobile devices will support your requirement. Refer to or contact the service provider of your mobile device for specific methods (for example, if your terminal device supports it, you may manage the aforementioned permission on the System Settings page of your terminal device at any time). If you have any questions, feel free to contact us through the channels set forth in the“Contact Us” section of this Privacy Policy.
4. We May Send Notifications to You
(1)
When you use our services, we may contact you by phone or sending you emails, text messages, information or push notifications.
You can follow our relevant prompts on your device, and we will send you the information described in this paragraph with your prior consent. If you no longer wish to receive this information you may choose to unsubscribe by following our relevant prompts on your device.
(2) We may send services-related announcements to you when necessary (for example, when a given service will be suspended due to system maintenance). You may not unsubscribe from any services-related announcements which are not advertisements.
(3) We will push your account updates, etc. to you through the system notifications of your device. You can choose to turn off our notifications on your device or select the information you wish to receive through the notification settings function we provide.
5. We may collect and use certain personal information without your authorization and consent in compliance with the relevant laws, regulations, and national standards in the country where you use our services, as well as to meet the request of judicial authorities and law enforcement agencies.
6. Notice regarding When You Disclose and Share Information
A number of our services allow you to disclose or share information about yourself not only within the game you used but also with all users of the service. For example, information you upload or post on our services (including your publicly available personal information and lists you create), your responses to information uploaded or posted by others and log data related to such data (such as friend’s relationships, level, ranking). Other users of our services may also share information about you (including log data). In particular, our sharing feature is designed to make it easy for you to share information about the game with other users, and you can make that shared information available as you like. As long as you do not delete the shared information, it will remain in the public domain. Even if you delete the shared information, it may still be independently cached, copied, or stored by other users or third parties not under our control, or kept in the public domain by other users or such third parties.
Therefore, please carefully consider the content of the information that you make public, upload, post and communicate through our services. In some cases, you may control the range of users entitled to view the information you share through the privacy settings of some of our services. If you want to remove your information from our services, please contact us to confirm how to do so, and any such removal will require verification of your identity.
II. How We Use Cookies and Similar Technologies
We, or our third-party partners, may collect and use your information through cookies, web beacons and other similar technologies, and store such information. We use our own cookies, web beacons and other similar technologies for the following purposes:
1. Remember your identity. For example, cookies and web beacons help us to identify you as our registered user or store other information you provide about yourself.
2. Analyze your use of our products or services. We may use cookies and web beacons to understand the activities you engage in while using our services.
3. Our products and services may contain cookies, web beacons and other similar technologies placed by our third-party partners. These technologies may collect non-personally identifiable information about you to analyze how users use those services or evaluate the effectiveness of advertising services. We strictly require our third-party partners to adhere to the provisions of this Privacy Policy. You can refuse or manage cookies, web beacons, or similar technologies through your browser settings. However, please note that disabling cookies, web beacons, or other similar technologies, may not impact your ability to enjoy the corresponding service experience, and some services may not function properly.
III.  How We Share, Transfer, and Disclose Your Personal Information
1. To ensure the stable operation of Infold Game Services or to achieve related functionalities, we may integrate features provided by third parties or collaborate through other means to fulfill the aforementioned purposes. The purpose, categories or use of the third party’s collection and processing of personal information, along with rules for personal information protection and exit mechanism, are governed by the third party’s privacy policies or relevant statement. We recommend checking the applicable third party’s privacy policies before use to understand how, why and to what extent the third party collects and uses users’ information, as well as its legal responsibilities. If the third party does not provide a dedicated privacy policy, we may provide a link to their official website to assist you in understanding their specific practices. Please note that third-party content may alter their personal information processing practices due to version upgrades, policy changes, or other reasons. You should refer to the official announcements of the third party for the most accurate and up-to-date information.
We may share your personal information with third parties, specifically including:
(1) Cloud service providers: Support data storage and basic maintenance;
(2) Security and Basic Function Service Providers: In order to implement engine services, push notifications, customer service, risk identification, anomaly detection, performance data collection, reporting, and analysis, we collaborate with third-party service providers and share necessary information. You can visit the privacy policies or official websites of these providers through the following links to learn more:
Google LLC:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
,
https://firebase.google.com/terms
ShareFun Network Limited:
https://aihelp.net/privacypolicy/
Aceville Pte Ltd.:
https://intl.anticheatexpert.com/#/doc-center/8fc4c1195346a2c74e472881bca42c4010698921
Alibaba Cloud (Singapore) Private Limited:
https://www.alibabacloud.com/help/en/sls/?spm=a2c63.p38356.0.0.6fee2222HNy36r
(3) Third-party platform partners: When you log in using a third-party platform account, In turn, we may share certain details with the social network, such as your app ID, access token, and referring URL. The links to the privacy policies of such partners are as follows:
Apple, Inc.:
https://www.apple.com/legal/privacy/en-ww/
Google LLC:
https://policies.google.com/privacy#infocollect
Meta Platforms, Inc.:
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/policy/?entry_point=data_policy_redirect&entry=0
Sony Interactive Entertainment Inc.:
https://www.playstation.com/en-sg/legal/psn-terms-of-service/?country-selector=true
(4) Data analysis and advertising service providers: We may share your device identifiers, device information, and other relevant data with our partners for purposes including data analysis, advertising placements, attribution, and similar activities. However, we will not provide personalized advertisements. For further details, please refer to the privacy policies of our partners, accessible via the following links:
AppsFlyer Ltd.:
https://www.appsflyer.com/legal/privacy-policy/
(5) Payment Service Providers: When you purchase game currency or virtual items, we will share order numbers and order details with the relevant payment service providers to facilitate the transaction. Your financial account information will be collected and processed by the payment service provider in accordance with their privacy policy, and we do not collect your financial account information. For further details, please refer to the privacy policies of our partners, accessible via the following links:
Google LLC:
https://policies.google.com/privacy#infocollect
Apple, Inc.:
https://www.apple.com/legal/privacy/en-ww/
Sony Interactive Entertainment Inc.:
https://www.playstation.com/en-sg/legal/psn-terms-of-service/?country-selector=true
Adyen N.V.:
https://www.adyen.com/privacy-policy
Checkout APAC Pte.Ltd:
https://www.checkout.com/legal/privacy-policy
PayPal Hong Kong Limited:
https://www.paypal.com/hk/legalhub/paypal/privacy-full
(6) Information Sharing Based on Infold Game Services: The sharing of information is initiated by you. Our services allow you to share your information not only within the game you are using but also with all other users using the service. When you choose to use these features, the content you share, including your avatar, nickname, etc., will be shared with third-party platforms or with the recipients of the shared information.
X Corp.:
https://twitter.com/en/privacy#twitter-privacy-9.1
Meta Platforms, Inc.:
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/policy/?entry_point=data_policy_redirect&entry=0
TikTok Pte. Ltd.:
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/page/global/partner-privacy-policy/en
(7) For the purpose described in the section “How do we collect and use personal information”;
(8) For the purpose of fulfilling obligations and exercising rights as described in this Privacy Policy or other agreements made by and between you and Infold;
(9) For the purpose of understanding, maintaining and improving our products or services;
(10) On the basis of a legal request from you or your guardian;
(11) Required by laws and regulations or relevant authorities.
2. Necessary Sharing with Our Affiliates: To enable us to provide integrated services through the unified Infold account system and assist you in logging in and managing various products and services, your personal information of Infold Account (such as the email address or third-party account you used to register or log in to your Infold Account, avatar, nickname and personal profile) may be shared between us and our affiliates as required. Some of the Infold Game Services may be supported by our affiliates. To provide and optimize these services, we may share your personal information with our affiliates to achieve the data processing purposes stated in this Privacy Policy. In such cases, we will only share the necessary personal information for the purposes and within the scope outlined in this Privacy Policy.
Specifically, we will share your information only for lawful, legitimate, necessary, specific, and explicit purposes. If we or our affiliates share your personal information with third parties, we will ensure that these third parties use your information in compliance with this Privacy Policy and other appropriate confidentiality and security measures, or we will require them to re-seek your authorized consent.
3. Transfer. We will transfer your personal information only when:
(1) you expressly consent;
(2) required by laws and regulations or relevant authorities;
(3) in the event of a merger, consolidation, asset transfer, or any other similar transactions as our business continues to grow, we may transfer your personal information as a part of such transactions. We will inform you through push notifications, announcements or other means, and ensure that your personal information continues to be protected, or request the new managers to continue protecting your personal information in accordance with relevant laws and regulations, meeting the standard described in this Privacy Policy.
3. Disclosure. We will disclose your personal information only when:
(1) you expressly consent;
(2) required by the laws and regulations or relevant authorities.
4. Cases in which your prior consent is not required, including when:
(1) We may share, transfer or disclose your personal information without your consent in compliance with the relevant laws, regulations, and national standards of the territory where you use our products and services, as well as the writs of execution issued by administrative or judicial authorities.
(2) You acknowledge and agree that the information we collect may be de-identified and used for big data analysis. “De-identify” means that the information has been stripped of elements relevant to you, rendering it impossible to identify or restore to your personal information. We may publicly disclose and share with our partners information that has undergone statistical processing, ensuring information anonymity. This information will be used to understand how users interact with our services and to communicate general usage trends to the public.
IV. How We store and Protect your Personal Information
1. We will store your information only as long as necessary to fulfill the purpose described in this Privacy Policy, except:
(1) when required by the laws, regulations or regulatory authorities in the location where you use our services;
(2) for reasonable and necessary purposes to safeguard the public interest or to protect the personal rights, property safety, or other legitimate interests of our customers, ourselves, our group companies, our users or employees.
2. To provide you with the highest quality of service possible, our group adheres to diversification and globalization strategies, with subsidiaries located around the world. According to the service contract between you and us, your personal information may be processed on servers located outside your place of residence when necessary. Regardless of the server’s location, we will take appropriate measures to protect your rights in accordance with this Privacy Policy. The servers for these services are located in:
Frankfurt, Germany
Singapore
Virginia, USA
Tokyo, Japan
3.We will continually work to enhance our services. During these efforts, the server locations mentioned above may be adjusted and changed to further optimize our services.
4. Infold operates globally in the gaming business, and we have suppliers all over the world. We may access some of your information from anywhere, adhering to the principles of necessity, minimization, and anonymization. You acknowledge and agree that our support team, engineering team, and other teams around the world may access and process your information from locations other than your place of residence. The information we collect or share with third-party partners may also be stored and processed on our third-party SDK servers located in the United States, Germany, Japan and Singapore. Additionally, your information can be accessed from outside your location by our support, engineering and other teams worldwide, including Singapore.
5. If we terminate the services or operations, we will promptly cease the collection of your personal information promptly. We will notify you in advance, as required by the relevant laws and regulations. Following the termination, we will delete or anonymize your personal information unless otherwise required by relevant laws, regulations and regulatory authorities.
6. We will delete or anonymize your personal information if you request to delete your account, voluntarily delete your information or after a certain necessary period of time, unless a specific retention period is required by the laws and regulations where the server of your registered account is located.
7. If the information we collect needs to be transferred across borders within our group, we will ensure that such transfer is complies with laws, regulations and the requirements of the country where the information originates. This will be done and in accordance with the stipulations of relevant regulatory authorities to provide adequate protection for your personal information. We will de-identify and anonymize your personal information to ensure security and confidentiality. Additionally, we ensure that the region where the information is received has the same level of information protection capability as your region.
8. We will take reasonable and necessary security protection measures conforming to industry standards, to reduce the risk of loss, misuse, unauthorized access or disclosure of information. For example, in some products or services, we will use encryption technology (such as SSL) to protect your personal information. However, you understand that, due to technical limitations and various malicious means that may exist, we cannot guarantee 100% security of your information, even if we have done our utmost to strengthen our security measures. Moreover,
you understand that the system and communications network you use to access our services may experience issues beyond our control.
9. When a personal information security incident occurs, we will promptly inform you in accordance with relevant laws and regulations. This notification will include the basic information about the incident, its possible impact, the measures we have taken or will take to address it, recommendations on what you can do to prevent and reduce risks, available remedies, etc. Additionally, we will notify you promptly about the incident by email, letter, phone calls, push notifications, or other suitable means. If individual notices to personal information subjects are challenging, we will publish announcements in a reasonable and effective manner. We will also proactively report our handling of the personal information security incident as required by the regulatory authorities.
V. Your Rights to Manage Personal Information
We understand your concerns regarding your personal information and make every effort to ensure that you have the right to access, correct, delete, and revoke authorization for your personal information. This ensures you have full control to safeguard your privacy and security. Your rights include:
1. Right of Access
You have the right to access the personal information you have provided to us, such as avatar, nickname, player number, motto and rankings, according to the relevant instructions (or settings) of our services. If you encounter any issues accessing or intend to access other unavailable personal information described above, you may contact us through the contact information provided in this Privacy Policy.
2. Right to Correct or Modify
When you find the personal information you provide is inaccurate, incomplete or update needed, you may correct/modify your personal information when using our services.
(1) For certain personal information, we offer operational settings on the relevant function pages of the game.  You can directly make corrections or modifications. For instance, to correct or modify your avatar in the game, please follow these steps: Pear-Pal→click on the avatar→click the Edit button.
(2) If you encounter difficulties while exercising the aforementioned rights, or if online correction or modification services are currently inaccessible, you have the right to correct or modify the inaccurate or incomplete information. This is subject to identify verification, and the correction or modification should not compromise the objectivity and accuracy of the information. In certain circumstances, particularly when the information is inaccurate, you can request us to correct or modify your information via our feedback, error reporting or customer service, unless otherwise required by laws and regulations. However, for security and identification reasons, certain initial registration information submitted during registration may not be modifiable.
3. Right to Delete
You may request the deletion of your personal information directly unless it has been anonymized or is required by laws and regulations, including in cases where:
(1) The purpose of processing personal information has been achieved or no longer exists, or there is another legal ground;
(2) Our handling of your personal information violates any laws or regulations;
(3) We collect or use your personal information without your consent;
(4) Our handling of your personal information violates the agreement with you;
(5) You delete your game account;
(6) We terminate services and operations.
If we decide to respond to your request for deletion, we will also notify the entities that have obtained your personal information from us and request their prompt deletion, unless otherwise required by the laws and regulations, or if these entities are independently authorized by you. When you delete your information from our service system, we may not delete the corresponding information from the backup system immediately but will do so at the time when the backup is updated.
4. Right to Revoke All or Part of Your Authorization
As mentioned above, certain functions of our services require your device permissions, including notification, camera, etc., as set forth in Section I “How We Collect and Use Your Personal information ”. You have the option to withdraw or cease your ongoing authorization for these permissions at any time. Updating the version will not alter the status of previously set permissions without your explicit consent. Additionally, you can permanently revoke the authorization for us to collect your personal information by deleting your account. Upon withdrawal of authorization, we will no longer be able to provide you with the corresponding services. However, please note that your decision to withdraw such authorization will not affect our prior handling of your information based on your initial authorization.
5. Right to Delete Your Account
You can request the deletion of your game account through our customer service personnel or other means we have publicized. Once your game account is deleted,  you will no longer be able to use our services with that account. All accumulated but unconsumed rights and interests of the game account, as well as all future overdue benefits and other rights and interests, will be erased. Contents, information, data and records associated with the game account will be deleted or anonymized. Please note that once your game account is deleted, it cannot be restored. For more information on the process and conditions of deleting “Infinity Nikki” game accounts, please contact our customer service.
6. Right to Request Copies of Your Personal Information
You have the right to request copies of your personal information by contacting us at any time via the contact information provided in this Privacy Policy. We will respond to your request within fifteen working days.
7. Right to Constrain Automated Decision-making in Information Systems
In certain business functions, we may rely on non-human automated decision-making mechanisms, including information systems, algorithms, etc. If these decisions significantly impact your legitimate rights, you have the right to request an explanation, and we will provide appropriate remedies.
8. How We Address Your Requests for the aforementioned Rights
We will respond to your requests within fifteen working days while verifying your identity as a user. If you have any concerns during the process of your personal information, you may contact us via the contact information provided in “Contact us”. However, we may be unable to respond to your requests if prohibited by legal writs issued by administrative or judicial authorities in the territory where you use our services.
VI. Protection of Minor Information
Please note that we do not collect personal information of child (the specific age is determined according to the definition of “child” age in the laws of the country or region where you reside, for example, under 14 years old in South Korea, or under 13 years old in some other countries and regions). If you are the guardian of a relevant minor who has used our services and submitted their personal information, please instruct them to stop using our services immediately and inform us promptly so that we can take appropriate measures accordingly. Please refer to “Your Rights to Manage Personal Information”. Our customer service personnel may verify your relationship with the minor as needed. After such verification, we will assist you in deleting such information and corresponding game account.
If we are notified that we have collected personal information of a child without the consent of a guardian, we will promptly impose restrictions on the account and delete the relevant personal information.
VII. Update of the Privacy Policy
We may update this Privacy Policy periodically, and such updates shall be considered as a part of this Privacy Policy.
If these revisions lead to a significant reduction of your rights under this Privacy Policy, we will notify you by prominently displaying the revisions on our homepage, sending you an e-mail, or providing other forms of notification. In such case, your continued use of our services implies your agreement to be bound by the updated terms.
VIII. Miscellaneous
1. This Privacy Policy applies to all our services, except for certain specifically expressed services. These specific services will be governed by distinct personal information protection statements or rules.
The personal information protection statements or rules for these certain services will provide more detailed information on how we use your information in those services.
They form an integral part of this Privacy Policy.
If there is any inconsistency between any personal information protection statements or rules and this Privacy Policy, the former shall prevail.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this Privacy Policy, the terms used herein shall have the same meanings as those defined in other publicly available documents published by us.
3. The headings of this Privacy Policy are for convenience and readability purposes only, and do not affect the meaning or interpretation of any provisions in the text.
4. This Privacy Policy shall be governed by and construed under the laws of Singapore excluding its conflict of law principles. The
Convention on Contracts for the International Sale of Goods
will not apply. You agree and acknowledge that all disputes relating to this Agreement or Infold shall first be resolved by peaceful negotiation between the parties (any dispute requiring negotiation shall be notified to Infold in writing in accordance with the contact information provided in this Agreement) . If a solution to the dispute cannot be effectively reached after thirty days of negotiation, any claims or legal actions between you and Infold shall be referred to Singapore International Arbitration Centre (SIAC) for arbitration which shall be conducted in accordance with such commission’s arbitration rules. The arbitral award is final and binding upon both parties. If the above arbitration terms are not enforceable on any dispute, both parties agree that such dispute shall be brought to a court in Singapore. You hereby consent to, and waive all defenses of lack of personal jurisdiction and/or forum non-convenience with respect to venue and jurisdiction, whether by arbitration or judicial judgment. Subject to applicable laws and regulations, both parties confirm that any dispute resolution proceedings, whether in arbitration or court, will be conducted only on an individual basis and not a class or representative action. If you do not accept these terms, please terminate your use of our services or send us a written notice of your desire to opt out of arbitration within thirty days.
5. Severability
If any provision herein is held to be invalid or declared illegal, or unenforceable for any reason, such provision shall be severed and deleted from this Privacy Policy. The remainder of this Privacy Policy shall remain unaffected and continue in force and effect. However, if a class action or arbitration waiver is held to be invalid, unenforceable, or illegal, you agree that such waiver may be inseverable. In other words, under no circumstances may any litigation proceeding be conducted on a class basis without our prior express written consent.
6. No Assignment
You may not assign, transfer, charge, or subcontract, whether by operation of law or otherwise, all or any of your rights or obligations hereunder without our express prior written consent. Otherwise, we may, at our sole discretion, terminate our provision of any services to you without further notice. If such a restriction on assignment is unenforceable under the laws of your country/region of residence or place of residence, this Privacy Policy shall remain binding upon you and your successors. Notwithstanding the foregoing, we reserve the right to assign, charge, or subcontract all or any of our rights or obligations hereunder at any time.
7. Infold’s failure to exercise, delay in exercising or partial exercise of any right under this Privacy Policy or applicable laws shall not be deemed a waiver of such right, nor shall it prevent Infold from exercising such right in the future.
8. The term “affiliate” as used herein, refers to any entity that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with Infold.
9. Infold may translate this Privacy Policy into other languages.
10. In addition to any other restrictions set forth herein, Infold shall not be liable for any delay in performance or non-performance caused by events beyond Infold’s reasonable control, such as acts of government authorities, acts of nature or other events not reasonably controllable by herein.
11. You acknowledge that you have voluntarily read and accepted this Privacy Policy, and you do not anticipate receiving any compensation beyond what is explicitly provided herein.
12. If this Privacy Policy conflicts with local laws in your country or region of residence, the local laws will take precedence.
IX. Contact Us
1. We have established a dedicated department for personal information protection in compliance with this Privacy Policy. If you have any questions, comments or suggestions about this Privacy Policy, our privacy measures, or matters relating to your personal information, you may contact us by sending an email to dpo@infoldgames.com.
2. In general, we will respond to your questions, comments, or suggestions within fifteen working days after receiving them and verifying your user identity, unless otherwise required by the laws and regulations of the territory where you use our services.
3.Contact Your Local Information Protection Authority
If you have concerns about how we use your information, you have the right to lodge a complaint with the information protection authority in your country of residence, as required by applicable laws.
EU:
For more information please visit:
https://ec.europa.eu/info/law/law-topic/data-protection/reform/what-are-data-protection-authorities-dpas_en
UK:
If you have any concerns about our use of your information, you also have the right to lodge a complaint with the Information Commissioner’s Office, which oversees the use of personal information in the UK. You can contact them via the following helpline:
Tel: 0303 123 1113
SUPPLEMENTAL JURISDICTION-SPECIFIC TERMS
Some jurisdictions’ laws contain additional terms for users of the game services, which are set out in this section.
If you are a user located in one of the jurisdictions below, the terms set out below under the name of your jurisdiction apply to you in addition to the terms set out in our Privacy Policy above.
Australia
Overseas Recipients
We take reasonable steps to ensure that third party recipients of your personal information located outside Australia handle your personal information in a manner that is consistent with Australian privacy laws. However, you acknowledge that we do not control, or accept liability for, the acts and omissions of these third party recipients.
Access
You have the right to access personal information we hold about you, how we use it, and who we share it with. You can access the personal information you have made available as part of your account by logging into your account. If you believe we hold any other personal information about you, please contact us at dpo@infoldgames.com.
Correction
You have the right to correct any of your personal information we hold that is inaccurate. You can access the personal information we hold about you by logging into your game account. If you believe we hold any other personal information about you and that information is inaccurate, please contact us at dpo@infoldgames.com.
Children
If you are under the age of 13, you will not be able to use our services.
Transacting Anonymously
Where practicable, we will give you the option of not identifying yourself or using a pseudonym when registering an account on or using the game services. You acknowledge that if you do not provide us with your personal information, we may be unable to provide you with access to certain features or sections of the game services, including social media integration and in-game purchases.
Data Transfers
While we take reasonable steps to ensure that third party recipients of your personal information comply with privacy laws that are similar to those of your jurisdiction, you acknowledge and agree that we cannot control the actions of third party recipients and so cannot guarantee that they will comply with those privacy laws.
California
This section applies to California residents covered by the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”).
Rights under the CCPA
If you are a California resident, you have the right to:
1. Request we disclose to you free of charge the following information covering the 12 months preceding your request:
(1) the categories of personal information about you that we collected;
(2) the categories of sources from which the personal information was collected;
(3) the purpose for collecting personal information about you;
(4) the categories of third parties to whom we disclosed personal information about you and the categories of personal information that was disclosed (if applicable) and the purpose for disclosing the personal information about you; and
(5) the specific pieces of personal information we collected about you;
2. Request we delete personal information we collected from you, unless CCPA recognizes an exception; and
3. Be free from unlawful discrimination for exercising your rights including providing a different level or quality of services or denying goods or services to you when you exercise your rights under the CCPA.
We will acknowledge receipt of your request within 10 business days of receiving it and provide information on how we will likely handle the request. We aim to fulfill all verified requests within 45 days pursuant to the CCPA. If necessary, extensions for an additional 45 days will be accompanied by an explanation for the delay.
How to Exercise Your Rights
First, you may wish to log into your account and manage your information from there.
If you are a California resident to whom the CCPA applies, you may also exercise your rights, if any, regarding other information by contacting us at dpo@infoldgames.com.
Canada
If you are located in Canada and wish to obtain written information about our policies and practices with respect to our service providers located outside Canada, you may contact us at dpo@infoldgames.com. Our privacy experts who monitor this email address are also able to answer any questions users may have about the collection, use, disclosure or storage of personal information by our service providers.
Where we use service providers who might have access to your personal information, we require them to have privacy and security standards that are comparable to ours. We use contracts and other measures with our service providers to maintain the confidentiality and security of your personal information and to prevent it from being used for any purpose other than as provided in this Privacy Policy.
EEA, UK and Switzerland
If you are located in the European Economic Area (EEA), United Kingdom (UK) or Switzerland, the following section applies to you in addition to the Privacy Policy set out above.
Information Subject Rights
In addition to the information set out in section “Your rights to manage personal information”, you have the right to:
1. restrict the processing of your personal information;
2. object to the processing of your personal information.
Legal basis for processing your personal information
We may only use your personal information when we have a “legal basis” to do so. Our legal bases for collecting and using the personal information for the purposes of our Privacy Policy above is:
1. To establish and perform our contract with you (i.e. our “User Agreement”) and to provide our services;
2. To achieve our or our partners’ legitimate interests, where those interests are not overridden by your information protection interests of fundamental rights and freedoms, e.g. to protect our legal rights, to pursue or defend legal claims, to improve our services;
3. Consent to collect or use your personal information for specific purposes;
4. To comply with our legal obligations under applicable laws and regulations;
5. To protect our or your vital interests or those of another person (for example, another player), e.g. against fraud and violations of our terms;
6. While we typically do not collect sensitive or special category personal information, where we do this, it will be on the grounds of consent or other applicable lawful basis.
Data Transfers
By accepting and consenting to this Privacy Policy, you consent to the transfer of your personal information to third parties (if any), which may include the cross-border transfer of your information to any country where we have databases or affiliates and, in particular, to the jurisdictions as described in Section IV “How we store and protect your personal information”.
Where we transfer your personal information to countries and territories outside of the EEA, UK or Switzerland, which have been formally recognized as providing an adequate level of protection for personal information, we rely on the relevant “adequacy decisions” from the European Commission, where applicable.
Where the transfer is not subject to an adequacy decision, we have taken appropriate safeguards to require that your personal information will remain protected in accordance with this Privacy Policy. The safeguards we use are the European Commission’s Standard Contractual Clauses as issued on 4 June 2021, including the UK Addendum, the UK International Data Transfer Agreement permitted under Article 46 of the UK GDPR, and/or their approved equivalent for Switzerland. This is how transfers of personal information between us and other companies will be safeguarded. All companies are required to protect personal information that they process from Europe in accordance with European Union data protection law. Transferred personal information includes basic information such as your name or contact information such as your email address.
Children
Our services are not marketed to, or intended for, children. Children for the purposes of our services are (a) under the age of 13 years old or, if older (b) between 13 and 18 years old but under the age at which they can give valid digital consent to processing of their personal information under applicable data privacy laws. We strive to follow the different minimum age guidelines set by the laws of individual regions when determining the age which children can access certain features of our services.
Children are not permitted to use our services, and we do not knowingly collect any personal information from children. Though our services are not intended for children as the primary audience, we may collect age information before allowing a user to proceed for certain services. If we learn that we have inadvertently gathered personal information about a child that is not subject to an exemption under applicable privacy law, we will take measures to promptly remove that information from our records.
Contact
If you have questions, need further information about the legal bases for processing your personal information, or want to withdraw your consent, please contact us as set out in “Contact us”.
Data Protection Supervisory Authority
To lodge a complaint with your national or regional data protection supervisory authority, please contact the competent authority.
France
Your Rights
Instructions for the processing of your personal information after your death
You have the right to provide us with general or specific instructions for the retention, deletion, and communication of your personal information after your death.
The specific instructions are only valid for the processing activities mentioned therein and the processing of these instructions is subject to your specific consent.
You may amend or revoke your instructions at any time.
You may designate a person responsible for the implementation of your instructions. This person will be informed of your instructions in the event of your death, and be entitled to request their implementation from us. In the absence of designation or, unless otherwise provided for, in the event of the death of the designated person, their heirs will have the right to be informed of your instructions and to request their implementation from us.
When you wish to make such instructions, please contact us at
dpo@infoldgames.com.
Indonesia
Consent
By accepting and consenting to this Privacy Policy, you agree that we may collect, use and share your personal information in accordance with this Privacy Policy, as revised from time to time. If you do not agree to this Privacy Policy, you must not access or use our services and we have the right to not provide you with access to our services.
Parental and Guardian Consent
If you are under the age of 13, you undertake that you have the consent of your parent or legal guardian to register an account on the game and use the game services.
Data Subject Rights
You have the right to access your personal information stored in our game from time to time in accordance with applicable data privacy laws and regulations in Indonesia.
Data Breach
In the event we fail to maintain the confidentiality of your personal information in the game, we will notify you through the contact information provided by you or via the game, to the extent required by local laws and regulations.
Data Retention
We will retain your personal information in line with legal requirements.
Notification to Amendment of this Privacy Policy
If you fail to explicitly express your objection to any amended version of this Privacy Policy within fourteen days of the date the relevant amended version of this Privacy Policy is made available, you will be considered as having accepted the changes and agreed to the new Privacy Policy. However, you may stop using or accessing our service by unsubscribing or ceasing your use of the game services at any time, if you cease to agree with the amended Privacy Policy.
Data Accuracy and Third Party Consent
You are responsible for making sure that any personal details which you provide to us are accurate and valid. In order to confirm the accuracy of the data, we may also verify the data provided to us, at any time. You hereby represent that you have secured all necessary consent(s) before providing us with any other person’s personal data (for example, for referral promotions), in which case we will always assume that you have already obtained prior consent, and as such, you will be responsible for any claims whatsoever from any party arising as a result of the absence of such consent(s).
Malaysia
Parental and Guardian Consent
If you are under the age of 13, you undertake that you have the consent of your parent or legal guardian to register an account on and use the game.
In the event you are agreeing to this Privacy Policy to allow a minor to access and use the game services, you hereby consent to the provision of personal information of the minor to be processed in accordance with this Privacy Policy and you personally accept and agree to be bound by the terms in this Privacy Policy. Further, you hereby agree to take responsibility for the actions of such minor, and that minor’s compliance with this Privacy Policy.
Your Rights
Right of access
: You have the right to request access to and obtain a copy of your personal information that we have collected and is being processed by or on behalf of us. We reserve the right to impose a fee for providing access to your personal information in the amounts as permitted under law.
When handling a data access request, we are permitted to request certain data to verify the identity of the requestor to ensure that he/she is the person legally entitled to make the data access request.
Right of correction
: You may request for the correction of your personal information. When handling a information correction request, we are permitted to request for certain information to verify the identity of the requestor to ensure that he/she is the person legally entitled to make the information correction request.
Right to limit processing of your personal information
: You may request to limit the processing of your personal information by sending an email to dpo@infoldgames.com. However, this may affect our provision of the game services to you.
Contact
To protect your personal information and handle complaints relating to your personal information, we have appointed the department responsible for managing and protecting your personal information, you may contact us by sending an email to dpo@infoldgames.com..
New Zealand
This section applies to users located in New Zealand:
Overseas Recipients
We take reasonable steps to ensure that third party recipients of your personal information located outside New Zealand handle your personal information in a manner that is consistent with New Zealand privacy laws. However, you acknowledge that we do not control, or accept liability for, the acts and omissions of these third party recipients.
Access
You have the right to access personal information we hold about you, how we use it, and who we share it with. You can access the personal information you have made available as part of your account by logging into your account. If you believe we hold any other personal information about you, please contact us at dpo@infoldgames.com.
Correction
You have the right to request the correction of any of your personal information we hold that is inaccurate. You can access the personal information we hold about you by logging into your account. If you believe we hold any other personal information about you and that information is inaccurate, please contact us at dpo@infoldgames.com.
Children
If you are under the age of 13, you undertake that you have the consent of your parent or legal guardian to register an account on and use the game.
Your Rights
If you are dissatisfied with our response to your request for access to, or correction of, your personal information or your privacy complaint in respect of your personal information, you may contact the Office of the New Zealand Privacy Commissioner (www.privacy.org.nz).
Data Transfers
While we take reasonable steps to ensure that third party recipients of your personal information comply with privacy laws that are similar to those of your jurisdiction, you acknowledge and agree that we cannot control the actions of third party recipients and so cannot guarantee that they will comply with those privacy laws.
Philippines
Minimum Age
You must be at least 18 years of age to be able to use the game services.
Your Rights
You are entitled to the following rights:
1.
Right to be informed.
You may in certain circumstances have the right to be informed whether personal information pertaining to you is being, or has been processed, including the existence of automated decision-making and profiling.
2.
Right to object.
You may in certain circumstances have the right to object to the processing of your personal information, including processing for direct marketing, automated processing or profiling.
3.
Right to access.
You may in certain circumstances have the right to seek reasonable access to, upon request, your personal information.
4.
Right to rectification.
You may in certain circumstances have the right to dispute an inaccuracy or error in your personal information and have us correct it, unless the request is vexatious or otherwise unreasonable.
5.
Right to erasure or blocking.
You may in certain circumstances have the right to suspend, withdraw or seek the blocking, removal or destruction of your personal information.
Consent
By consenting to this Privacy Policy, you consent to us:
Collecting and processing your personal information as described in the section “
How We Collect And Use Your Personal Information”
above;
Sharing your personal information with third parties, companies within our corporate group, and a third party that acquires all or substantially all of us or our business, as described in this Privacy Policy and for the purposes stated herein; and transferring or storing your personal information in destinations outside the Philippines as described in “
How We Store and Protect Your Personal Information”.
Singapore
By clicking the button to proceed, you consent to the cross-border transfer of your data to any country where we have databases or affiliates and, in particular, Indonesia, the People’s Republic of China and the United States.
Access
You have the right to access your personal information, how we use it, and who we share it with. You can access the personal information you have made available as part of your account by logging into your account. If you believe we hold any other personal information about you, please contact us at dpo@infoldgames.com.
Correction
You have the right to correct any of your personal information that is inaccurate. You can access the personal information we hold about you by logging into your account. If you believe we hold any other personal information about you and that information is inaccurate, please contact  dpo@infoldgames.com.
Our designated data protection officer for the purposes of compliance with the Personal Data Protection Act 2012 can be contacted at dpo@infoldgames.com.
Thailand
By accepting this Privacy Policy, you acknowledge that you have read, understood, and agree to this Privacy Policy. If you do not agree with this Privacy Policy, you must not use the game services.
You may request us to discontinue, to restrict the use or provision of, and/or to request for data portability of any and all of your personal information which is stored by us, to the extent provided by the act on the applicable data privacy laws and regulations in Thailand, including the
Thai Personal Data Protection Act.
When you wish to make such requests, please contact us at
dpo@infoldgames.com.
We will give you notice of any material changes to this Privacy Policy, and give you an opportunity to reject such changes, failing which the changes will become effective as stated in the notice.
By accepting this Privacy Policy, you expressly authorize us to collect, use, store, and process your personal information, including disclosing to third parties and transferring to countries other than Thailand, to the extent and for the purpose provided by this Privacy Policy.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://policies.google.com/privacy:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 1
https://aihelp.net/privacypolicy/:
Privacy Policy
Effective Date: December 15, 2023
SHAREFUN NETWORK PTE. LTD. (“AIHelp”, “we”, “us” or
                        “our”) knows that you care about how your personal
                        information is used and shared, and we take your privacy
                        seriously.  Accordingly, we have implemented this
                        Privacy Statement to inform you of the information that
                        we collect from you when you visit our website
                        www.aihelp.net and its sub-domains (the “Website”) or
                        use the AIHelp services and/or their related features
                        (the “Services”), what we do with it and how you can
                        exercise your privacy rights.
This Privacy Statement covers AIHelp’s treatment of
                        personal information (“Personal Information”) that
                        AIHelp gathers when you access/use the Website or
                        Services.
1. What Personal Information does AIHelp collect and
                        what is it used for?
(i) Information you provide to us
AIHelp collects information you voluntarily submit to
                        the Website or Services.  For example, when you register
                        for or use an account, request a demo, trial or further
                        information about our Services, subscribe to marketing
                        communications, provide your feedback, seek customer
                        support, post comments on our blog, or sign up to our
                        events or webinars, you may provide certain information
                        to us such as your name, email address, contact details,
                        company name, job role, payment related information
                        (e.g. credit card number, physical address, etc.) and
                        the nature of your request or communication.
We may also collect personal information from you
                        offline, such as when you attend one of our events,
                        during phone calls with sales representatives or support
                        staff.
The personal information that you are asked to provide,
                        and the reasons why you are asked to provide it, will be
                        made clear to you at the point we ask you for
                        it.  Examples of how we may use this information
                        include:
To provide you with our Website and Services, and to
                          process transactions and orders;
To respond to your online enquiries and requests, and
                          to provide you with information and access to
                          resources or services that you have requested from us;
Set up your online account and send you administrative
                          or account related information;
Manage your account, customer relationship management,
                          provide support and other related services;
Where it is in accordance with your preferences send
                          you marketing communications we think you’ll find
                          valuable;
To maintain and enhance our security and combat fraud,
                          malware and other malicious activity or security
                          risks;
To obtain your feedback or user experience;
To carry out other legitimate business purposes, such
                          as to improve our Website and Services, internal
                          analytics, record-keeping, business planning and
                          management.
(ii) Information that we collect automatically
In addition, we automatically receive and store certain
                        device-related information whenever you interact with
                        our Website or Services.  Such information does not
                        necessarily reveal your identity but may include
                        information about the specific device you are using,
                        such as:
Required items: platform, language, sdk version;
Custom configuration options: area code, carrier,
                          network, device model, available storage, total
                          storage, os version, application info, server id,
                          custom field.
We will use this information for a number of purposes,
                        including:
To provide, operate, optimize and maintain our Website
                          and Services;
To personalize content and improve the layout,
                          navigation and content of our Website and Services;
Produce analytics, identify trends and address Service
                          issues;
Maintain security and identify any server problems or
                          other IT or network issues;
For other legitimate business purposes such as audits,
                          for marketing and customer relationships, record
                          keeping, business planning and management.
We may also use “cookies” to track your experience and
                        use of the Website and Services as explained further
                        under the heading “Cookies and similar tracking
                        technology” below.
(iii) Information we process on behalf of our customers.
In the course of using our Services, our customers and
                        their end-users may submit or upload certain content,
                        communications, data, attachments or files to our
                        Services for hosting and processing by us.  For example,
                        if an end-user communicates with our customer’s support
                        staff using AIHelp’s In-App Chat features, then we will
                        process the end-user’s name, email address and support
                        request on behalf of our customers (as a data processor)
                        and in accordance with their instructions.  Our privacy
                        practices in such cases will be governed by the contract
                        that we have in place with them.
If you have any questions or concerns about how such
                        information is handled, you should in the first
                        instance, contact the relevant customer.  We will
                        provide assistance to our customers to address any
                        concerns you may have, in accordance with the terms of
                        our contract with them.
2. Will AIHelp share any of the Personal Information it
                        receives?
We take care to allow your Personal Information to be
                        accessed only by those who really need to in order to
                        perform their tasks and duties, and to third parties who
                        have a legitimate purpose for accessing it.  We may
                        share your Personal Information with third parties in
                        the following circumstances:
Service Providers and Agents: We employ other companies
                        and people to perform tasks on our behalf. For example,
                        we may decide to use a third-party payment processing
                        company to process payments you make through the
                        Service.  In addition, parts of the Service may be
                        hosted by a third party on our behalf.  Your Personal
                        Information may be accessed by such providers/agents, in
                        the event that we need to share your information with
                        them to provide our Service to you.  Unless we tell you
                        differently, AIHelp’s agents do not have any right to
                        use Personal Information we share with them beyond what
                        is necessary to assist us.  A list of our current
                        third-party and affiliate sub-processors is available at
https://www.aihelp.net/subprocessors
Business Transfers: We may share or transfer your
                        information in connection with, or during negotiations
                        of, any merger, sale of company assets, financing,
                        acquisition, dissolution, corporate reorganization or
                        other similar event.
Protection of AIHelp and Others: We may release Personal
                        Information when we believe in good faith that release
                        is necessary to establish or defend our legal rights;
                        enforce or apply our conditions of use and other
                        agreements; or protect the rights, property, or safety
                        of AIHelp, our employees, our users, or others.
Compliance with laws: We may disclose information where
                        necessary or required by law, in order to comply with
                        legal process or government requests.
With Your Consent: Except as set forth above, you will
                        be notified when your Personal Information may be shared
                        with third parties and will be able to prevent the
                        sharing of this information.
3. Legal basis for processing personal information
Information for the EEA and Switzerland (GDPR)
If you are a visitor from the EEA (i.e., European Union
                        Member States, Iceland, Liechtenstein, and Norway) or
                        Switzerland, our legal basis for collecting and using
                        the personal information described above will depend on
                        the personal information concerned and the specific
                        context in which we collect it.
However, we will normally collect personal information
                        from you only where we have your consent to do so, where
                        we need the personal information to perform a contract
                        with you, or where the processing is in our legitimate
                        interests and not overridden by your data protection
                        interests or fundamental rights and freedoms.  In some
                        cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect
                        personal information from you or may otherwise need the
                        personal information to protect your vital interests or
                        those of another person.
If we ask you to provide personal information to comply
                        with a legal requirement or to perform a contact with
                        you, we will make this clear at the relevant time and
                        advise you whether the provision of your personal
                        information is mandatory or not (as well as of the
                        possible consequences if you do not provide your
                        personal information).
Similarly, if we collect and use your personal
                        information in reliance on our legitimate interests (or
                        those of any third party), we will make clear to you at
                        the relevant time what those legitimate interests are.
If you have questions about or need further information
                        concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use
                        your personal information, please contact us using the
                        contact details provided under the “Questions or
                        Concerns” heading below.
California Resident Rights (CCPA)
If you are a California resident, you have the rights
                        set forth in this section. Please note that we may
                        process Personal Data of our customers’ end users or
                        employees in connection with our provision of certain
                        services to our customers. If we are processing your
                        Personal Data as a service provider, you should contact
                        the entity that collected your Personal Data in the
                        first instance to address your rights with respect to
                        such data.
If there are any conflicts between this section and any
                        other provision of this Privacy Policy and you are a
                        California resident, the portion that is more protective
                        of Personal Data shall control to the extent of such
                        conflict.
If you have questions about or need further information
                        concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use
                        your personal information, please contact us using the
                        contact details provided under the “Questions or
                        Concerns” heading below.
Supplemental Information for Other Regions
Australia
: Personal data
                        collected, stored, used, and/or processed by AIHelp, as
                        outlined in this Privacy Notice, complies with the
                        Australian Privacy Act 1988 (Commonwealth) and the
                        Australia Privacy Principles. If you are not satisfied
                        with how we handle a complaint or disagree with the
                        resolution we propose, you may file a complaint with the
                        Office of the Australian Information Commissioner (OAIC)
                        through the methods listed on their website.
                        Alternatively, you can ask us to forward your complaint
                        details to the OAIC directly.
Brazil
: Personal data
                        collected, stored, used, and/or processed by AIHelp, as
                        described in this Privacy Notice, is handled in
                        accordance with Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (LGPD).
                        By using or accessing our Sites or Services, individuals
                        expressly consent to the collection, use, storage, and
                        processing of their personal data by us for the purposes
                        detailed in this Notice.
Canada
: Personal data, as
                        defined in the Personal Information Protection and
                        Electronic Documents Act (PIPEDA), will be collected,
                        stored, used, and/or processed by AIHelp in compliance
                        with our obligations under PIPEDA.
Japan
: Personal data
                        collected, stored, used, and/or processed by AIHelp, as
                        described in this Notice, adheres to Japan’s Act on the
                        Protection of Personal Information (APPI).
New Zealand
: Personal data
                        collected, stored, used, and/or processed by AIHelp, as
                        described in this Notice, complies with New Zealand’s
                        Privacy Act 2020 and its 13 Information Privacy
                        Principles (NZ IPPs).
Singapore
: Personal data
                        collected, stored, used, and/or processed by AIHelp, as
                        described in this Notice, adheres to our obligations
                        under the Personal Data Protection Act 2012 (PDPA).
United Kingdom
: Personal
                        data collected, stored, used, and/or processed by
                        AIHelp, as outlined in this Privacy Notice, complies
                        with our obligations under the UK Data Protection Act
                        2018, as amended by the Data Protection, Privacy and
                        Electronic Communications (Amendments etc.) (EU Exit)
                        Regulations 2019, and any subsequent amendments,
                        replacements, or superseding legislation (U.K. GDPR).
4. Cookies and similar tracking technology
“Cookies” include commonly used pieces of information in
                        the form of small files that are placed on an
                        individual’s device to enable the individual to more
                        easily communicate and interact with the Website and our
                        Services.  When you visit our Website, we may send one
                        or more cookies to your browser.  They enable us to
                        store information about your device that is then used
                        for matching certain other device-related information
                        that we collect via the browser.  This helps us, amongst
                        other things, to provide you with a good experience when
                        you browse our Website and enhance the level of services
                        and functions provided.
“Web beacons” (also known as “single-pixel” or “clear”
                        GIFs) include electronic images embedded in the Website
                        which are invisible to users.  Web beacons collect
                        information, such as identifiers, time and date of
                        access, and descriptions of the pages or communications
                        in which the web beacons are embedded.
We may use cookies and web beacons for various purposes,
                        including by way of example:
Saving user preferences;
Storing agent login information of the agents so that
                          they don’t need to login every time they visit the
                          dashboard
Provide CSRF Protection
Giving agents convenient access to be able to reply to
                          a single issue by directly clicking on the link
Customizing content of the Website and Services for
                          individual users;
Recording session information;
Saving certain information about users of the Website
                          and Services;
Facilitating and enhancing interaction with the
                          Website and Services.
We may also use a third party provider to analyze data
                        and patterns regarding usage of the Website and Services
                        and this third party provider may use cookies or web
                        beacons to collect such information.
Most browsers will allow you to erase cookies from your
                        computer hard drive, block acceptance of cookies, or
                        receive a warning before a cookie is stored.  You may
                        also be able to refuse certain web beacons by adjusting
                        the settings on your browser or device.  Please refer to
                        your browser help menu or device or operating system
                        instructions to learn more about these functions. If you
                        choose to block cookies, you may still use our Website
                        and Services, though your access to some functionality
                        and areas may be restricted.
5. Does AIHelp transfer Personal Information
                        internationally?
Your Personal Information may be stored and processed by
                        us where we engage service providers (e.g. the U.S.). It
                        may therefore be processed outside of your country of
                        residence, which may have different data protection
                        rules to those of your country.  Where we do so, our
                        collection, storage and use of your Personal Information
                        will at all times be in accordance with this Privacy
                        Statement and applicable laws.
We have taken appropriate safeguards to require that
                        your personal information will remain protected in
                        accordance with this Privacy Policy.
You can direct any questions or complaints about the use
                        or disclosure of your Personal Information to us at
privacy@aihelp.net
. We will investigate and resolve any complaints or
                        disputes regarding the use of Personal Information
                        timely after receiving your complaint.
If you have an unresolved privacy complaint that we have
                        not addressed satisfactorily, we commit to cooperate
                        with the panel established by the EU data protection
                        authorities (DPAs) and the Swiss Federal Data Protection
                        and Information Commissioner, as applicable, and to
                        comply with the advice given by them in respect of the
                        complaint.
Click here
for a list of EU DPAs.
You may have the option to select binding arbitration
                        for the resolution of your complaint under certain
                        circumstances.
For information on how to request access, rectify or
                        deletion of your Personal Information if it is
                        inaccurate or processed in violation, see “Questions or
                        Concerns” below.  Furthermore, we commit to giving you
                        an opportunity to opt out if Personal Information we
                        control about you is to be disclosed to any independent
                        third parties, or is to be used for a materially
                        different purpose from the purposes set out in this
                        Privacy Statement.  If you otherwise wish to limit the
                        use or disclosure of your Personal Information, please
                        write to us at the contact details further below.
6. How does AIHelp protect your Personal Information?
The security of your Personal Information is very
                        important to us and we go to great lengths to ensure
                        data are kept secure.  We use appropriate technical and
                        organizational security measures to protect your
                        Personal Information from loss, misuse, and unauthorized
                        access, disclosure, alteration and destruction, both
                        during transmission and once we receive it. However, no
                        method of transmission over the Internet, or method of
                        electronic storage, is 100% secure. Therefore we cannot
                        guarantee its absolute security.
7. Third party website/services
The Website may permit you to link to other websites on
                        the Internet, and other websites may contain links to
                        the Website. These other websites are not under AIHelp
                        control, and such links do not constitute an endorsement
                        by AIHelp of those other websites or the services
                        offered through them.  The privacy and security
                        practices of websites linked to or from the Service are
                        not covered by this Privacy Statement, and AIHelp is not
                        responsible for the privacy or security practices or the
                        content of such websites.
The Website may permit you to link to other websites on
                        the Internet, and other websites may contain links to
                        the Website. These other websites are not under AIHelp
                        control, and such links do not constitute an endorsement
                        by AIHelp of those other websites or the services
                        offered through them.  The privacy and security
                        practices of websites linked to or from the Service are
                        not covered by this Privacy Statement, and AIHelp is not
                        responsible for the privacy or security practices or the
                        content of such websites.
8. Data Security and Retention
We retain personal information we collect from you where
                        we have an ongoing legitimate business need to do so
                        (for example, to fulfill your orders or to comply with
                        applicable legal, tax or accounting requirements).
In addition to this, we implement a rolling two-year
                        data retention policy. This means that, in most cases,
                        we will retain your personal data for a period of two
                        years from your last interaction with us.
After this period, or when we have no ongoing legitimate
                        business need to process your personal information, we
                        will either delete or anonymise it or, if this is not
                        possible (for example, because your personal information
                        has been stored in backup archives), then we will
                        securely store your personal information and isolate it
                        from any further processing until deletion is possible.
Upon termination or expiry of the Agreement, AIHelp
                        shall delete or return to Customer the Personal Data
                        (including copies) in AIHelp’s possession. This
                        requirement shall not apply to the extent that AIHelp is
                        required by applicable law to retain some or all of the
                        Personal Data or to Personal Data archived on backup
                        systems.
9. Your data protection rights
If you wish to
access, correct, update or request deletion
of your personal information, you can do so at any
                          time by contacting us using the contact details
                          provided under the “Questions or Concerns” heading
                          below.
In addition, if you are a resident of the EEA, you can
object to processing
of
                          your personal information, ask us to
restrict processing
of
                          your personal information or
request portability
of
                          your personal information. Again, you can exercise
                          these rights by contacting us using the contact
                          details provided under the “Questions or Concerns”
                          heading below.
You have the right to
opt-out of marketing communications we
send you at any time.  You can exercise this right
                          by clicking on the “unsubscribe” or “opt-out” link in
                          the marketing e-mails we send you.  To opt-out of
                          other forms of marketing (such as postal marketing or
                          telemarketing), then please contact us using the
                          contact details provided under the “Questions or
                          Concerns” heading below.
Similarly, if we have collected and process your
                          personal information with your consent, then you can
withdraw your consent
at
                          any time.  Withdrawing your consent will not affect
                          the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to
                          your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your
                          personal information conducted in reliance on lawful
                          processing grounds other than consent.
You have the
right to complain to a data protection
                            authority
about our collection and use of your personal
                          information.  For more information, please contact
                          your local data protection authority. (Contact details
                          for data protection authorities in the EEA,
                          Switzerland and certain non-European countries
                          (including the US and Canada) are available
here
.)
AIHelp will not use Customer Data to train or
                          fine-tune any AI/ML models without Customer's prior
                          permission or instruction.
We respond to all requests we receive from individuals
                        wishing to exercise their data protection rights in
                        accordance with applicable data protection laws.
Please note that, as stated above, if you are an
                        individual whose personal information has been collected
                        through the AIHelp services (e.g. you have submitted a
                        support request to a company that uses our customer
                        support technology) then we are acting as a data
                        processor on behalf of those companies. You will need to
                        contact the company (our customer) directly to exercise
                        the rights above and they will respond to you
                        accordingly. We will provide assistance to our customers
                        to respond to your requests where required, in
                        accordance with their instructions and the terms of our
                        agreement with them.
10. Children’s Personal Information
We do not knowingly collect any personal information
                        from children under the age of 16. If you are under the
                        age of 16, please do not submit any personal information
                        through our Websites or Services. We encourage parents
                        and legal guardians to monitor their children’s Internet
                        usage and to help enforce this Privacy Statement by
                        instructing their children never to provide personal
                        information through the Websites or Services without
                        their permission. If you have reason to believe that a
                        child under the age of 16 has provided personal
                        information to us through the Websites or Services,
                        please contact us at
privacy@aihelp.net
,
                        and we will use commercially reasonable efforts to
                        delete that information.
11. Changes to this Privacy Statement
AIHelp may amend this Privacy Statement from time to
                        time.  Use of information we collect now is subject to
                        the Privacy Statement in effect at the time such
                        information is used.  If we make changes in the way we
                        use Personal Information, we will notify you by posting
                        an announcement on our website, or via the Service, or
                        sending you an email.
12. Questions or Concerns
If you have any questions or concerns regarding privacy,
                        please send us a detailed message at
privacy@aihelp.net
. We will make every effort to resolve your concerns.
Sub-policy 2
https://www.apple.com/legal/privacy/en-ww/:
Choose another country or region to see content specific to your location and shop online.
Ireland
Ireland
Other country or region
Continue
Apple
Store
Shop the Latest
Mac
iPad
iPhone
Apple Watch
Apple Vision Pro
Accessories
Find a Store
Order Status
Apple Trade In
Financing
Personal Setup
Certified Refurbished
Education
Business
Veterans and Military
Government
Mac
Explore All Mac
MacBook Air
MacBook Pro
iMac
Mac mini
Mac Studio
Mac Pro
Displays
Compare Mac
Switch from PC to Mac
Shop Mac
Help Me Choose
Mac Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
Mac Support
AppleCare+ for Mac
macOS Sequoia
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
Continuity
iCloud+
Mac for Business
Education
iPad
Explore All iPad
iPad Pro
iPad Air
iPad
iPad mini
Apple Pencil
Keyboards
Compare iPad
Why iPad
Shop iPad
iPad Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
iPad Support
AppleCare+ for iPad
iPadOS 18
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
iCloud+
Education
iPhone
Explore All iPhone
iPhone 16 Pro
iPhone 16
iPhone 16e
iPhone 15
Compare iPhone
Switch from Android
Shop iPhone
iPhone Accessories
Apple Trade In
Carrier Deals at Apple
Financing
iPhone Support
AppleCare+ for iPhone
iOS 18
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
iPhone Privacy
iCloud+
Wallet, Pay, Card
Siri
Watch
Explore All Apple Watch
Apple Watch Series 10
Apple Watch Ultra 2
Apple Watch SE
Apple Watch Nike
Apple Watch Hermès
Compare Watch
Why Apple Watch
Shop Apple Watch
Apple Watch Studio
Apple Watch Bands
Apple Watch Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
Apple Watch Support
AppleCare+
watchOS 11
Apple Watch For Your Kids
Apps by Apple
Apple Fitness+
Vision
Explore Apple Vision Pro
Guided Tour
Tech Specs
Shop Apple Vision Pro
Apple Vision Pro Accessories
Book a Demo
Financing
Apple Vision Pro Support
AppleCare+
visionOS 2
AirPods
Explore All AirPods
AirPods 4
AirPods Pro 2
AirPods Max
Compare AirPods
Shop AirPods
AirPods Accessories
AirPods Support
AppleCare+ for Headphones
Hearing Health
Apple Music
TV & Home
Explore TV & Home
Apple TV 4K
HomePod
HomePod mini
Shop Apple TV 4K
Shop HomePod
Shop HomePod mini
Shop Siri Remote
TV & Home Accessories
Apple TV Support
HomePod Support
AppleCare+
Apple TV app
Apple TV+
Home app
Apple Music
Siri
AirPlay
Entertainment
Explore Entertainment
Apple One
Apple TV+
Apple Music
Apple Arcade
Apple Fitness+
Apple News+
Apple Podcasts
Apple Books
App Store
Apple TV+ Support
Apple Music Support
Accessories
Shop All Accessories
Mac
iPad
iPhone
Apple Watch
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
TV & Home
Made by Apple
Beats by Dr. Dre
AirTag
Support
iPhone
Mac
iPad
Watch
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
Music
TV
Explore Support
Community
Check Coverage
Repair
Get AppleCare+
Apple Account and Password
Billing & Subscriptions
Accessibility
Find a Store
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
Apple Intelligence
Apple Trade In
0
+
Privacy
Local Nav Open Menu
Local Nav Close Menu
Overview
Features
Control
Labels
Transparency Report
Privacy Policy
English
Choose your preferred language
At Apple, we believe strongly in fundamental privacy rights — and that those fundamental rights should not differ depending on where you live in the world.
That’s why we treat any data that relates to an identified or identifiable individual or that is linked or linkable to them by Apple as “personal data,” no matter where the individual lives.
This means that data that directly identifies you — such as your name — is personal data, and also data that does not directly identify you, but that can reasonably be used to identify you — such as the serial number of your device — is personal data. Aggregated data is considered non‑personal data for the purposes of this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy covers how
Apple or an Apple-affiliated company
(collectively, “Apple”) handles personal data whether you interact with us on our websites, through Apple apps (such as Apple Music or Wallet), or in person (including by phone or when visiting an Apple Store). Apple may also link to third parties on our services or make third-party apps available for download in our App Store. Apple’s Privacy Policy does not apply to how third parties define personal data or how they use it. We encourage you to read their privacy policies and know your privacy rights before interacting with them.
At Apple, we respect your ability to know, access, correct, transfer, restrict the processing of, and delete your personal data. We have provided these rights to our global customer base and if you choose to exercise these privacy rights, you have the right not to be treated in a discriminatory way nor to receive a lesser degree of service from Apple. Where you are requested to consent to the processing of your personal data by Apple, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
To exercise your privacy rights and choices, including where a third-party service provider is acting on Apple’s behalf, visit the Apple Data and Privacy page at
privacy.apple.com
for Apple or
shazam.com/privacy
for Shazam.
To help protect the security of your personal data, you must sign in to your account and your identity will be verified. If you want to obtain a copy of personal data that is not currently available from
privacy.apple.com
, you can make a request at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
. You also have the right to lodge a complaint with the applicable regulator.
There may be situations where we cannot grant your request — for example, if you ask us to delete your transaction data and Apple is legally obligated to keep a record of that transaction to comply with law. We may also decline to grant a request where doing so would undermine our legitimate use of data for anti-fraud and security purposes, such as when you request deletion of an account that is being investigated for security concerns. Other reasons your privacy request may be denied are if it jeopardizes the privacy of others, is frivolous or vexatious, or would be extremely impractical or unreasonable.
If you live in California and you cannot access Apple’s Data and Privacy page,
you or your authorized agent can make a request at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
or by calling 1-800-275-2273.
For more information on exercising your rights, visit
support.apple.com/102283
.
At Apple, we believe that you can have great products and great privacy. This means that we strive to
collect only the personal data that we need
. The personal data Apple collects depends on how you interact with Apple. Descriptions of how Apple handles personal data for certain individual services are available at
apple.com/legal/privacy/data
.
When you create an Apple Account, apply for commercial credit, purchase and/or activate a product or device, download a software update, register for a class at an Apple Store, connect to our services, contact us (including by social media), participate in an online survey, or otherwise interact with Apple, we may collect a variety of information, including:
Account Information.
Your Apple Account and related account details, including email address, devices registered, account status, and age
Device Information.
Data from which your device could be identified, such as device serial number, or about your device, such as browser type
Contact Information
. Data such as name, email address, physical address, phone number, or other contact information
Payment Information. Data about your billing address and method of payment, such as bank details, credit, debit, or other payment card information
Transaction Information.
Data about purchases of Apple products and services or transactions facilitated by Apple, including purchases on Apple platforms
Fraud Prevention Information.
Data used to help identify and prevent fraud, including a device trust score
Usage Data.
Data about your activity on and use of our offerings, such as app launches within our services, including browsing history; search history; product interaction; crash data, performance and other diagnostic data; and other usage data
Location Information
. Precise location only to support services such as Find My or where you agree for region-specific services, and coarse location
Health Information.
Data relating to the health status of an individual, including data related to one’s physical or mental health or condition. Personal health data also includes data that can be used to make inferences about or detect the health status of an individual. If you participate in a study using an Apple Health Research Study app, the policy governing the privacy of your personal data is described in the
Apple Health Study Apps Privacy Policy
.
Fitness Information.
Details relating to your fitness and exercise information where you choose to share them
Financial Information.
Details including salary, income, and assets information where collected, and information related to Apple-branded financial offerings
Government ID Data.
In certain jurisdictions, we may ask for a government-issued ID in limited circumstances, including when setting up a wireless account and activating your device, for the purpose of extending commercial credit, managing reservations, or as required by law
Other Information You Provide to Us.
Details such as the content of your communications with Apple, including interactions with customer support and contacts through social media channels
You are not required to provide the personal data that we have requested. However, if you choose not to do so, in many cases we will not be able to provide you with our products or services or respond to requests you may have.
Apple may receive personal data about you from other
individuals
, from businesses or third parties acting
at your direction
, from our
partners
who work with us to provide our products and services and assist us in security and fraud prevention, and from other
lawful sources.
Individuals.
Apple may collect data about you from other individuals — for example, if that individual has sent you a product or gift card, invited you to participate in an Apple service or forum, or shared content with you.
At Your Direction.
You may direct other individuals or third parties to share data with Apple. For example, you may direct your mobile carrier to share data about your carrier account with Apple for account activation, or for your loyalty program to share information about your participation so that you can earn rewards for Apple purchases.
Apple Partners.
We may also validate the information you provide — for example, when creating an Apple Account, with a third party for security, and for fraud-prevention purposes.
To power features such as search and as a source for our foundational AI models, Apple uses Applebot, a web crawler, to crawl information that is publicly available on the internet. We have measures in place to reduce the amount of personal data we collect and make no attempt to connect data crawled to any individual Apple user, or to build profiles about individuals. Your private personal data is not used to train our foundational AI models. To exercise your right as an individual to opt out of processing, visit the
Apple Intelligence Privacy Inquiries form
. For more information about Applebot, visit
support.apple.com/120320
.
For research and development purposes, we may use datasets such as those that contain images, voices, or other data that could be associated with an identifiable person. When acquiring such datasets, we do so in accordance with applicable law, including law in the jurisdiction in which the dataset is hosted. When using such datasets for research and development, we do not attempt to reidentify individuals who may appear therein.
Apple uses personal data to power our services, to process your transactions, to communicate with you, for security and fraud prevention, and to comply with law. We may also use personal data for other purposes with your consent.
Apple uses your personal data only when we have a valid legal basis to do so.
Depending on the circumstance, Apple may rely on your consent or the fact that the processing is necessary to fulfill a contract with you, protect your vital interests or those of other persons, or to comply with law. We may also process your personal data where we believe it is in our or others’ legitimate interests, taking into consideration your interests, rights, and expectations. More information is available in the product-specific information embedded in our products and features as described above. If you have questions about the legal basis, you can contact the Data Protection Officer at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
.
Power Our Services.
Apple collects personal data necessary to power our services, which may include personal data collected to improve our offerings, for internal purposes such as auditing or data analysis, or for troubleshooting. For example, if you would like to access a song through an Apple Music subscription, we collect data on what songs you play in order to provide you with the content requested and for royalty purposes.
Process Your Transactions.
To process transactions, Apple must collect data such as your name, purchase, and payment information.
Communicate with You.
To respond to communications, reach out to you about your transactions or account, market our products and services, provide other relevant information, or request information or feedback. From time to time, we may use your personal data to send important notices, such as communications about purchases and changes to our terms, conditions, and policies. Because this information is important to your interaction with Apple, you may not opt out of receiving these important notices.
Security and Fraud Prevention.
To protect individuals, employees, and Apple and for loss prevention and to prevent fraud, including to protect individuals, employees, and Apple for the benefit of all our users, and prescreening or scanning uploaded content for potentially illegal content, including child sexual exploitation material.
Personal Data Used for Personalization.
If you choose to personalize your services or communications where such options are available, Apple will use information that we collect so that we can offer you those personalized services or communications. You can learn more about how relevant services use information to personalize your experience by reviewing the privacy information presented when you first use a service that asks to use your personal data. We make this information easy to find by presenting it with our Data & Privacy icon; it’s also available at all times on your Apple device and online at
apple.com/legal/privacy/data
.
Comply with Law.
To comply with applicable law — for example, to satisfy tax or reporting obligations, or to comply with a lawful governmental request.
Apple does not use algorithms or profiling to make any decision that would significantly affect you without the opportunity for human review. Apple also does not use or disclose sensitive personal data for any purposes that would require a user to exercise a right to limit processing according to California law.
Apple retains personal data only for so long as necessary to fulfill the purposes for which it was collected, including as described in this Privacy Policy or in our service-specific privacy notices, or as required by law. We will retain your personal data for the period necessary to fulfill the purposes outlined in this Privacy Policy and our service-specific privacy notices. When assessing retention periods, we first carefully examine whether it is necessary to retain the personal data collected and, if retention is required, work to retain the personal data for the shortest possible period permissible under law.
Apple may share personal data with
Apple-affiliated companies
,
service providers
who act on our behalf, our
partners
,
developers, and publishers
, or others
at your direction
. Further, Apple does not share personal data with third parties for their own marketing purposes.
Service Providers.
Apple may engage third parties to act as our service providers and perform certain tasks on our behalf, such as processing or storing data, including personal data, in connection with your use of our services and delivering products to customers. Apple service providers are obligated to handle personal data consistent with this Privacy Policy and according to our instructions. They cannot use the personal data we share for their own purposes and must delete or return the personal data once they’ve fulfilled our request.
Partners.
At times, Apple may partner with third parties to provide services or other offerings. For example, Apple financial offerings like Apple Card and Apple Cash are offered by Apple and our partners. Apple requires its partners to protect your personal data.
Developers and Publishers from Whom You Get a Subscription.
If you purchase a third-party subscription from the App Store or within Apple News, we create a Subscriber ID that is unique to you and the developer or publisher. The Subscriber ID may be used to provide reports to the developer or publisher, which include information about the subscription you purchased and your country of residence. If you cancel all of your subscriptions from a particular developer or publisher, the Subscriber ID will reset after 180 days if you do not resubscribe. This information is provided to developers or publishers so that they can understand the performance of their subscriptions.
Others.
Apple may share personal data with others at your direction or with your consent, such as when we share information with your carrier to activate your account. We may also disclose information about you if we determine that for purposes of national security, law enforcement, or other issues of public importance, disclosure is necessary or appropriate. We may also disclose information about you where there is a lawful basis for doing so, if we determine that disclosure is reasonably necessary to enforce our terms and conditions or to protect our operations or users, or in the event of a reorganization, merger, or sale.
Apple does not sell your personal data including as “sale” is defined in Nevada and California. Apple also does not “share” your personal data as that term is defined in California.
At Apple, we believe that great privacy rests on great security. We use
administrative, technical, and physical safeguards
to protect your personal data, taking into account the nature of the personal data and the processing, and the threats posed. We are constantly working to improve on these safeguards to help keep your personal data secure. For more information, visit our
Apple Platform Security
guide.
Apple understands the importance of safeguarding the personal data of children, which we consider to be an
individual under the age of 13 or the equivalent age as specified by law in your jurisdiction
. That is why Apple has implemented additional processes and protections to help keep children’s personal data safe.
To access certain Apple services, a child must have a child Apple Account. A child Apple Account may be created by the
parent
or, in the case of a Managed Apple Account, by the
child’s educational institution
.
Parents.
To create a child account, parents must review the
Family Privacy Disclosure for Children
, which describes how Apple handles children’s personal data. If they agree, the parent must provide Apple with a verifiable parental consent.
Educational Institutions.
Educational institutions that participate in the Apple School Manager Program may also create Apple IDs for students, called “Managed Apple IDs.” These schools are required to agree to the
Managed Apple IDs for Students Disclosure
which is included as Exhibit A to the Apple School Manager Agreement.
If we learn that a child’s personal data was collected without appropriate authorization, it will be deleted as soon as possible.
To exercise privacy rights for your child’s information, visit the Apple Data and Privacy page at
privacy.apple.com
and sign in to their account.
Apple’s websites, online services, interactive applications, and advertisements may use
“cookies” and other technologies
such as web beacons.
These technologies help us to better understand user behavior including for security and fraud prevention purposes, tell us which parts of our websites people have visited, and facilitate and measure the effectiveness of advertisements and web searches.
Communications Cookies.
These cookies are used to enable network traffic to and from Apple’s systems, including by helping us detect any errors.
Strictly Necessary Cookies.
These cookies are set as required to provide a specific feature or service that you have accessed or requested. For example, they allow us to display our websites in the proper format and language, to authenticate and verify your transactions, and to preserve the contents of your Bag when shopping online at
apple.com
.
Other Cookies.
These cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with our websites and online services, including by helping us to assess the effectiveness of advertisements and web searches. Apple also uses these cookies to remember choices you make while browsing, so we can provide you with a customized experience.
If you prefer that Apple not use cookies, we provide you with the means to disable their use. If you want to disable cookies and you’re using the Safari web browser, choose “Block all cookies” in Safari’s privacy settings. If you are using a different browser, check with your provider to find out how to disable cookies. Certain features of the Apple website may not be available if all cookies are disabled.
In addition to cookies, Apple uses other technologies that help us achieve similar objectives.
In some email messages Apple sends to you, we provide a “click-through URL” that links you to content on the Apple website. When you click one of these URLs, they pass through a separate server before arriving at the destination page on our website. We track this click-through to help us determine interest in particular topics and measure whether we are communicating with you effectively. If you prefer not to be tracked in this way, you should not click graphic or text links in email messages.
Apple generally treats data we collect using these cookies and similar technologies as non-personal data.
However, to the extent that Internet Protocol (IP) addresses or similar identifiers are considered personal data by local law, we also treat these identifiers as personal data in those regions. In addition, Apple sometimes combines non-personal data collected from these technologies with other personal data Apple holds. When we combine data in this way, we treat the combined data as personal data for purposes of this Privacy Policy.
Ads that are delivered by Apple’s advertising platform may appear on the App Store, Apple News, Stocks, and Apple TV app depending on your location. Apple’s advertising platform does not track you, meaning that it does not link user or device data collected from our apps with user or device data collected from third parties for targeted advertising or advertising measurement purposes, and does not share user or device data with data brokers.
If you do not want to receive ads targeted to your interests from Apple's advertising platform in those apps, you can choose to disable Personalized Ads, which will opt your Apple Account out of receiving such ads regardless of what device you are using. On your iOS, iPadOS, or visionOS device, you can disable Personalized Ads by going to Settings > Privacy & Security > Apple Advertising and tapping to turn off Personalized Ads. On your Mac, you can disable Personalized Ads by going to System Settings > Privacy & Security > Privacy > Advertising, then deselecting Personalized Ads. You may still see ads in the App Store, Apple News, or Stocks based on context like your search query or the channel you are reading. If you disable Allow Apps to Request to Track, third-party apps cannot request to use the Advertising Identifier, a non-personal identifier served by the operating system on your device, to track you across apps and websites owned by other companies.
For more information about Apple-delivered advertising and privacy, visit
apple.com/legal/privacy/data/ww/apple-advertising
.
Apple products and offerings connect you to the world. To make that possible,
your personal data may be transferred to or accessed by entities around the world,
including Apple-affiliated companies, to perform processing activities such as those described in this Privacy Policy in connection with your use of our products and services. Apple complies with laws on the transfer of personal data between countries to help ensure your data is protected, wherever it may be.
The Apple entity that controls your personal data may differ depending on where you live.
For example, Apple Store information is controlled by individual retail entities in each country and Apple Media Services-related personal data may be controlled by various Apple entities as reflected in the terms of service. If you do not reside in the U.S., your personal data may be processed by Apple Inc. and other Apple-affiliated companies on behalf of the Apple entity controlling personal data for your jurisdiction. For example, Imagery and associated data collected by Apple around the world to improve Apple Maps and to support our Look Around feature is transferred to Apple Inc. in California.
Personal data relating to individuals in the European Economic Area, the United Kingdom, and Switzerland is controlled by Apple Distribution International Limited in Ireland. Apple’s international transfer of personal data collected in the European Economic Area, the United Kingdom, and Switzerland is governed by
Standard Contractual Clauses
. If you have questions or would like a copy of Apple’s Standard Contractual Clauses, you can contact us at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
.
Personal data collected by
Apple or an Apple-affiliated company
worldwide is generally stored by Apple Inc. in the United States. Regardless of where your personal data is stored, Apple maintains the same high level of protection and safeguarding measures.
Apple’s privacy practices, as described in this Privacy Policy, comply with the Global Cross-Border Privacy Rules (CBPRs) System and the Global Privacy Recognition for Processors (PRP) System. For more information about the Global CBPR and PRP Systems, visit
Global CBPR Forum
. To view our certifications, visit
CBPR System Compliance Directory
. For more information about the scope of our participation, or to submit a privacy inquiry through
BBB National Programs
, our Accountability Agent, visit:
Cross-Border Privacy Rules Program
Privacy Recognition for Processors Program
Personal data relating to individuals in the People’s Republic of China may be processed by Apple in countries outside of the People’s Republic of China, such as Apple Inc. in the United States or Apple Distribution International Limited in the Republic of Ireland. Where this occurs, it will be done in compliance with local laws, including the Personal Information Protection Law. For the purposes of processing set out in this Privacy Policy, Apple may also transfer such personal data to third-party service providers, who may in turn store or transfer the data outside of the People’s Republic of China. For more information, visit
China Mainland Privacy Disclosures
.
To make sure your personal data is secure, we communicate our privacy and security guidelines to Apple employees and strictly enforce privacy safeguards within the company.
If you have questions about Apple’s Privacy Policy or privacy practices including where a third-party service provider is acting on our behalf, or you would like to contact our Data Protection Officer, you can contact us at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
or call the
Apple Support number
for your country or region.
You can also ask us questions about how to submit a privacy complaint and we will endeavor to help.
Apple takes your privacy questions seriously. A dedicated team reviews your inquiry to determine how best to respond to your question or concern, including those inquiries received in response to an access or download request. In most cases, all substantive contacts receive a response within seven days. In other cases, we may require additional information or let you know that we need more time to respond.
Where your complaint indicates an improvement could be made in our handling of privacy issues, we will take steps to make such an update at the next reasonable opportunity. In the event that a privacy issue has resulted in a negative impact on you or another person, we will take steps to address that with you or that other person.
You may at any time — including if you are not satisfied with Apple’s response — refer your complaint to the applicable regulator. If you ask us, we will endeavor to provide you with information about relevant complaint avenues which may be applicable to your circumstances.
When there is a material change to this Privacy Policy, we’ll post a notice on this website at least a week in advance of doing so and contact you directly about the change if we have your data on file.
View our CBPR certification
View our PRP certification
Sub-policy 3
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/policy/?entry_point=data_policy_redirect&entry=0:
Facebook
Email or phone
Password
Forgot account?
Create new account
It looks like you were misusing this feature by going too fast. You’ve been temporarily blocked from using it.
Back
English (US)
Gaeilge
Polski
Lietuvių
Português (Brasil)
Русский
Română
Español
Français (France)
Deutsch
Italiano
Meta © 2025
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to help provide and improve content on
Meta Products
. We also use them to provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and to provide and improve Meta Products for people who have an account.
Essential cookies: These cookies are required to use Meta Products and are necessary for our sites to work as intended.
Cookies from other companies: We use these cookies to show you ads off of Meta Products and to provide features like maps and videos on Meta Products. These cookies are optional.
You have control over the optional cookies we use. Learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choices at any time in our
Cookies Policy
.
About cookies
What are cookies?
Learn more
Why do we use cookies?
Learn more
What are Meta Products?
Learn more
Your cookie choices
Learn more
Cookies from other companies
We use cookies from
other companies
in order to show you ads off of our Products, and provide features like maps, payment services and video.
Choose cookies by category
How we use these cookies
If you allow these cookies
If you don't allow these cookies
Other ways you can control your information
Manage your ad experience in Accounts Center
More information about online advertising
Controlling cookies with browser settings
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Sub-policy 4
https://www.appsflyer.com/legal/privacy-policy/:
Platform
Measure
Measurement suite
Measure every action on mobile, web and CTV
ROI measurement
Understand your true mobile marketing ROI
Creative Optimization
Unlock creative performance with the power of AI
Analyze
Marketing analytics
Turn insights on campaign performance into action
Incrementality
Prove the real value of your marketing campaigns
Engage
CX & deep linking
Boost revenue with exceptional customer experience
Audience segmentation
Create meaningful conversations with your customers
Protect
Fraud protection
Protect your marketing budget from mobile ad fraud
Collaborate
Privacy Cloud
Collaborate with your partners in a privacy-centric way
AppsFlyer Data Collaboration Platform
First-party data monetization that fuels retail media growth
Partner marketplace
Connect to over 10,000 tech and media partners
Interactive product tours
iOS 14+ solutions
Data feeds & APIs
Solutions
Team
Marketing
Product
Data & Analytics
R&D
Goal
Regain iOS visibility
Kickstart app growth
Scale user acquisition
Increase engagement & LTV
Maximize ROAS
Industry
Gaming
Shopping
Finance
Food & drink
Health & fitness
Travel
Platform
iOS
Android
PC & console
CTV & OTT
Web
Mobile
Web3
Partnerships
Tech and media partners
Agency partners
Partner Program
Interactive product tours
Customer stories
The AppsFlyer difference
Learn
Resources
Stay informed with industry insights, the latest trends, original content, and all things AppsFlyer
Ecosystem
Blog
Reports & guides
Events & webinars
Tools & templates
Industry benchmarks
Videos
Podcasts
Glossary
Metrics comparison
Customers
Customer stories
Product news
Use cases
Help center
Developer Hub
AppsFlyer Learning
Come to MAMA
Company
Who we are
Find out more about our history, our team, what we stand for, and why we do what we do
About us
Newsroom
CEO blog spot
Trust hub
Careers
Social impact
Contact
From our CEO
The future of our ecosystem and web
On privacy and user experience
Aggregated advanced privacy
Pricing
Login
Sign up free
Contact sales
Legal hub
MSA
Site Terms
Website Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
DPA
Opt Out
Processing Customer Data
Supplier Portal
Subprocessors
Modern Slavery Statement
Documentation
MSA
Site Terms
Website Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
DPA
Opt Out
Processing Customer Data
Supplier Portal
Subprocessors
Modern Slavery Statement
Website Privacy Policy
Last updated May 28, 2024
This Privacy Policy applies to: (i) use of the AppsFlyer owned and operated Websites (appsflyer.com, onelink.me and their subdomains); (ii) our marketing activities including, registrations as part of webinars, conference events, emails etc.; and (iii) any other product or activity that links to, or otherwise references, this privacy policy (collectively, the “Marketing Platforms“). We respect your privacy rights and value your trust. This Privacy Policy describes how we collect, receive, use, store, share, transfer, and process your personal information, as well as your rights in determining what we do with the information that we collect or hold about you.
This Privacy Policy does not apply to information collected through use by customers of the AppsFlyer service, which is described under our
Services Privacy Policy
.
Information We Collect
When using or interacting with our Marketing Platforms, we may collect or receive the following types of information (collectively, “Information”).
“Personal Information” such as name, email, contact details or any other personal content that you provide to us whether through a form or field on our website or any other communication (e.g. email, phone, post etc.).
“Technical Information” such as browser type, operating system, device type, IP address and other similar technical information typically received from a browser or device automatically when visiting or interacting with our Marketing Platforms. This may include the referring URL that led you to our website.
“Usage Information” such as the pages you visited on our website, where you clicked, searches performed on our website and other similar information related to how you have used our website. It may also include information related to whether you receive, opened or clicked on any links in an email sent to you.
We understand that certain Technical information or Usage Information may, either alone or when combined with other data, be deemed personal data under various laws and jurisdictions and we are committed to treating such data in compliance with applicable laws.
The Methods We Use to Collect and Receive Information
Depending on the type of Information, we may collect or receive Information in the following ways:
When you voluntarily share Information with us. For example, when you register to one of our events, request that we contact you through our online forms, submit your CV, or when you request to receive certain content that we may make available (e.g. research and white papers).
Through use of cookies and other similar technologies (e.g. HTML5 Local Storage, LSO, web beacons, JavaScript, etc.). These technologies help us to analyze how our Marketing Platforms are used and to tailor content that is relevant to you. It also helps us to deliver more relevant advertisements to you on our own or third party sites. For more information on such technologies, including how to manage your cookie preferences please see our
Cookie Policy
.
Information obtained from third party sources. This includes Information received through the various business support tools and services that we use (e.g. marketing platforms, analytics services etc.) and public sources such as social media sites. We may combine the Information received through these sources with other Information we have in order to ensure our records are up to date and so that we are able to provide you with relevant content.
You have choices in how we collect and use Information. See the “
Your Choices
” section below for more information.
The Purposes
We use Information for the following purposes:
To process your inquiries and to respond to your requests. For example, when you contact us to learn more about our products or services or when you request to receive certain materials from us (e.g. white papers, research papers, product and services information). Additionally, if you submit your CV to us, we use it to evaluate your candidacy (including by assessing your qualifications and skills).
To send you information related to our services and products that we believe may interest you, such as newsletters or product and service updates. Such communications will be sent to you when you have chosen to receive such communication or when we have a legitimate interest to market our products and services. In any event, you will always be able to opt-out of receiving such communications. Opting out may be done either directly in the communication received or through the ways described in the instructions in the “
Your Choices
” section below.
To understand how you have used our Marketing Platforms and to customize them in accordance with your interests and past actions and choices. We do this based on our legitimate interest to operate our Marketing Platforms, diagnose any problems with the Marketing Platforms and to improve the Marketing Platforms and your experience when navigating through them.
In our legitimate interest to prevent fraud or harm to us or to any third party, and ensure the security of our network and services.
Where it is necessary for AppsFlyer to comply with its legal obligations and to exercise and enforce its legal rights.
We may use certain third-party marketing and advertising networks to help us market our products on our own website and on third party websites (e.g. remarketing ads across the Internet by Google).
Who We Share Information With
In order to conduct our business and operate our Marketing Platforms, we may share Information with various third parties, such as:
Our subsidiary companies and global branches.
Third parties that help us operate our Marketing Platforms (e.g. hosting company, recruitment platforms and agencies, payment processors, business management and email distribution service providers and other similar service providers). These companies are authorized to use your personal information only as necessary to provide these services to us.
When required by law, such as to comply with court orders, search warrants, regulatory orders, subpoenas, and other lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements;
Legal authorities, consultants, advisors or service providers when required to investigate, respond to, or prevent, fraud; or when required to ensure the security of our network and services and protect the safety of AppsFlyer or the public.
As part of any merger or acquisition of AppsFlyer, Information may be transferred to the merging or acquiring company, as well as to any advisors representing a party during discussions of such merger or acquisition.
AppsFlyer resellers, agents, partners or service providers acting on our behalf in connection with the offering of AppsFlyer’s products or services.
Third-party marketing and advertising networks to help us market our products on our own website and on third party websites (e.g. remarketing ads across the Internet by Google).
Without derogating from the foregoing, AppsFlyer may publish general aggregate and unidentifiable information (e.g. statistical information) relating to use of its Marketing Platforms.
Cross Border Data Transfers and Mechanisms
We may need to transfer Information to countries where we and/or our service providers operate. Such countries may be different from the country in which the data originated and where data protection laws may not be equivalent to, or offer the same protection as, those in your country. By using our Marketing Platforms, you agree to any such transfers. In any event, where appropriate given the nature of services, we will put in place agreements with our service providers to ensure a level of privacy consistent with the terms of this policy.
With regards to the collection, use, and retention of personal information transferred from the European Economic Area to the United States, please be assured that AppsFlyer continues to comply with all applicable laws in respect of such transfers and any data transfers to the United States will be governed by the Standard Contractual Clauses as set forth in our DPA with the relevant service provider.
AppsFlyer Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. AppsFlyer Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, as well as to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the DPF Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view AppsFlyer’s certification, please visit
Data Privacy Framework website
.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over AppsFlyer Inc.’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, and in case of onward transfer of data to third parties, AppsFlyer maintains liability.
In compliance with the DPF Principles, AppsFlyer is committed to resolving any complaints arising regarding our processing of your personal data. You may direct your queries to privacy@appsflyer.com and, in compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, we are committed to referring unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the DPF to Truste, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
https://trustarc.com/dispute-resolution/
for more information or to file a complaint. The services of Truste are provided at no cost to you and allow for binding arbitration.
Protecting Your Information
We strive to meet the highest standards of security measures across our business units. We have implemented appropriate technical and organizational measures based on industry-leading standards. Such measures are designed to protect against unauthorized access or unlawful processing of Personal Information and against accidental loss, destruction or damage of Personal Information. As part of such measures, we have established various policies and procedures that guide us, including in respect of asset management, access management, physical security, people security, product security, cloud and network infrastructure security, third-party security, vulnerability management, security monitoring, and incident response.
Information Storage and Retention
We may store Information on our own servers as well as those operated by third party data hosting providers. As specified in Section 5 above (Cross Border Transfers), such servers may be located worldwide. We will only retain your Personal Information for as long as necessary to pursue the purpose of the collection. We may also retain your Personal Information for such time needed to pursue our legitimate business interests, in connection with any legal claims and compliance with legal obligations. When we use your information for direct marketing purposes, we will retain your data until you opt-out from receiving the marketing materials; provided that we will need to retain certain information to maintain a record of your request.
Modifications to This Policy
AppsFlyer may amend this Privacy Policy at any time, provided that in the event of a material change we shall provide notice on this page and/or a note near the link to this page. The updates shall apply immediately for new Information collected or provided as of the day of the update and following thirty (30) days for any Information collected or provided to AppsFlyer prior to the update date. If you do not agree to the terms of the new policy you are requested to contact the Legal Department using the contact details listed in Section 11 below. We encourage you to periodically review this page for any updates.
Your Choices
We provide you with various choices on how we may use Information in connection with: (i) our marketing activities; and (ii) our use of cookies and similar technologies to serve your interest-based advertisements and to analyze usage of our Marketing Platforms.
You may choose to stop receiving our newsletter or marketing emails by following the unsubscribe instructions included in these emails, accessing the email preferences in your account settings page, or you can contact us at
https://www.appsflyer.com/company/contact/
. You can manage your preferences related to our use of cookies and similar technologies that we use, among other things, to provide you with targeted interest-based advertisements and to analyze your use of our Marketing Platforms – please see our
Cookie Policy
for instructions. Additionally, certain advertisers (including Google) we work with may be members of NAI and/or the Digital Advertising Alliance. You may opt-out from such advertisers’ services here or at the following link:
https://youradchoices.com/
In addition, the laws of some jurisdictions may provide you with various rights in connection with our processing of certain Information. Such rights may include:
The right to withdraw any previously provided consent;
The right to access certain information about you that we process;
The right to have us correct or update any Personal Information;
The right to have certain Information erased;
The right to have us temporarily block our processing of certain Information;
The right to have Information exported into common machine-readable format;
The right to object to our processing of Information in cases of direct marketing, or when we rely on legitimate interests as our lawful basis to process your information; and
The right to lodge a complaint with the appropriate data protection authority.
We will respond to your requests within a reasonable timeframe. Please note these rights may be limited in certain circumstances as provided by applicable law. For any additional information regarding such rights or to exercise any such rights please contact AppsFlyer at: privacy@appsflyer.com
If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
Social Media and Third Party Services
Our website may offer a blog with ‘comments’ section and various social media features, such as a ‘share’ button or links to third party websites and services, including Twitter, LinkedIn, Google+ and Facebook. When using any such features, certain information may be collected by such third parties, including your IP address or which page you are visiting on our website, and such third parties may set a cookie to enable the feature to function properly. Any data collected by such third parties is governed by such third party’s privacy policy. You are encouraged to carefully review such third party privacy policies.
Children’s Privacy
AppsFlyer does not knowingly collect or process personal data from or with respect to children under the age of 16, and you must be 16 years of age or older in order to establish an account for AppsFlyer’s Services. If you are a parent or legal guardian and believe that your child under the age of 16 has submitted his or her personal data or other data without your consent, permission, or authorization – please let us know immediately, and we will promptly act to remove your child’s data from our database, cease the use of such data and inform any other party we suspect to have access to such data to do the same.
California Privacy Rights
We may collect personal information about California residents who are afforded additional rights under the California Consumer Privacy Act, Cal. Civ. Code §§ 1798.100 et seq. (the “CCPA“). If you are a California resident, you can see more details about the types of personal information we have collected from you in the past 12 months and may collect from you in Section 1 above (
Information We Collect
) and how we collect such personal information in Section 2 above (
The Methods We Use to Collect and Receive Information
). The purposes for which we collect your personal information are further described in Section 3 above (
The Purpose
). We do not share your personal information with any third party except as further described in Section 4 above (
Who We Share Information With
). Please refer to the other terms of this Privacy Policy to see further rights afforded to you and how we use your personal information.
We do not “Sell” (as defined in the CCPA) your personal information which we have collected or may collect and in the event we will Sell your personal information, we will notify you by updating this Privacy Policy in accordance with Section 8 above (
Modifications to this Policy
) and we will provide you with the option of opting out of such “sale”.
You, as a California resident, have certain rights regarding your personal information pursuant to the CCPA, subject to certain restrictions under applicable laws, including the rights to access your personal information, to delete your personal information, and to opt out of the “sale” of your personal data. You may request any of these by contacting us via email at
privacy@appsflyer.com
or by physical mail to: AppsFlyer Ltd. (Attn: Legal Dept.) 14 Maskit St., Herzliya, Israel. Upon your request, we will verify that you are the person making this request and in order to do so, we may request identification documents from you.
Contacting Us
If you have any questions or concerns about this Website Privacy Policy, the information we collect, the practices of AppsFlyer, or your dealings with the Marketing Platforms, please contact us or our Data Protection Officer by sending an email to:
privacy@appsflyer.com
or by physical mail to: AppsFlyer Ltd. (Attn: Legal Dept.) 14 Maskit St., Herzliya, Israel. For the purposes of Article 27 of the General Data Protection Regulation, the representative within the EU of AppsFlyer is AppsFlyer Germany Schönhauser Allee 180, 10119 Berlin, Germany (contact
privacy@appsflyer.com
; +49 30 166373500).
Our Cookies Policy
AppsFlyer respects your privacy as our website user. We use cookies to improve your user experience and for remarketing. Some of this data may be shared with select partners. See our
cookies policy
for more information.
Reject all cookies
Accept all cookies
Customize
Cookie Preference Center
AppsFlyer uses Cookies to provide, maintain, and improve our websites, to optimize our offerings and marketing activities, and to provide our visitors and users with a better experience, for example, in order to maintain your preferences, to better secure our websites, to identify technical issues, and to monitor and improve the overall performance of our websites.
More information
Allow All
Please select which Cookies you approve, you may choose all options.
Always Active
Necessary Cookies are enabled for the assurance and function of a properly run website, and they cannot be disabled. They are usually only set in response to actions permitted by you, such as, enabling functions like navigation and access to secure areas of the website. These Cookies do not store personal information that will be used for other purposes.
Performance Cookies
These Cookies provide us with aggregated (anonymous) insights into website enhancement and performance improvement. These cookies allow us to measure and improve the performance of our Sites. They help us know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the website.
Marketing Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Functional Cookies
These Cookies enable us to provide enhanced functionality and personalization through our Sites and allow for a better user experience. These may be set by us (first-party Cookies) or by third-party providers who work with us (third-party Cookies).
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 5
https://www.adyen.com/privacy-policy:
Transaction
Compliance obligations
Embedded financial products
Security
Marketing
Website
Other
Privacy Statement
Please read this privacy statement if you would like to know more about the way Adyen and its
group companies around the world
(hereinafter referred to as “Adyen” or “we”) collect and process your personal data. This privacy statement applies to the processing activities in which Adyen acts as a data controller.
It is important to us that your personal data is handled carefully, and that you are well informed about the way we process your personal data. This privacy statement tells you what data we process – including how, why and how long we process it for – and informs you of your data privacy rights.
Adyen reserves the right to update its privacy statement at any time. Such updates will be made and posted on our publicly available website
https://www.adyen.com/privacy-policy
.
Version as of June 4, 2024.
Download as PDF
Hi there,
We have updated our Privacy Statement as of the June 4, 2024. To read the previous (March 2023) version, please click
here
.
General information
Adyen is a financial technology company operating under a banking license. This means that Adyen provides its customers with payments and other financial products, including payments processing for its customers and platforms via credit card, bank transfer, and other payment methods, card issuing, (merchant) bank accounts, fraud detection, and other financial services. It is also important to note that Adyen N.V. is supervised by the Dutch Central Bank as a regulated bank under Dutch law. In addition, Adyen and its group companies are supervised by various regulators and authorities, as applicable, around the globe.
You may have seen Adyen on your bank statements if you have bought something, automatically renewed a subscription, or received a payout from one of Adyen’s customers. If you would like more information about any of these charges, you can use
Adyen’s Look Up Charge Tool
.
If you would like to exercise your
data subject rights
(outlined below) under data privacy law, please use
Adyen’s Privacy Form
.
You may have the following rights regarding your personal data, subject to to certain exceptions:
Right to access
: You may have the right to ask us for the specific personal data that we have collected from you in a portable and (where technically possible) usable format.
Right to know
: You may have the right to verify that we have collected personal data about you, as well as know what personal data we have collected about you. This includes, as applicable, the categories of personal data we have collected, the sources from which we collected that personal data, the business or commercial purposes for which we collected, “sold”, and “shared” that personal data, the categories of personal data that we “sold”, “shared”, or disclosed to third parties for business purposes and the categories of third parties to whom we “sold”, “shared”, or disclosed personal data. You can also contact us if you want to know more about the data we process for our legitimate interests.
Right to deletion
: You may be entitled to request that we delete the personal data that we have collected from you. We will use all commercially reasonable efforts to honor your request, in compliance with applicable laws. Please note, however, that we may need or be required to keep such information, such as for our legitimate business purposes, or to comply with applicable laws.
Right to opt-out of sales and sharing of personal data to third parties for cross-context behavioral advertising:
You are entitled to opt-out of sales of your personal data to third parties and to opt-out of the sharing of your personal data to third parties for cross-context behavioral advertising, if applicable. You can opt-out of sales and sharing of your personal data by visiting our Cookies Policy and disabling the ‘Sale or Share of Personal Data’ toggle in the Cookies Preference Center,  or by contacting us using one of the methods below. If you have enabled the Global Privacy Control mechanism on your browser, device, or platform, you will automatically be opted out of any “sharing” when you use our website. Adyen seamlessly processes the Global Privacy Control (GPC) signal if enabled on your browser, device, or platform. Please visit
this page
to learn more about enabling the GPC.
Right to object to the processing of your personal data:
You are entitled to object to us processing your personal data. In addition, where you have given your consent for us to process personal data, you can withdraw this consent at any time. Please note that Adyen maintains a record of withdrawals of consent to ensure that we do not contact you in the future.
Right to opt-out of profiling:
As defined under privacy laws, Adyen may profile customers to determine their eligibility for certain financial products, or to offer them certain financial services. Please note that opting-out of profiling will mean that you are no longer eligible for these financial products or services.
Right to correct your personal data:
You may have the right to update inaccurate information that we process about you.
Right to exercise rights without discrimination
: You have the right not to receive discriminatory treatment if you exercise the rights conferred to you by applicable privacy laws.
These rights may be limited under applicable laws, and are also subject to technical feasibility. For example, if we collect your personal data in our role as a service provider to one of our customers, you will need to contact that customer directly to exercise your rights.
Please note that we may require additional information from you to verify your identity and process your request. Alternatively, you can submit a request through an authorized representative using the contact methods described below. If you use an authorized representative, we may require a copy of their signed permission to act on your behalf. We may also need to verify your identity directly and ask you to confirm the representative’s authority.
To exercise your rights, your information will be disclosed to our privacy management third-party service provider. Please be informed that Adyen has implemented the appropriate safeguards to ensure your information is adequately protected.
Some of the information you send us may be disclosed to other Adyen group companies outside of the European Economic Area ("EEA"). These countries encompass the countries in which we have operations (you can find a full list
here
).
If you are a resident in Quebec, some of the information you send us may be disclosed to Adyen group companies outside of Quebec.
To protect your data when it is transferred to countries outside of the EEA, we have implemented appropriate safeguards. When we transfer data to our Adyen group companies, the transfers are protected by an intragroup agreement containing Standard Contractual Clauses. For transfers to our services providers located outside of the EEA, we rely on Standard Contractual Clauses. If you would like to know more about these safeguards, you can contact us using the details below, under “Contact us”.
We use third parties to offer you our website, as well as our products and services. Where necessary, we will disclose your information to our service providers and professional advisers (e.g. IT providers, KYC partners, CRM providers, marketing support providers (such as agencies that manage our social media accounts), social media providers such as LinkedIn, analysts, customer service providers, business development providers and legal service providers). We have established agreements with our service providers to protect your personal data.
If our business is sold or integrated with another business, your details will be disclosed to our advisers and any prospective purchaser’s advisers, and will be passed to the new owners of the business.
We may disclose information to third parties in connection with legal claims, or when we have a legal obligation to do so. We may also disclose information with your permission (such as if we wish to disclose your details with another group company for their recruitment purposes).
The table below provides a summary of the categories of personal data that we collect and disclose to service providers and other third parties.
Name, date of birth, contact information, bank account number, tax identification number, nationality and national identification number, and job title, including biometric data. Birth certificates for parents or guardians of minors (children ages 13-17).
When you sign up for Adyen services. We are legally obliged to collect this information.
Adyen discloses this information to identity and verify providers and screening partners, including credit reference agencies, and may disclose this information to regulatory authorities upon request or for mandated reporting. Adyen may disclose this information to payment schemes, local payment providers, debt collecting agencies, and other third-party service providers, depending on the services acquired. Adyen may also make such information available to Platform customers you have signed up with.
Your name, business email, phone number, company name, and website.
When you fill out our sales form and when we  communicate with you. Adyen collects this information for marketing purposes, and for providing our products and services.
Adyen discloses this information with our customer relationship management (“CRM”) service providers so they can reach out and further build a relationship.
Name, bank account numbers and credit card numbers.
When you sign up for Adyen services. Adyen is legally obliged to collect this information, and it also helps us to provide our products and services.
Adyen discloses this information with customers for our embedded financial products, card printing partners for our  Issuing product, and with law enforcement agencies in compliance with legal orders.
Credit card details, debit card details, transaction amount, date and time of transaction.
When you purchase a good  or a service from an Adyen customer. Adyen collects this information for the purpose of providing our products and services.
Adyen discloses this information to our customers in our Customer Area, to authorities pursuant to legal orders, and to the selected payment schemes, such as Visa and Mastercard, and local payment methods upon request. Adyen may disclose this information to regulatory authorities upon request or for mandated reporting.
Cookies
When you visit Adyen’s website. Adyen collects this information for marketing purposes.
Adyen discloses this information to IT providers, CRM providers, social media providers, and advertising networks for its own advertising purposes.
Social Security number, driver’s license, or identification document, and passport.
When you sign up for Adyen services. Adyen is legally obliged to collect this information.
Adyen discloses this information to identity verification providers, including credit reference agencies, to tax authorities as legally required, and regulatory authorities upon request or for mandated reporting.
Adyen does not use or disclose this sensitive personal information for any other purpose.
Adyen does not knowingly “sell” or “share” the personal data of individuals under 16 years of age.
We reserve the right to use de-identified or aggregated data for any purpose without limitation, and we will not attempt to re-identify the information.
We will only keep your data for as long as we reasonably need to for the purposes listed above, or as otherwise required by law.
Questions, comments, requests, or complaints concerning this privacy statement or the way we process your personal data are welcomed and can be addressed to our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@adyen.com
or  Simon Carmiggeltstraat 5-60, 1011 DJ Amsterdam, the Netherlands, or to
lgpd@adyen.com
if you are located in Brazil.
If you would like further details on any of the third parties your personal data is “sold” to or “shared” with, would like to know the purpose of their data processing, the manner in which data is processed, or how you can communicate with such third party to exercise your data privacy rights, please contact
dpo@adyen.com
, or
lgpd@adyen.com
if you are located in Brazil.
If you have a complaint about the way we handle your personal data, you also have the right to address this to the data protection authority of the country in which you live or work, or the country in which we are located.
Learn more
Transaction
Compliance obligations
Embedded financial products
Security
Marketing
Website
Other
Cookie Policy
You can read more about how we use cookies, how we share your data with our partners, and how you can change your settings on our Cookie Policy. To learn what personal information we collect about you, the purpose we process your data for, and how you can opt-out of the sales or sharing of your personal information, please see our
Accept All Cookies
Reject All
Cookies Settings
Your Opt Out Preference Signal is Honored
Cookie Preference Center
When you visit our website, we may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to do. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer. For more information, please see our
Cookie Policy
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Social Media Cookies
We only place social media cookies if you have given us your permission to do this. Social Media cookies collect information about your browsing habits in order to make our content and advertising as relevant to you and your interests as possible. These cookies are also used to help us measure the effectiveness of our advertising campaigns by tracking the number of clicks. The cookies are usually placed by third party advertising networks. They remember the websites you visit and use this information to give you access to interesting and exciting content on our website and to show you more personalized adverts when you visit other websites. These cookies also help improve your browsing experience, for example by helping to prevent the same advertisement from reappearing to you. Additionally, social media platforms such as Facebook and Twitter can use cookies to see if you are logged in and allow you to "like" content or forward it to your friends. Depending on your settings, these third parties may use your information for their own purposes, such as advertising. If you would like to know more how these social media platforms use data, please refer to the privacy notices of these platforms.
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 6
https://www.checkout.com/legal/privacy-policy:
Products
Connect
Global payments network
Move
Payins and payouts
Protect
Fraud, risk, & compliance
Boost
Payment performance
Manage
Money movement controls
Back
Connect
Accept Online
Process online payments your way.
Unified Payments API
Connect to Checkout.com via a single API.
Flow
Boost conversion with customizable blocks.
Hosted Payment Page
Let Checkout.com host your payment page.
Mobile SDK
Build native mobile checkout experiences.
Payments Links
Accept payments on any channel.
Plugins
Plug your payments into platforms.
Back
Move
Acquiring
Accept payments globally with local acquiring.
Payment Methods
Process payments with cards, wallets, transfers, and vouchers.
Issuing
Create your own physical and virtual cards.
Payouts
Move money directly to bank accounts and cards.
Back
Protect
Fraud Detection
Detect and deter payment fraud.
Authentication
Simplify authentication and compliance.
Identity Verification
Verify identities, docs, and KYC with AI-powered video.
Disputes
Protect against chargebacks and manage disputes.
Vault
Protect, store, enrich, and exchange your payment data.
Back
Boost
Intelligent Acceptance
Boost your revenue with AI-powered optimizations.
Network Tokens
Deploy advanced payment security and encryption.
Real-Time Account Updater
Keep payments flowing for subscriptions and more.
Back
Manage
Dashboard
Orchestrate payments and finances in one place.
Treasury & FX
Refine financial and cash flow management.
Solutions
Use Cases
Industry-specific applications
Our Ecosystem
Global connectivity
Use Cases
eCommerce
Retail, fashion, consumer goods, and digital services
Fintech
Neobanks, money transfer, trading, and insurance
Gaming
Sports, e-sports, game streaming, and virtual reality
Crypto
Exchanges and wallets
Marketplaces
Multi-sided markets and platforms
Payment Facilitators
Fintechs and financial service providers
Travel
Online booking platforms, agents and supplier partners
Our ecosystem
International Coverage
One powerful network to scale your business.
Our Partners
Tech stack partners and plugin payment options.
Documentation & Resources
Documentation
Technical references
Resources
Support and education
Documentation
Documentation
Explore step-by-step guides and technical know-how.
API Reference
Get started with a comprehensive API guide.
Test Account
Play, test, simulate, and access the latest features.
Trust Center
Review our security practices and compliance standards.
Resources
Blog
Explore expert perspectives, guides, and reports.
Case Studies
Discover real-world success stories from leading brands.
Newsroom
Read our press releases and download our press kit.
Support
Get help and answers to all your questions.
Company
About Us
Business information
People & Careers
Opportunities and experiences
About Us
Our Mission
Learn how we help businesses to thrive in the digital economy.
Our Customers
See what we do for the world’s leading businesses.
Featured stories
Explore a curated selection of news, case studies, and articles.
Contact Us
Speak to us to discover high-performance payments.
People & Careers
Life at checkout.com
Join our team of passionate payments experts.
Careers at Checkout.com
Explore open roles and opportunities.
Diversity & Inclusion
See how we invest in diversity, equity, and more.
Sign In
Get in touch
Would you like to change your region to see content specific to your location?
Global (English)
Select your location
Products and features may vary by country
COUNTRIES
France (Français)
Germany (Deutsch)
Spain (Español)
Italy (italiano)
United Arab Emirates (اللغة العربية)
Saudi Arabia (اللغة العربية)
Portugal (Português)
China (中文)
Continue
Legal
Transparency is a recurring Checkout.com value that is reflected in our pricing promise, our security protocol and our legal agreements.
Terms & policies
Service Terms
Country Terms
Privacy Policy
Cookie policy
Regulatory
RDR terms
Disclaimer
Payment methods rules
Claims processing
Checkout.com Privacy Notice
This notice was last updated on 2 January 2024.
Checkout provides services which help businesses thrive in the digital economy. These services include payment processing and optimization, tools to manage and reduce fraud, and identity verification solutions. This notice is designed to provide you with clear information about how we use personal data when we provide our services, so that you can continue to trust Checkout to handle your data fairly, lawfully, and securely. We want to make sure you understand what personal data we may collect about you when you interact with us, how we use your personal data, and how we keep it safe. Personal data means data from which you can be identified either directly (e.g. via your name) or indirectly (e.g. via your IP address).
If you have any questions about how we use your personal data, you can get in touch by one of the methods set out in the
Contact us
section.
This is a global notice that applies to the activities of The Checkout.com group, which includes Checkout Ltd and all affiliated companies (“Checkout”, “we”, “our”, or “us”). The Checkout entity which is the data controller and therefore primarily responsible for your personal data will depend on which Checkout entity has provided you with our services in your jurisdiction. You can find details of the relevant Checkout entities
here
.
You can scroll down to read the entire notice, or you can jump to the section you are interested in by clicking on one of the headings below:
What personal data do we collect?
The purposes for which we process personal data and our lawful basis for doing so
Your choices and rights
How we share your personal data with third parties
International data transfers
How we protect your personal data
Contact us & updates to this notice
Biometric Data
Country-specific notices
Link
What personal data do we collect?
The personal data we collect, and the ways in which we process it depend on your relationship with us. This notice relates to the information we process about you if you are:
A Merchant Representative:
you represent the businesses and prospective businesses that we support.
A Merchant Customer:
you are an individual customer who purchases goods and services from our Merchants, applies for a card issued by Checkout, or uses our verification services
A Website User:
you are a visitor to our website, including utilising our sandbox environment
This notice applies where Checkout act as a data controller, but we may sometimes operate as a data processor for Merchant Customer data where we carry out instructions and process data on a Merchant’s behalf. In these instances, you should refer to the privacy notice of the Merchant for details regarding how they process your information.
‍
Merchant Representatives:
Data we collect
Where we collect it
Contact information: your name, job title, email address, phone number, personal or business postal address
-Where you provide it to us by enquiring about, or registering for, our services
-From certain trusted third parties, for example those with whom you may have shared your data, and companies which aggregate business contact information
-From publicly available sources, for example
Companies House
in the UK
Sensitive information: proof of address, copy of a personal identification card or passport, financial information and other information as required to validate your identity and background
-Where you provide it to us directly in the course of registering a Merchant for our services
-From certain trusted third parties, for example those with whom you may have shared your data, including companies which provide information on company directors and shareholding
‍
Merchant Customers:
Data we collect
Where we collect it
Contact information: your name, email address, phone number, personal or business postal address
Where you make a purchase through a Merchant that uses Checkout to process payments, utilize a physical or virtual card issued by Checkout, or use our verification services
Cardholder information: your payment card details and billing address
Where you make a purchase through a Merchant that uses Checkout to process payments or utilize a physical or virtual card issued by Checkout
Transaction information: information relating to a purchase, including currency, amount, and the identity of the Merchant
Where you make a purchase through a Merchant that uses Checkout to process payments or utilize a physical or virtual card issued by Checkout
Technical information: your IP address and device information (including the type of browser and operating system and version you use, unique device identifier, and mobile network information)
Where you make a purchase through a Merchant that uses Checkout to process payments, or use our verification services
Verification information: proof of address, copy of a personal identification card or passport and other information as required to validate your identity
Where you apply for a physical or virtual card issued by Checkout or use our verification services
Audio visual and, subject to your consent, biometric information: any videos, images, copies of relevant identity documents, face and voice recordings, from which biometric data such as a faceprint, or a voiceprint, can be extracted
Where you upload this information while validating your identity using Checkout’s identity verification services
Sensitive information: your payment card details, copies of relevant identity documents, and biometric data derived from images of you (for example, an image of your face from a face scan), copies of personal identification cards or passport and other information as required to validate your identity
Where you make a purchase through a Merchant that uses Checkout to process payments or utilize a physical or virtual card issued by Checkout
Where you upload this information while validating your identity using Checkout’s identity verification services
Where you apply for a physical or virtual card issued by Checkout or use our verification services
Please note that where you are a Merchant Customer you should also consult the privacy notice of the Merchant from whom you are making a purchase to understand how they may process and share your personal data.
‍
Website Users:
Data we collect
Where we collect it
Technical information: IP address and device information (including the type of browser and operating system and version you use, unique device identifier and mobile network information) and your activity when using this website including information on your access times to this website (for example time zone settings and location), pages viewed, URLs clicked on and the pages you visited before and after navigating to this website
We use cookies, server logs and other technologies, such as web beacons, to collect this information. Please refer to our Cookies Notice for further information about how we use cookies and similar technologies.
Contact information: your name, email address, phone number, personal or business postal address
Where you provide it to us directly by using an enquiry or event sign up form on our website
‍
The purposes for which we process personal data and our lawful basis for doing so
‍
Merchant Representatives
Purposes for which we process data
Our lawful basis
We use your contact information to facilitate and enable our relationship with you as a prospective, new or existing merchant
We use your contact information to send you marketing communications via email or text about relevant products and services
We process this information based on our legitimate interest in contacting you to in the course of offering or providing relevant products and services to you
Where required by law we rely on your consent in order to send you direct marketing
We use your verification information, in order to validate your identity, fulfill our regulatory obligations, and conduct due diligence in the form of Know Your Customer (“KYC”) or Know Your Business (“KYB”) checks
We process this information where it is necessary to comply with a legal obligation
We also process this information where it is in our legitimate interests to do so to detect and prevent fraud and money laundering
We use your contact information and verification information to comply with our legal and regulatory obligations
We process this information where it is necessary to comply with a legal obligation
We anonymize and aggregate your information and process it to ensure the
security, stability, performance and development of our services
We process this information where it is in our legitimate interests to do so to securely and effectively maintain and develop our products and services
‍
Merchant Customers
Purposes for which we process data
Our lawful basis
We use your contact, cardholder, transaction, technical and verification information to process payments and otherwise provide our services to you
We process this information where it is in our legitimate interests to do so to securely and effectively deliver our services
We use your contact, cardholder, transaction, technical and verification information to detect and prevent fraudulent activity, financial crime and any other illegal or unauthorized use of Checkout services
We process this information where it is necessary to comply with a legal obligation
We also process this information where it is in our legitimate interests to do so to detect and prevent fraud and money laundering
We use your contact, cardholder, transaction, technical and verification information to comply with our legal and regulatory obligations
We process this information where it is necessary to comply with a legal obligation
We use your contact, and audio visual and biometric information to validate your identity (when using Checkout’s Identity Verification Services)
We process this information where it is necessary for the performance of a contract
We only process biometric information with your explicit consent
We anonymize and aggregate your information and process it to ensure the
security, stability, performance and development of our services
We process this information where it is in our legitimate interests to do so to securely and effectively maintain and develop our products and services
‍
Website Users
Purposes for which we process data
Our lawful basis
We use your technical information to perform data analytics to improve and optimize our website, products, services, marketing, customer relationships and experiences as further described in our Cookies Notice
We process this information where it is in our legitimate interests to do so to securely and effectively maintain and develop our website
Where we use certain types of cookies, we will ask for your consent. We explain this further in our
Cookies Notice
We use your technical information to administer and protect our website (including troubleshooting, data analysis, testing, system maintenance, support, reporting and hosting of data)
We process this information where it is in our legitimate interests to do so to protect and secure our website
We use your contact information to respond to you where you make an enquiry on our website
We process this information where it is in our legitimate interests to do so in responding to your enquiries
‍
Automated decision making and profiling
In the course of providing our services, we may make decisions using your data which are partially or wholly automated to help make our decisions and services secure and efficient.
We use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
-Fraud detection: Where you are a Merchant Customer and you initiate a transaction with a Merchant that uses our fraud detection services, your information may be processed by Checkout for the purposes of fraud detection and prevention. In some cases, this may lead to an automated decision for a transaction to be declined or for further information to be requested from you in order to proceed. We perform this activity where we have a legal obligation to do so to protect you and our Merchants, and to otherwise ensure the security of our services. Any such automated decision will be based on your contact, cardholder, transaction, and technical information, as further outlined in the
What personal data do we collect
section of this notice.
-Identity verification: Where you are a Merchant Representative or Merchant Customer and we ask you to provide identity information to sign up to one of our services, or you use our
identity verification
product, the information you provide may be subject to partially or wholly automated decisions as to whether we are able to verify your identity. In the event we are unable to effectively verify your identity, this could have the impact of delaying or denying you access to a product or service operated by Checkout or one of our Merchants. We perform this activity to ensure we comply with our own legal obligations, or on our Merchants’ behalf where they use our identity verification product.  We use verification information to perform these checks, as well as any audio, visual and biometric information you submit to our Identity verification product, as further outlined in the
What personal data do we collect
section of this notice.
You have a right to object to any automated decisions we have made and request that any such decisions are reviewed by a human. For information on how to exercise this right please see
Your Choices and Rights.
‍
Your choices and rights
You have rights and choices over the way your information is used by us:
Right to opt-out of direct marketing communications: This enables you to opt-out of receiving marketing communications from us. You can do this at any time by clicking on the ‘unsubscribe’ link included in any email marketing material we send to you, or by informing us by emailing
dpo@checkout.com
Right to request access to your personal data: This enables you to receive a copy of the personal data we hold about you and to check that we are lawfully processing it. In some cases, you have a right to receive a copy of this information in a reusable format and have it transmitted to another organisation
Right to request correction of the personal data we hold about you: This enables you to have any incomplete or inaccurate data we hold about you corrected
Right to request erasure of your personal data: This enables you to ask us to delete or remove your personal data. Please note that in some cases, for example if we need to retain your data to comply with legal obligations, we may be unable to comply with such requests
Right to object to processing of your personal data: In addition to your right to object to direct marketing communications, in certain circumstances you can object to our processing of your personal data for example when we rely on legitimate interests to process your personal data
Request restriction of processing of your personal data: This enables you to ask us to suspend the processing of your personal data in certain scenarios
Withdrawal of consent: You can withdraw consent at any time where we are relying on consent to process your personal data
Right to object to automated individual decision-making and profiling: This includes the right to request human intervention where we have relied on automated decision making or profiling.
If you wish to exercise any of the rights set out above, or any additional rights noted in the
Country-specific
section of this notice, please contact
dpo@checkout.com
. You can also submit a request via an authorized representative, in which case we will confirm the representative has authority to act on your behalf before we carry out the request.
If you object to the processing of your personal data, or if you have provided your consent to processing and you later choose to withdraw it, we will respect that choice in accordance with our legal obligations. However, this could mean that we cannot provide certain products or services to you or we cannot perform the actions necessary to achieve the purposes described (see
The purposes for which we process your personal data
).
‍
How we share your personal data with third parties
In order to provide our services to you we may share your personal data with the following parties:
Members of the Checkout Group: Your information may be shared with our affiliates within the Checkout.com group, to provide you with our services.
Third party service providers: We may also use third-party service providers acting on our behalf. These service providers help us with data and cloud services, website hosting, data analysis, background and screening, application services, advertising networks, information technology and related infrastructure, customer service, communications, and auditing.
Payment partners: We may share your personal data with third parties across the payments ecosystem as necessary to securely and effectively process payments. This includes banks, card schemes, alternative payment method providers and issuers.
Law enforcement and regulators: We may share information in response to a law enforcement, government agency or regulator request where permitted to or required by law. We may also share information when we or a third party is investigating potential fraud.
We may also share your personal data with third parties in the event of any reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer or other disposition or any other transaction affecting all or any portion of our business, assets or stock.
Checkout.com does not sell personal data to third parties.
‍
International data transfers
Checkout is a global business and in the provision of our services personal data may be transferred to Checkout group companies or third-party service providers located in a different country than your home country.  We will implement appropriate measures to ensure that your personal data remains protected and secure when it is transferred, and we will only transfer your personal data in accordance with applicable laws and regulations. Where data is transferred from the UK or EEA to a third country that is not deemed by the EU Commission or UK Secretary of State to have adequate protections in place, we rely on the EU Standard Contractual Clauses (SCCs) or contractual clauses approved by the ICO (such as the UK Addendum to the EU SCCs) respectively, to transfer your data to that third country and ensure it remains secure. We also carry out transfer impact assessments before transferring your personal data, to assess the level of risk to you and your rights and protections in that third country.
You can find the EU SCCs
here
and the UK Addendum to the EU SCCs
here
.  Please
Contact us
if you would like to know more about how we transfer your personal data overseas.
‍
How we protect your personal data
Checkout is committed to building a secure and trusted environment for businesses and their communities to thrive in the digital economy. Whilst we cannot guarantee your personal data will be 100% secure, we put in place appropriate measures to secure personal data from being accidentally lost, used, accessed, altered or disclosed in an unauthorized manner. We continually review the security measures we have in place to ensure they are appropriate.
We are PCI DSS (Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard) Level 1 compliant, which is the highest standard set by the payment card industry to ensure that cardholder data is processed, stored, and transmitted in a secure environment. Checkout’s systems are also ISO27001 certified.
When deciding how long to keep your personal data, we think about how much and what kind of personal data we have, how sensitive it is, the risk of unauthorized use or disclosure, why we are using your personal data, and if there is another way to achieve these purposes, as well as what the laws and regulations tell us. We will only retain your personal data for as long as reasonably necessary to fulfil the following purposes:
-to comply with any legal, accounting, tax and reporting requirements
-to deliver and develop our products and services securely and effectively
-to perform analysis and undertake internal research
Once the data is no longer required for these purposes, we securely erase it.
‍
Contact us & updates to this notice
If you have any questions about this notice, including any requests to exercise your legal rights, please contact our Data Protection Officer (DPO) using the details set out below.
Email address:
dpo@checkout.com
Postal Address:
Data Protection Officer, Checkout Ltd
Wenlock Works, Shepherdess Walk,
London,
N1 7BQ
United Kingdom
‍
You can also contact or complain to your local supervisory authority (for example the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO)
here
), however please consider contacting us first so that we can address your question directly.
‍
Biometric Data
If you consent to our collection of biometric information or if our collection of biometric information is otherwise permitted by law, you agree that we may collect your imagery of the face, and voice recordings, from which an identifier template such as a faceprint, a minutiae template, or a voiceprint, can be extracted in order to verify your identity using Checkout’s verification services.  Your biometric information may be shared with our third party cloud providers Outscale SAS and Amazon Web Services.  We will delete your biometric information no later than 365 days after the date you provide it.
‍
Country-specific notices
Notice relating to our operations under the California Consumer Privacy Act as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act (collectively, “CCPA”)
Checkout.com is providing the following supplemental information for individuals whose personal data is collected or held by Checkout LLC in the State of California as defined in the CCPA.
Your right to access the personal information we hold about you.
You may request a copy of the personal information that we have collected about you
Your right to request the deletion of your personal information.
Subject to certain limitations under applicable law, you may request that we delete the personal confirmation we have collected from you.
Non-discrimination.
You have the right not to be discriminated against for exercising any of your rights under CCPA.
Authorized Agent
. Only you, or someone legally authorized to act on your behalf, may make a verifiable consumer request related to your personal information. You may also make a verifiable consumer request on behalf of your minor child. To authorize an agent, provide written authorization signed by you and your designated agent, and contact us as set forth in “Contact us & updates to this notice” below.
Verification.
To protect your privacy, we will take steps to reasonably verify your identity before fulfilling your request. These steps may involve asking you to provide sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are the person about whom we collected personal information or an authorized representative, or to answer questions regarding your account and use of our Services.
“Do Not Track.”
Do Not Track (“DNT”) is a privacy preference that users can set in certain web browsers. Please note that we do not respond to or honor DNT signals or similar mechanisms transmitted by web browsers.
Your right to opt-out of cross-context behavioral advertising.
You may opt-out of the sharing of your personal information for cross-context behavioral advertising. Please click the link
here
or contact us at dpo@checkout.com to submit a request to opt-out of cross-context behavioral advertising
Sale of personal information:
Checkout does not sell personal information, as such we do not knowingly sell personal information relating to minors
Contact.
To submit a request to exercise any of your rights, you can contact our Data Protection Officer using the contact details provided above.
‍
Notice relating to our operations under the Colorado Privacy Act (“CPA”)
Checkout.com is providing the following supplemental information for individuals whose personal data is collected or held by Checkout LLC in the State of Colorado as defined in the CPA.
Processing of Sensitive Information
. In some situations, we may need your explicit consent to process your sensitive personal information (e.g., government issued identification, biometric information, financial information) for the purpose of providing Services and/or other purposes stated in this Privacy Notice, in each case as required by applicable law.
‍
Notice relating to our operations in France
Checkout.com is providing the following supplemental information for individuals whose personal information is collected or held by Checkout SAS or any of its affiliated companies.
‍
Instruction on the processing of your Personal Data after your death
. For data subjects in France or if your data is processed by Checkout SAS, you have the right to issue general or specific instructions regarding the fate of your Personal Data after your death, in accordance with the terms of Article 85 of French Law No. 78-17.
Email Address
Thank you! Your submission has been received!
Oops! Something went wrong while submitting the form.
Cookies and use of our website
We may use your information – collected through cookies and similar technologies - to improve your experience on our site, analyze how you use it and assist in our marketing efforts. You can always update your preferences via the Cookie settings page. We will handle your personal information in line with our
Privacy Policy
and Cookie policy
Reject All
Accept All Cookies
Cookies Settings
Cookies Settings
When you visit our website we may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is used to make our site work as you expect, to analyse how you interact with it and to improve your experience by giving you a more personalised experience. We respect your right to privacy and you can, at any time, choose to disable some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and to set your default settings. Please be aware that blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
Cookie policy
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Always Active
These cookies are essential to enable you to move around a website and use its features. Without these cookies, services you have asked for cannot be provided.
View Vendor Details‎
Performance Cookies
These allow us to recognise and count the number of visitors and to see how visitors move around our website when they are using it. This helps us to improve the way our website works, for example, by ensuring that users are finding what they are looking for easily.
View Vendor Details‎
Functional Cookies
These are used to recognise you when you return to our website. This enables us to personalise our content for you, greet you by name and remember your preferences (for example, your choice of language or region).
View Vendor Details‎
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
View Vendor Details‎
Back Button
Vendors List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 7
https://www.paypal.com/hk/legalhub/paypal/privacy-full:
Back To Home Page
Privacy Statement
1. Overview
2. What Personal Data Do We Collect?
3. Why Do We Retain Personal Data?
4. How Do We Process Personal Data?
5. Do We Share Personal Data?
6. How Do We Work with Other Services and Platforms?
7. How Do We Use Cookies and Tracking Technologies?
8. What Privacy Choices Are Available To You?
9. What are your Rights?
10. How Do We Protect Your Personal Data?
11. Can Children Use Our Services?
12. What Else Should You Know?
13. Contact Us
14. Definitions
15. Additional Information
Download Printable PDF
Privacy Statement
Last updated on 16 March 2022
1. Overview
PayPal
has developed this Privacy Statement to explain how we may collect, retain, process, share and transfer your
Personal Data
when you visit our
Sites
or use our
Services
. This Privacy Statement applies to your Personal Data when you visit Sites or use Services, and does not apply to online websites or services that we do not own or control, including websites or services of other PayPal
Users
.
This Privacy Statement is designed to help you obtain information about our privacy practices and to help you understand your privacy choices when you use our Sites and Services. Please note that our Service offerings may vary by region.
We have defined some terms that we use throughout the Privacy Statement. You can find the meaning of a capitalized term in the
Definitions
section.
Please
contact us
if you have questions about our privacy practices that are not addressed in this Privacy Statement.
2. What Personal Data Do We Collect?
We may collect information about you when you visit our Sites or use our Services, including the following:
Registration and use information –
When you register to use our Services by establishing an Account, we will collect Personal Data as necessary to offer and fulfill the Services you request. Depending on the Services you choose, we may require you to provide us with your name, postal address, telephone number, email address and identification information to establish an Account. We may require you to provide us with additional Personal Data as you use our Services.
Transaction and experience information –
When you use our Services or access our Sites, for example, to make purchases from merchants, to receive money, to process payments, to send payouts or to send money to friends and family, we collect information about the transaction, as well as other information associated with the transaction such as amount sent or requested, amount paid for products or services, merchant information, including information about any funding instruments used to complete the transaction, Device Information, Technical Usage Data, and Geolocation Information.
Participant information –
When you use our Services or access our Sites, we collect Personal Data you provide us about the other participants associated with the transaction.
Send or request money:
When you send or request money through the Services, we collect Personal Data such as name, postal address, telephone number, and financial account information about the participant who is receiving money from you or sending money to you. The extent of Personal Data required about a participant may vary depending on the Services you are using to send or request money.
Pay or request someone else to pay a bill:
If you use our Services to pay a bill for the benefit of someone else, or if you request a User to pay a bill for you, we collect Personal Data from you about the account holder such as name, postal address, telephone number, email address, and account number of the bill that you intend to pay or request to be paid.
Add value to your accounts:
If you use our Services to add value to your Account or any other account you may have, or if you ask a User to add value to any of these accounts, we may collect Personal Data from you about the other party, or from the other party about you to facilitate the request. For example, if you use our Services to reload a mobile phone, or to request value be added to your mobile account, we may collect Personal Data and other information including mobile account number from the other participant.
Information about your public profile and your friends and contacts –
It may be easier for us to help you transact with your friends and contacts if you choose to connect your contact list information with your Account or if your Account profile is publicly available. If you establish an account connection between your device or a social media platform and your Account, we will use your contact list information (such as name, address, email address) to improve your experience when you use the Services. When your Account profile is public, other users can find your profile to send you money by searching for you by name, username, email, or mobile number on PayPal and confirm it’s you by viewing your photo. You can make your Account profile private anytime in your PayPal.me settings.
Information that you choose to provide us to obtain additional Services or specific online Services –
If you request or participate in an optional Site feature, or request enhanced Services or other elective functionality, we may collect additional information from you. We will provide you with a separate notice at the time of collection, if the use of that information differs from the uses disclosed in this Privacy Statement.
Personal Data about you if you use unbranded Services –
certain Services are available without being required to log in to or establish an Account. We will collect Personal Data when you are interacting with and making payments to merchants using our card payment services that do not carry the PayPal brand and when you checkout with PayPal without logging into an account. For our unbranded payment services, your interaction is with the merchant, on their platform. If you are an Account holder, or create an Account at a later date, we may collect information about unbranded transactions and associate them with your Account to improve your customer experience as an Account holder and for compliance and analytics purposes. If you are not an Account holder, we will collect and store all information you provide and use such information in accordance with this Privacy Statement.
Information about you from third-party sources –
We obtain information from third-party sources such as merchants, data providers, and credit bureaus, where permitted by law.
Other information we collect related to your use of our Sites or Services –
We may collect additional information from or about you when you communicate with us, contact our customer support teams or respond to a survey.
Non-Account holders
If you use our Services without creating or logging into an account, we’ll still collect personal data, which may include your payment information, device information, and location. When you use our Services without creating or logging into an account, we will use this information to process transactions, prevent fraud and comply with the law. We may connect this information with your account, if you have one or if you create an account at a later date.
3. Why Do We Retain Personal Data?
We retain Personal Data to fulfill our legal or regulatory obligations and for our business purposes. We may retain Personal Data for longer periods than required by law if it is in our legitimate business interests and not prohibited by law. If your Account is closed, we may take steps to mask Personal Data and other information, but we reserve our ability to retain and access the data for so long as required to comply with applicable laws. We will continue to use and disclose such Personal Data in accordance with this Privacy Statement.
4. How Do We Process Personal Data?
We may
Process
your information for the following reasons:
To operate the Sites and provide the Services
, including to:
initiate a payment, send or request money, send payouts, add value to an account, or pay a bill;
authenticate your access to an Account;
communicate with you about your Account, the Sites, the Services, or PayPal;
create an account connection between your Account and a third-party account or platform;
perform creditworthiness and other financial standing checks, evaluate applications, and compare information for accuracy and verification purposes; and
keep your Account and financial information up to date.
To manage our business needs
, such as monitoring, analyzing, and improving the Services and the Sites’ performance and functionality. For example, we analyze User behavior and perform research about the way you use our Services.
To manage risk and protect the Sites, the Services and you from fraud by verifying your identity.
PayPal’s risk and fraud tools use
Personal Data
,
Device Information
,
Technical Usage Data
and
Geolocation Information
from our Sites and websites that offer PayPal Services to help detect and prevent fraud and abuse of the Services.
To market to you
about PayPal products and Services and the products and services of unaffiliated businesses. We may also Process your Personal Data to uniquely tailor the marketing content and certain Services or Site experiences to better match your interests on PayPal and other third-party websites.
To provide personalized Services offered by PayPal on third-party websites and online services.
We may use your Personal Data and other information collected in accordance with this Privacy Statement to provide a targeted display, feature
, Services
or offer to you on third-party websites. We may use cookies and other tracking technologies to provide these online services and/or work with other third-parties such as
merchants,
advertising or analytics companies to provide these online services.
To provide you with location-specific options, functionality or offers
if you elect to share your Geolocation Information through the Services. We will use this information to enhance the security of the Sites and Services and provide you with location-based Services, such as advertising, search results, and other personalized content.
To comply with our obligations and to enforce the terms of our Sites and Services,
including to comply with all applicable laws and regulations.
To make it easier for you to find and connect with others.
For instance, if you let us access your contacts or when your Account profile is public, we can suggest connections with people you may know and help others connect with you to send you money by letting them find your profile when they search for you by name, username, email, or mobile number on PayPal. We may also associate information that we learn about you through your and your contacts’ use of the Services, and information you and others provide, to suggest people you may know or may want to transact with through our Services. Social functionality and features designed to simplify your use of the Services with others vary by Service.
To respond to your requests,
for example to contact you about a question you submitted to our customer service team
.
5. Do We Share Personal Data?
We may share your Personal Data or other information about you with others in a variety of ways as described in this section of the Privacy Statement.
We may share your Personal Data or other information for the following reasons:
With other members of the PayPal corporate family:
We may share your Personal Data with members of the PayPal family of entities to, among other things, provide the Services you have requested or authorized; to manage risk; to help detect and prevent potentially illegal and fraudulent acts and other violations of our policies and agreements; and to help us manage the availability and connectivity of PayPal products, Services, and communications.
With other companies that provide services to us:
We may share Personal Data with third-party service providers that perform services and functions at our direction and on our behalf. These third-party service providers may, for example, provide you with Services, verify your identity, assist in processing transactions, send you advertisements for our products and Services, or provide customer support.
With other financial institutions:
We may share Personal Data with other financial institutions that we have partnered with to jointly create and offer a product, such as with Synchrony Bank in connection with the PayPal Extras credit card. These financial institutions may only use this information to market and offer PayPal-related products, unless you have given consent for other uses. We may also share Personal Data to process transactions, provide you with benefits associated with your eligible cards, and keep your financial information up to date.
With the other parties to transactions when you use the Services, such as other Users, merchants, and their service providers:
We may share information about you and your account with the other parties involved in processing your transactions. This includes other Users you are sending or receiving funds from, and merchants, and their service providers when you use the Services to pay for goods or services. The information includes:
Personal Data and Account Information necessary to facilitate the transaction;
information to help other participant(s) resolve disputes and detect and prevent fraud; and
aggregated data and performance analytics to help merchants better understand Users and to help merchants enhance Users’ experiences.
With other third parties for our business purposes or as permitted or required by law:
We may share information about you with other parties for PayPal’s business purposes or as permitted or required by law, including:
if we need to do so to comply with a law, legal process or regulations;
law enforcement, regulators, government officials, or other third parties (in Hong Kong SAR China or elsewhere) in relation to a subpoena, court order, or other legal process or requirement under Hong Kong SAR China law or regulation, or the laws and regulations of other jurisdictions that are applicable to PayPal or one of its affiliates; when we need to do so to comply with such law or credit card rules; or when we believe, in our sole discretion, that the disclosure of Personal Data is necessary or appropriate to prevent physical harm or financial loss; or to report suspected illegal activity or to investigate violations of a user agreement;
to protect the vital interests of a person;
to protect our property, Services and legal rights;
to facilitate a purchase or sale of all or part of PayPal’s business;
in connection with shipping and related services for purchases made using a Service;
to help assess and manage risk and prevent fraud against us, our Users and fraud involving our Sites or use of our Services, including fraud that occurs at or involves our business partners, strategic ventures, or other individuals and merchants;
to banking partners as required by card association rules for inclusion on their list of terminated merchants;
to credit reporting and collection agencies;
to companies that we plan to merge with or be acquired by; and
to support our audit, compliance, and corporate governance functions.
With your consent:
We also will share your Personal Data and other information with your consent or direction, including if you authorize an account connection with a third-party account or platform.
In addition, PayPal may provide aggregated statistical data to third-parties, including other businesses and members of the public, about how, when, and why Users visit our Sites and use our Services. This data will not personally identify you or provide information about your use of the Sites or Services. We do not share your Personal Data with third parties for their marketing purposes without your consent.
6. How Do We Work with Other Services and Platforms?
A significant benefit and innovation of PayPal’s Services is that you can connect your Account with a third-party account or platform. For the purposes of this Privacy Statement, an “account connection” with such a third-party is a connection you authorize or enable between your Account and a non-PayPal account, payment instrument, or platform that you lawfully control or own. When you authorize such a connection, PayPal and the third-party will exchange your Personal Data and other information directly. Examples of account connections include:
linking your Account to a social media account or social messaging service;
connecting your Account to a third-party data aggregation or financial services company, if you provide such company with your Account log-in credentials; or
using your Account to make payments to a merchant or allowing a merchant to charge your Account.
If you choose to create an account connection, we may receive information from the third-party about you and your use of the third-party’s service. For example, if you connect your Account to a social media account, we will receive Personal Data from the social media provider via the account connection. If you connect your Account to other financial accounts, directly or through a third-party service provider, we may have access to your account balance and transactional information, such as purchases and funds transfers. We will use all such information that we receive from a third-party via an account connection in a manner consistent with this Privacy Statement.
Information that we share with a third-party based on an account connection will be used and disclosed in accordance with the third-party’s privacy practices. Before authorizing an account connection, you should review the privacy notice of any third-party that will gain access to your Personal Data as part of the account connection. For example, Personal Data that PayPal shares with a third-party account or platform such as a social media account may in turn be shared with certain other parties, including the general public, depending on the account’s or platform’s privacy practices.
7. How Do We Use Cookies and Tracking Technologies?
When you visit our Sites, use our Services, or visit a third-party website for which we provide online Services, we and our business partners and vendors may use cookies and other tracking technologies (collectively, “Cookies”) to recognize you as a User and to customize your online experiences, the Services you use, and other online content and advertising; measure the effectiveness of promotions and perform analytics; and to mitigate risk, prevent potential fraud, and promote trust and safety across our Sites and Services. Certain aspects and features of our Services and Sites are only available through the use of Cookies, so if you choose to disable or decline Cookies, your use of the Sites and Services may be limited or not possible.
Do Not Track (DNT) is an optional browser setting that allows you to express your preferences regarding tracking by advertisers and other third-parties. We do not respond to DNT signals.
Please review our
Statement on Cookies and Tracking Technologies
to learn more about how we use Cookies.
8. What Privacy Choices Are Available To You?
You have choices when it comes to the privacy practices and communications described in this Privacy Statement. Many of your choices may be explained at the time you sign up for or use a Service or in the context of your use of a Site. You may be provided with instructions and prompts within the experiences as you navigate the Services.
Choices Relating to the Personal Data We Collect
Personal Data
. You may decline to provide Personal Data when it is requested by PayPal, but certain Services or all of the Services may be unavailable to you.
Location and other device-level information
. The device you use to access the Sites or Services may collect information about you, including Geolocation Information and User usage data that PayPal may then collect and use. For information about your ability to restrict the collection and use of such information, please use the settings available in the device.
Choices Relating to Our Use of Your Personal Data
Personalized Services offered by PayPal on third-party websites and services
. You may manage your preferences for other PayPal Services that are personalized and offered to you on third-party websites from your Account. We may also provide you with instructions and prompts on how to manage your preferences within the Service experience.
Finding and connecting with others
. If available, you may manage your preferences for finding and connecting with others from your account of the Service you use.
Choices Relating to Account Connections
If you authorize an account connection to a third-party account or platform, such as a social media account, you may be able to manage your connection preferences from your Account or the third-party account or platform. Please refer to the privacy notice that governs the third-party platform for more information on the choices you may have.
Choices Relating to Cookies
You may have options available to manage your cookies preferences. For example, your browser or internet device may allow you delete, disable, or block certain cookies and other tracking technologies. You can learn more by visiting AboutCookies.org. You may choose to enable these options, but doing so may prevent you from using many of the core features and functions available on a Service or Site.
You may have an option regarding the use of cookies and other tracking technologies when you use a Service or visit parts of a Site. For example, you may be asked if you want the Service or Site to “remember” certain things about you, and we will use cookies and other tracking technologies to the extent that you permit them.
You can learn more about our cookies and tracking technologies by visiting the Statement on Cookies and Tracking Technologies page.
Choices Relating to Your Registration and Account Information
If you have an Account, you generally may review and edit Personal Data by logging in and updating the information directly or by contacting us.
contact us
if you do not have an Account or if you have questions about your Account information or other Personal Data.
Choices Relating to Communication
Notices, Alerts and Updates from Us:
Marketing:
With your consent, we may send you marketing content about our Sites, Services, products, products we jointly offer with financial institutions, as well as the products and services of unaffiliated third parties and members of the PayPal corporate family through various communication channels, for example, email, text, pop-ups, push notifications, and messaging applications. You may opt out of these marketing communications by following the instructions in the communications you receive. If you have an Account with us, you may also adjust your communication preferences in your Account settings. For messages sent via push notifications, you may manage your preferences in your device.
Informational and Other:
We will send communications to you that are required or necessary to send to Users of our Services, notifications that contain important information and other communications that you request from us. You may not opt out of receiving these communications. However, you may be able to adjust the media and format through which you receive these notices.
9. What are your Rights?
Subject to limitation set out in Data Protection Laws, you have certain rights in relation to your personal data. You have the right to request access to your data, rectification and data portability. Please contact us if you want to exercise these rights.
You may have the right to review automated decision making. You may also revoke consent. Revocation of your consent may affect our ability to provide services to you. If you want to exercise any of your rights, contact us. If you wish to complete a request for access to all personal data PayPal holds about you, remember that you may be required to prove your identity
If you have an Account with any of our Services, you will generally be able to review and edit Personal Data in the Account by accessing the account and updating the information directly. You can also contact us if you do not have an Account or if you have questions about Account information or other Personal Data.
10. How Do We Protect Your Personal Data?
We maintain technical, physical, and administrative security measures designed to provide reasonable protection for your Personal Data against loss, misuse, unauthorized access, disclosure, and alteration. The security measures include firewalls, data encryption, physical access controls to our data centers, and information access authorization controls. While we are dedicated to securing our systems and Services, you are responsible for securing and maintaining the privacy of your password(s) and Account/profile registration information and verifying that the Personal Data we maintain about you is accurate and current. We are not responsible for protecting any Personal Data that we share with a third-party based on an account connection that you have authorized.
11. Can Children Use Our Services?
The Sites and Services are not directed to children under the age of 13. We do not knowingly collect information, including Personal Data, from children or other individuals who are not legally able to use our Sites and Services. If we obtain actual knowledge that we have collected Personal Data from a child under the age of 13, we will promptly delete it, unless we are legally obligated to retain such data.
contact us
if you believe that we have mistakenly or unintentionally collected information from a child under the age of 13.
12. What Else Should You Know?
Changes to This Privacy Statement
.
We may revise this Privacy Statement from time to time to reflect changes to our business, the Sites or Services, or applicable laws. The revised Privacy Statement will be effective as of the published effective date.
If the revised version includes a substantial change, we will provide you with 30 days prior notice by posting notice of the change on the “Policy Update” page of our website. We also may notify Users of the change using email or other means.
Transfers of Your Personal Data to Other Countries
Our operations are supported by a network of computers, cloud-based servers, and other infrastructure and information technology, including, but not limited to, third-party service providers. We and our third-party service providers store and Process your Personal Data in the United States of America and elsewhere in the world. We will protect your information as described in this Privacy Statement if your Personal Data is transferred to other countries. By using our Sites and Services, you consent to your Personal Data being transferred to other countries, including countries that have different data protection rules than your country. We do not represent that our Sites and Services are appropriate or available in any particular jurisdiction.
13. Contact Us
You may contact us if you have general questions about our Privacy Statement and practices or questions about your Account information or Personal Data.
We want to make sure your questions go to the right place:
Click
here
to contact us about your PayPal account or transaction, or a card payment made to a merchant.
Click
here
to contact us about your Xoom account
Our Data Protection Officer can be contacted at
PayPal (Europe) S.à.r.l. et Cie, S.C.A., 22-24 Boulevard Royal L-2449, Luxembourg.
14. Definitions
Account
means a PayPal, or Xoom member account.
Device Information
means data that can be automatically collected from any device used to access the Sites or Services. Such information may include, but is not limited to, your device type; your device’s network connections; your device’s name; your device’s IP address; information about your device’s web browser and the internet connection being used to access the Site or Services; Geolocation Information; information about apps downloaded to your device; and biometric data (e.g., Touch ID/Fingerprint to verify your identity).
Geolocation Information
means information that identifies with reasonable specificity your location by using, for instance, longitude and latitude coordinates obtained through GPS, Wi-Fi, or cell site triangulation. Some of our Services may ask you for permission to share your current location. Some of the Sites and Services require this information to provide a specific product or online Service. If you do not agree to our collection of the geolocation information, our Sites or Services may not function properly when you try to use them.
PayPal
means PayPal Hong Kong Limited and subsidiaries or affiliates. In this Privacy Statement, PayPal is sometimes referred to as “we,” “us,” or “our,” depending on the context.
Personal Data
means personal information that can be associated with an identified or identifiable person. “Personal Data” can include name, postal address (including billing and shipping addresses), telephone number, email address, payment card number, other financial account information, account number, date of birth, and government-issued credentials (e.g., driver’s license number, national ID, passport, Social Security number and Taxpayer ID). Personal Data does not include information that does not identify a specific User.
Process
means any method or way that we handle Personal Data or sets of Personal Data, whether or not by automated means, such as collection, recording, organization, structuring, storage, adaptation or alteration, retrieval, and consultation, disclosure by transmission, disseminating or otherwise making available, alignment or combination, restriction, erasure or destruction of Personal Data.
Services
means any products, services, content, features, technologies, or functions, and all related websites, applications and services offered to you by PayPal or Xoom.
Sites
means the websites, mobile apps, official social media platforms, or other online properties through which PayPal offers the Services and which has posted or linked to this Privacy Statement.
Technical Usage
Data
means information we collect from your phone, computer or other device that you use to access the Sites or Services. Technical Usage Data tells us how you use the Sites and Services, such as what you have searched for and viewed on the Sites and the way you use our Services, including your IP address, statistics regarding how pages are loaded or viewed, the websites you visited before coming to the Sites and other usage and browsing information collected through Cookies.
User
means an individual who uses the Services or accesses the Sites.
15. Additional Information
The information provided in this section may be specific to customers depending on your region or is provided to PayPal from third parties whom you may interact with when using the Services. You can contact us if you have any questions about the details in this section.
Google ReCaptcha
PayPal uses ReCaptcha on the Sites and Services. Your use of ReCaptcha is subject to the Google
Privacy Policy
and
Terms of Use
.
ReCaptcha is only used to fight spam and abuse.
Sub-policy 8
https://twitter.com/en/privacy#twitter-privacy-9.1:
Skip to main content
Privacy Policy
Privacy Settings
Privacy Center
Help Center
Policy Archive
Download PDF
X Privacy Policy
Effective: November 15, 2024
Before you scroll, read this
It’s really hard to make everyone happy with a Privacy Policy. Most people who use X want something short and easy to understand. While we wish we could fit everything you need to know into a post, our regulators ask us to meet our legal obligations by describing them all in a lot of detail.
With that in mind, we’ve written our Privacy Policy as simply as possible to empower you to make informed decisions when you use X by making sure you understand and have control over the information we collect, how it’s used, and when it’s shared.
So if you skip reading every word of the Privacy Policy, at least know this:
X is a public platform
Learn what’s viewable & searchable
We collect some data
about you
Learn what we collect & how
Affiliate services may have their own policies
Learn about affiliates
We use your data to make X better
Learn how we make your info work
You can control your experience
Learn how to update your settings
If you have questions about how we use data, just ask
Learn how to contact us
Privacy Policy
1. Information We Collect
2. How We Use Information
3. Sharing Information
4. How Long We Keep Information
5. Take Control
6. Your Rights and Ours
7. X's Audience
8. Changes To This Privacy Policy
9. General
10. How To Contact X
Privacy Policy
1. Information We Collect
2. How We Use Information
3. Sharing Information
4. How Long We Keep Information
5. Take Control
6. Your Rights and Ours
7. X's Audience
8. Changes To This Privacy Policy
9. General
10. How To Contact X
1. Information We Collect
The information we collect when you use X falls into three categories.
1.1 Information you provide us.
To use some of our products and services you need to have an account, and to create an account, you need to provide us certain information. Likewise, if you use our paid products and services, we cannot provide them to you without getting payment information. Basically, certain information is necessary if you want to use many of our products and services.
Personal Accounts.
If you create an account, you must provide us with some information so that we can provide our services to you. This includes a display name (for example, “Creators”); a username (for example, @XCreators); a password; an email address or phone number; a date of birth; your display language; and third-party single sign-in information (if you choose this sign-in method). You can also choose to share your location in your profile and posts, and to upload your address book to X to help find people you may know. Your profile information, which includes your display name and username, is always public, but you can use either your real name or a pseudonym. And remember, you can create multiple X accounts, for example, to express different parts of your identity, professional or otherwise.
Professional Accounts.
If you create a
professional account
, you also need to provide us with a professional category, and may provide us with other information, including street address, contact email address, and contact phone number, all of which will always be public.
Payment Information.
In order to purchase ads or other offerings provided as part of our paid products and services you will need to provide us payment information, including your credit or debit card number, card expiration date, CVV code, and billing address.
Preferences.
When you set your preferences using your
settings
, we collect that information so that we can respect your preferences.
Biometric Information.
Based on your consent, we may collect and use your biometric information for safety, security, and identification purposes.
Job Applications / Recommendations.
We may collect and use your personal information (such as your biographical information, employment history, educational history, employment preferences, skills and abilities, and job search activity and engagement, in addition to the information we already collect as disclosed in the “Information we collect when you use X” section of our Privacy Policy below) to recommend potential jobs to you, to share with potential employers when you apply for a job, to enable connections for professional opportunities, and to show you more relevant advertising.
1.2 Information we collect when you use X.
When you use our services, we collect information about how you use our products and services. We use that information to provide you with products and services, to help keep X more secure and respectful for everyone, and more relevant to you.
Usage Information.
We collect information about your activity on X, including:
Posts and other content you post (including the date, application, and version of X) and information about your broadcast activity (e.g., Spaces), including broadcasts you’ve created and when you created them, your lists, bookmarks, and Communities you are a part of.
Your interactions with other users’ content, such as reposts, likes, bookmarks, shares, downloads, replies, if other users mention or tag you in content or if you mention or tag them, and broadcasts you’ve participated in (including your viewing history, listening, commenting, speaking, and reacting).
How you interact with others on the platform, such as people you follow and people who follow you, metadata related to
Encrypted Messages
, and when you use
Direct Messages
, including the contents of the messages, the recipients, and date and time of messages.
If you communicate with us, such as through email, we will collect information about the communication and its content.
We collect information on links you interact with across our services (including in our emails sent to you).
Purchase and payments.
To allow you to make a payment or send money using X features or services, including through an intermediary, we may receive information about your transaction such as when it was made, when a subscription is set to expire or auto-renew, and amounts paid or received.
Device Information.
We collect information from and about the devices you use to access X, including:
Information about your connection, such as your IP address, browser type, and related information.
Information about your device and its settings, such as device and advertising ID, operating system, carrier, language, memory, apps installed, and battery level.
Your device address book, if you’ve chosen to share it with us.
Location Information.
When you use X, we collect some information about your approximate location to provide the service you expect, including showing you relevant ads. You can also choose to share your current precise location or places where you’ve previously used X by enabling these settings in your account.
Inferred Identity.
We may collect or receive information that we use to infer your identity as detailed below:
When you sign into X on a browser or device, we will associate that browser or device with your account. Subject to your settings, we may also associate your account with browsers or devices other than those you use to sign into X (or associate your signed-out device or browser with other browsers or devices or X-generated identiﬁers).
When you provide other information to X, including an email address or phone number, we associate that information with your X account. Subject to your settings, we may also use this information in order to infer other information about your identity, for example by associating your account with hashes of email addresses that share common components with the email address you have provided to X.
When you access X and are not signed in, we may infer your identity based on the information we collect.
Log Information.
We may receive information when you view content on or otherwise interact with our products and services, even if you have not created an account or are signed out, such as:
IP address and related information; browser type and language; operating system; the referring webpage; access times; pages visited; location; your mobile carrier; device information (including device and application IDs); search terms and IDs (including those not submitted as queries); ads shown to you on X; X-generated identiﬁers; and identiﬁers associated with cookies. We also receive log information when you click on, view, or interact with links on our services, including when you install another application through X.
Advertisements.
When you view or interact with ads we serve on or oﬀ X, we may collect information about those views or interactions (e.g., watching a video ad or preroll, clicking on an ad, interacting with reposts of or replies to an ad).
Cookies and similar technologies.
Like many websites, we use cookies and similar technologies to collect additional website usage data and to operate our services. Cookies are not required for many parts of our products and services such as searching and looking at public proﬁles. You can learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies
here
.
Interactions with our content on third-party sites.
When you view our content on third-party websites that integrate X content, such as embedded timelines or post buttons, we may receive log information that includes the web page you visited.
1.3 Information we receive from third parties.
When you use other online products and services, they may share information about that usage with us.
Ad Partners, Developers, Publishers.
Our ad and business partners share information with us such as browser cookie IDs, X-generated identifiers,
mobile device IDs, hashed user information like email addresses, demographic or interest data, and content viewed or actions taken on a website or app. Some of our ad partners, particularly our advertisers, also enable us to collect similar information directly from their website or app by integrating our advertising technology. Information shared by ad partners and affiliates or collected by X from the websites and apps of ad partners and affiliates may be combined with the other information you share with X and that X receives,
generates, or infers
about you described elsewhere in this Privacy Policy.
Other Third Parties, Account Connections, and Integrations.
We may receive information about you from third parties who are not our ad partners, such as other X users, developers, and partners who help us evaluate the safety and quality of content on our platform, our
corporate affiliates
, and other services you link to your X account. You may choose to connect your X account to your account on another service, and that other service may send us information about your account on that service.
2. How We Use Information
Breaking down how we use the information we collect is not simple because of the way the systems that bring our services to you work. For example, the same piece of information may be used differently for different purposes to ultimately deliver a single service. We think it’s most useful to describe the five main ways we use information and if you have questions that are not answered, you can always
contact us
. Here we go:
2.1 Operate, improve, and personalize our services.
We use the information we collect to provide and operate X products and services. We also use the information we collect to improve and personalize our products and services so that you have a better experience on X, including by showing you more relevant content and ads, suggesting people and topics to follow, enabling and helping you discover
affiliates
, third-party apps, and services. We may use the information we collect and publicly available information to help train our machine learning or artificial intelligence models for the purposes outlined in this policy.
We may use the information we collect from accounts of other services that you choose to connect to your X account to provide you features like cross-posting or cross-service authentication, and to operate our services.
We use your contact information to help others find your account if your settings permit, including through third-party services and client applications.
We use your information to provide our advertising and sponsored content services subject to your
settings
, which helps make ads on X more relevant to you. We also use this information to measure the effectiveness of ads and to help recognize your devices to serve you ads on and off of X. Some of our ad partners also enable us to collect similar information directly from their website or app by integrating our advertising technology. Information shared by ad partners and affiliates or collected by X from the websites and apps of ad partners and affiliates may be combined with the other information you share with X and that X receives, generates, or infers about you, as described elsewhere in our Privacy Policy.
2.2  Foster safety and security.
We use information we collect to provide for the safety and security of our users, our products, services, and your account. This includes verifying your identity, authenticating your account, and defending against fraud, unauthorized use, and illegal activity. We also use the information to evaluate and affect the safety and quality of content on X - this includes investigating and enforcing our policies and and terms, as well as applicable law.
2.3 Measure, analyze and make our services better.
We use the information we collect to measure and analyze the effectiveness of our products and services and to better understand how you use them in order to make them better.
2.4 Communicate with you about our services.
We use the information we collect to communicate with you about our products and services, including about product updates and changes to our policies and terms. If you’re open to hearing from us, we may also send you marketing messages from time to time.
2.5 Research.
We use information you share with us, or that we collect to conduct research, surveys, product testing, and troubleshooting to help us operate and improve our products and services.
3. Sharing Information
You should know the ways we share your information, why we share it, and how you can control it. There are five general ways we share your information.
3.1 When you post and share.
With the general public
. You are directing us to disclose that information as broadly as possible. X content, including your profile information (e.g., name/pseudonym, username, profile pictures), is available for viewing by the general public. The public does not need to be signed in to view some content on X. They may also find X content off of X: for example, from search query results on Internet search engines or videos downloaded and reshared elsewhere (depending on your
settings
).
With other X users.
Depending on your
settings
, and based on the X products and services you use, we share:
Your interactions with X content of other users, such as replies, and people you follow.
Content you send to a specific X user, such as through
Direct Messages
. Please keep in mind that if you’ve shared information like Direct Messages or protected posts with someone else who accesses X through a third-party service, the information may be shared with the third-party service.
With partners.
Depending on your
settings
, we also provide certain third parties with information to help us offer or operate our products and services. You can learn more about these partnerships in our
Help Center
. You can control whether X shares your personal information with these partners by using the “Data sharing with business partners” option in your
Privacy & Safety settings
. (This setting does not control sharing described elsewhere in this Privacy Policy, such as when we share information with our service providers, or through partnerships other than as described in this
Help Center
article.)
3.2 With third parties & third-party integrations.
With service providers.
We may share your information with our
service providers
that perform functions and provide services on our behalf, including payment services providers who facilitate payments; service providers that host our various blogs and wikis; service providers that help us understand the use of our services; applicant tracking system providers to send and receive applicant and job data to potential employers; and those that provide fraud detection services.
With advertisers.
Advertising revenue enables us to provide our products and services. Advertisers may learn information from your engagement with their ads on or off X. For example, if you click on an external link or ad on our services, that advertiser or website operator might figure out that you came from X, along with other information associated with the ad you clicked, such as characteristics of the audience it was intended to reach and other X-generated identifiers for that ad. They may also collect other personal information from you, such as cookie identifiers, or your IP address.
Third-party content & integrations.
We share or disclose your information with your consent or at your direction, such as when you
authorize a third-party web client or application
to access your account or when you direct us to share your feedback with a business. Similarly, to improve your experience, we work with third-party partners to display their video content on X or to allow cross-platform sharing. When you watch or otherwise interact with content from our video or cross-platform sharing partners, they may receive and process your personal information as described in their privacy policies. For video content, you can adjust your
autoplay settings
if you prefer that content not to play automatically.
Third-party collaborators.
Depending on your
settings
, or if you decide to share your data, we may share or disclose your information with third parties. If you do not opt out, in some instances the recipients of the information may use it for their own independent purposes in addition to those stated in X’s Privacy Policy, including, for example, to train their artificial intelligence models, whether generative or otherwise.
Through our APIs.
We use technology like
APIs
and embeds to make public X information available to websites, apps, and others for their use, for example, displaying posts on a news website or analyzing what people say on X. We generally make this content available in limited quantities for free and charge licensing fees for large-scale access. We have
standard terms
that govern how this information can be used, and a compliance program to enforce these terms. But these individuals and companies are not affiliated with X, and their offerings may not reflect updates you make on X. For more information about how we make public data on X available to the world, visit
https://developer.x.com
.
3.3 When required by law, to prevent harm, or in the public interest.
We may preserve, use, share, or disclose your information if we believe that it is reasonably necessary to:
comply with a law, regulation,
legal process, or governmental request
;
protect the safety of any person, protect the safety or integrity of our platform, including to help prevent spam, abuse, or malicious actors on our services;
explain why we have removed content or accounts from our services (e.g., for a violation of
our Rules
);
address fraud, security, or technical issues; or
protect our rights or property, or the rights or property of those who use our services.
We may also use different signals and your data to infer, preserve, use, share, or disclose your age and identity information in order to comply with regulatory requirements as well as for safety, security, fraud, know-your-customer, know-your-business, and identity verification, as the case may be. We may also share or disclose your age and identity information with our partners, service providers, and others for these purposes.
3.4 With our Affiliates.
We may share information amongst our
affiliates
to provide our products and services.
3.5 As a result of a change in ownership.
We may share, sell, or transfer information about you in connection with a merger, acquisition, reorganization, sale of assets, or bankruptcy. This Privacy Policy will apply to your personal information that is shared with (before and after the close of any transaction) or transferred to the new entity.
4. How Long We Keep Information
We keep different types of information for different periods of time, depending on how long we need to retain it in order to provide you with our products and services, to comply with our legal requirements and for safety and security reasons. For example:
We keep your profile information, such as your display name, user name, password and email address for the duration of your account. We cannot provide you with our products and services without retaining this information.
We keep your usage information, such as the content you post, your interactions with other users’ content and how you interact with others on the platform for the duration of your account or until such content is removed.
We keep your payment information, including your credit or debit card number and billing address for the duration you use our paid products and services. Records of transactions will be kept for longer, in accordance with applicable law.
If you communicate with us, such as through email, we will keep information about the communication and its content for up to 18 months, unless it is necessary for us to retain it for a longer period to comply with our legal obligations or to exercise or defend our legal rights.
We generally collect device information, location information, inferred identity information and log information using cookies. We keep cookies and information collected using cookies for up to 13 months. You can learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies
here
.
We keep information about your views or interactions with ads on or off X, as well as how you interact with our content on third-party sites for up to 90 days.
We keep information shared by ad and business partners for up to 90 days.
Where you violate our Rules and your account is suspended, we may keep the identifiers you used to create the account (such as your email address or phone number) indefinitely to prevent repeat policy offenders from creating new accounts.
We may need to keep certain information longer than our policies specify in order to comply with legal requirements and for safety and security reasons. For example:
To comply with a law, regulation, legal process or governmental request.
Including in order to adhere to a legally appropriate preservation request made by law enforcement. You can read more about law enforcement access
here
.
In connection with legal claims, litigation and regulatory matters.
Including where it is reasonably necessary to retain information relating to your account in order to defend X against legal claims.
To maintain the safety and security of our products and services.
Including where it is necessary to store your information longer in order to investigate and fight abuse on our products and services.
Remember public content can exist elsewhere even after it is removed from X. For example, search engines and other third parties may retain copies of your posts longer, based upon their own privacy policies, even after they are deleted or expire on X. You can read more about search visibility
here
.
5. Take Control
5.1 Access, Correction, Portability.
You can access, correct, or modify the information you provided to us by editing your profile and adjusting your account
settings
.
You can learn more about the information we have collected or inferred about you in
Your X Data
and request access to additional information
here
.
You can download a copy of your information, such as your posts, by following the instructions
here
.
To protect your privacy and maintain security, we take steps to verify your identity before granting you access to your personal information or complying with a deletion, portability, or other related request. We may, in certain situations, reject your request for access, correction, or portability, for example, we may reject access where you are unable to verify your identity.
5.2 Deleting your Information.
If you follow the instructions
here
, your account will be deactivated and your data will be queued for deletion. When deactivated, your X account, including your display name, username, and public profile, will no longer be viewable on X.com, X for iOS, and X for Android. For up to 30 days after deactivation it is still possible to restore your X account if it was accidentally or wrongfully deactivated.
5.3 Objecting to, Restricting, or Withdrawing your Consent.
You can manage your privacy settings and other account features
here
. If you change your settings it may take some time for your choices to be fully reflected throughout our systems. You may also notice changes in your X experience or limitations in your ability to access certain features depending on the settings you’ve adjusted. You may also manage additional settings when interacting with certain content and features on different parts of the platform, such as whether a
Space
is recorded, or whether
videos you upload
are downloadable by others.
5.4 Authorized Agent Requests.
To submit a request related to access, modification, or deletion of your information, or someone else’s information if you are their authorized agent, you may also contact us as specified in the How To Contact X section of our Privacy Policy below. We may require you to provide additional information for verification.
6. Your Rights and Ours
We provide X to people all over the world and provide many of the same privacy tools and controls to all of our users regardless of where they live. However, your experience may be slightly different than users in other countries to ensure X respects local requirements.
6.1 We have specific legal bases to use your information.
X has carefully considered the legal reasons it is permitted to collect, use, share and otherwise process your information. If you want to dig in to learn more and better understand the nuances, we’d encourage you to check out
this additional information about data processing
. And no, we don’t sell your personal information.
6.2 We move your data to make X work for you.
Just as you use X to seamlessly participate in global conversations with people in countries all over the world, X must move information across borders and to different countries around the world to support the safe and reliable service you depend on. For example, if you live in Europe and are having a conversation with someone in the United States, information has to move between those countries to provide that experience – it’s what you expect from us.
We also use data centers and cloud providers, and engage
our affiliates
and third-party partners and
service providers
located in many parts of the world to help us provide our services. Before we move data between countries we look at the risks that may be presented to the data and rely on
standard contractual clauses
(SCCs), where applicable, to ensure your data rights are protected. To request a copy of the SCCs, please contact us
here
. If data will be shared with a third party, we require them to maintain the same protections over your data that we provide directly.
X is a
participant
in the EU-US Data Privacy Framework (DPF), the Swiss-US DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF. X complies with the DPF Principles for all its processing of personal data received from the European Union, Switzerland and the UK, in reliance on the EU-US DPF, Swiss-US DPF and UK Extension to the EU-US DPF, respectively. If you have an inquiry or complaint related to our participation in the DPF, please contact us
here
. As part of our participation in the DPF, if you have a dispute with us about our adherence to the DPF Principles, we will seek to resolve it through our internal complaint resolution process, alternatively through the US-based independent dispute resolution body
JAMS
, and under certain conditions, through the DPF Arbitration Process following the procedures and subject to the conditions described in
Annex 1
to the DPF Principles. DPF participants are subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the US Federal Trade Commission and other authorized statutory bodies. Under certain circumstances, participants may be liable for the transfer of personal data from the EU, Switzerland and the UK to third parties outside the EU, Switzerland and the UK. Learn more about the EU-US DPF, the Swiss-US DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF
here
.
7. X's Audience
8. Changes To This Privacy Policy
The most current version of this Privacy Policy governs our processing of your personal data and we may revise this Privacy Policy from time to time as needed.
If we do revise this Privacy Policy and make changes that are determined by us to be material, we will provide you notice and an opportunity to review the revised Privacy Policy before you continue to use X.
9. General
The X Privacy Policy is written in English but is made available in multiple languages through translations. X strives to make the translations as accurate as possible to the original English version. However, in case of any discrepancies or inconsistencies, the English language version of the X Privacy Policy shall take precedence. You acknowledge that English shall be the language of reference for interpreting and constructing the terms of the X Privacy Policy.
10. How To Contact X
We want to hear from you if you have thoughts or questions about this Privacy Policy. You can contact us via our
Privacy Policy Inquiries
page or by writing to us at the appropriate address below.
Information about our handling of California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA) requests is available
here
. Information about our handling of “Consumer Health Data” and associated requests as defined under Washington State’s My Health My Data Act and other similar state laws is available
here
.
If you live in the United States or any other country outside of the European Union, EFTA States, or the United Kingdom, the data controller responsible for your personal data is X Corp., with an address of:
X Corp.
Attn: Privacy Policy Inquiry
865 FM 1209, Building 2
Bastrop, TX 78602
If you live in the European Union, EFTA States, or the United Kingdom, the data controller responsible for your personal data is Twitter International Unlimited Company, with an address of:
Twitter International Unlimited Company
Attn: Data Protection Officer
One Cumberland Place, Fenian Street
Dublin 2, D02 AX07 IRELAND
If you live in Switzerland, you can also contact our appointed representative at the following address:
Twitter Switzerland GmbH
Attn: Data Protection Officer
c/o Wasag Treuhand AG
Bolligenstrasse 18
Bern, 3006, SWITZERLAND
If you wish to raise a concern about our
data processing practices
, you have the right to do so with your local supervisory authority or Twitter International Unlimited Company’s lead supervisory authority, the Irish Data Protection Commission, using the
contact details
listed on their website.
View previous policies
Take control of your privacy
Adjust your settings
Did someone say … cookies?
X and its partners use cookies to provide you with a better, safer and
  faster service and to support our business. Some cookies are necessary to use
  our services, improve our services, and make sure they work properly.
Show more about your choices
.
Accept all cookies
Refuse non-essential cookies
Sub-policy 9
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/page/global/partner-privacy-policy/en:
Introduction
1. What Information We Collect
2. How We Use Your Information
3. How We Share Your Information
4. Data Security and Retention
5. Integration With Other Services Operated By Us Or Third Parties
6. Partner Privacy Policy Updates
7. Contact Us
8. Jurisdiction-specific terms
TikTok Partner Privacy Policy
Last updated: Aug 16, 2024
Introduction
1. What Information We Collect
2. How We Use Your Information
3. How We Share Your Information
4. Data Security and Retention
5. Integration With Other Services Operated By Us Or Third Parties
6. Partner Privacy Policy Updates
7. Contact Us
8. Jurisdiction-specific terms
Among other clarifying changes, we have added details about the information we collect and process about sellers using TikTok’s integrated ecommerce platform, TikTok Shop, and details about the information we process and share with third parties and integrated platform tools.
Introduction
This Partner Privacy Policy (the "
Partner Privacy Policy
") applies to your personal information that TikTok processes in connection with certain TikTok apps, websites, software and related services (the "
Partner Platform
") that link to or reference this Partner Privacy Policy. This includes your use (including when you act as a representative) of the Partner Platform in a commercial context.
The Partner Platform includes, but is not limited to:
TikTok for Business
("
TT4B
"), a collection of websites and features aimed at business partners for multi-tool advertising and related services;
TikTok Shop
, including
TikTok Shop Seller Center
, an integrated e-commerce platform for sellers selling goods on TikTok;
TikTok Seller Academy
, a website providing operational guidance and training for sellers on TikTok Shop;
TikTok Shop Partner Center
, a platform which provides professional e-commerce services to sellers and creators to help them thrive on TikTok Shop;
TikTok Shop Brand Portal
, a platform for TikTok brands to partner with TikTok Shop sellers;
TikTok for Developers
, where third-party developers, publishers, researchers, and others can integrate with TikTok technology;
TikTok Creator Marketplace
, where advertisers can search for and partner with creators for advertising and marketing campaigns;
TikTok Creative Center
, a platform which provides tools and other services to assist advertisers in generating monetized content and maximizing the effectiveness of such content; and
TikTok Live Backstage
, a livestream management platform for businesses.
The Partner Platform is only for users over the age of 18 and is not directed at persons under the age of 18. Persons under the age of 18 are not allowed to use, or register an account on, the Partner Platform.
The Partner Platform is provided and operated by different TikTok entities depending on your location:
If you live in the European Economic Area (“
EEA
”), UK and Switzerland, TikTok Technology Limited, an Irish company (“
TikTok Ireland
”), and TikTok Information Technologies UK Limited (“
TikTok UK
”), a company registered in England and Wales, act as joint-controllers for the purpose of the General Data Protection Regulation (the “
GDPR
”).
If you live in the United States (“
US
”), TikTok Inc. operates the Partner Platform.
If you are not in the US or the UK, TikTok Pte. Ltd (a Singapore company) is the controller responsible for your personal data. However, if you are using TikTok Shop, TikTok Seller Academy, TikTok Shop Partner Center, TikTok Shop Brand Portal, or other e-commerce services (“E-Commerce Services”), please see the jurisdictional section of this Partner Privacy Policy for your region for further details of the controller arrangement.
This Partner Privacy Policy describes the information that we gather from or about you on the Partner Platform or in connection with its use. This Partner Privacy Policy also describes, among other things, how we use and disclose such information, your rights and choices with respect to this information, and how you can contact us if you have any questions or concerns.
This Partner Privacy Policy does not cover the processing of information about your users and customers that (i) you provide to us (or we collect) via your use of the
TikTok Advertiser Tools
; or that (ii) we receive via measurement partners integrated with your ad campaigns such as device identifiers, network identifiers, email addresses or phone numbers.  Such processing is covered by
the TikTok Business Products (Data) Terms
and
TikTok’s Privacy Policy
. This Partner Privacy Policy also does not cover the processing of information of passive users who access the Partner Platform without creating an account. Such processing is covered by
TikTok’s Privacy Policy
.
1. What Information We Collect
Information You Provide
Profile Information.
When you create an account (including when you are acting as representative) or otherwise interact with us on the Partner Platform, you may be required to provide certain information including your name, telephone number, primary address, date of birth, tax information (such as your VAT and TIN (or place of birth in the absence of a TIN)
email address, company/organization name and details (including, where applicable, your trade/public register name and registration details (e.g. company number)), job role, area of expertise and payment account information (e.g. bank account number). You may also be required to provide information and documents to verify your identity, which may include employment information or identification card.
Information When You Contact Us
. When you contact us, we process information that you provide us in order for us to reply to your business inquiries about our products, provide user support and to provide advice to you (for example, on a specific ad campaign project or on a specific shop promotion project). When you enter prize draws, or sign up for webinars and in-person events we (or our service providers) process your information in order to enable you to participate.
Messages
. We collect messages, which include information you provide when you compose, send, or receive messages through the Partner Platform’s messaging functionalities, subject to applicable law. They include messages you send through our chat and virtual assistant functionality when communicating with us and with other users (such as users who purchase your products in TikTok Shop). That information includes the content of the message and the associated metadata about the message, such as when it was sent, received, or read, and message participants. Please be aware that messages you choose to send to other users of the Platform will be accessible by those users and that we are not responsible for the manner in which those users use or share the messages.
Business Content.
Text, photos or videos you create and upload on the Partner Platform for business purposes (e.g. for advertising and e-commerce) is referred to as "
Business Content
." We analyze Business Content for the purposes of product development and content moderation.
Payment Information.
Where you make a payment or receive a payment on the Partner Platform, we collect payment information from you through payment service providers, including the name on your card, your card number, billing address, expiration date and security code, and bank account or other payment information.
Call and Video Conference Recordings.
We may record phone calls and video conferences (in accordance with law) and retain transcripts of dialogue for training, quality assurance, product development and administration purposes.
TikTok Account Information
. If you choose to link your TikTok account with your Partner Platform account, we can access information like your email address, phone number, username, verification status, account performance information, videos, livestreams and comments associated with your content, in accordance with your permissions.
Information From Other Sources
We may receive the information described in this Partner Privacy Policy from other sources, such as:
Our vendors and suppliers that help provide Partner Platform services you may interact with;
Business and identity verification providers, which we use to help prevent and detect fraud;
Your authorized agents or third party representatives;
Publicly available sources;
Third party lead generation providers; and
Third Party Platforms and Partners, which provide us with information (such as your email address, user ID, and public profile), for example when you choose to sign up for or log in to the Partner Platform using sign-in features provided by those third parties, or link accounts from different platforms.
Automatically Collected Information
Technical Information
. When you use the Partner Platform, we automatically collect network and device information such as your IP address, device identifier, device name, type of operating system, information obtained from Cookies and other tracking technologies, time zone, language and other local settings, and server logs (which can include information like access dates and times).
Cookies
. We use cookies and similar tracking technologies (collectively, “Cookies”) to operate and provide the Partner Platform, including, for example, to enable you to log into secure areas of the Partner Platform, to enable us to provide certain features and functionality, or to enhance your experience using the Partner Platform. For more information about our use of cookies on the Partner Platform for individuals located in the EEA, UK and Switzerland please see our
Web Cookies Policy
.
You may be able to control some of the
What Information We Collect
through your device browser settings to refuse or disable Cookies. Because each browser is different, please consult the instructions provided by your browser. Please note that you may need to take additional steps to refuse or disable certain types of Cookies. In addition, your choice to disable Cookies is specific to the particular browser or device that you are using when you disable Cookies, so you may need to separately disable Cookies for each type of browser or device. If you choose to refuse, disable, or delete Cookies, some of the functionality of the Partner Platform may no longer be available to you. Without this information, we are not able to provide you with all of the requested services.
Usage Information
. We collect information about how you engage with the Partner Platform, including information about the content you view, the duration and frequency of your use, your engagement with other users, your search history and your settings.
Transaction Information
When you make transactions on the Partner Platform, for example, if you use the TikTok Shop service as a seller, we collect purchase and transaction history associated with your account, information about refunds and complaints, customer reviews of your store in order to calculate your store ratings, logistics information regarding shipment and delivery of your products including by third party logistics providers. We may also collect contract information and deal terms when you provide us with your contracts with third parties (including creators).
2. How We Use Your Information
We process your information for the following purposes:
To enable us to provide and administer the Partner Platform, so that you can create and deliver your advertising campaigns, open and manage your store(s), interact with our users, fulfill requests for the purchases of products, goods, and services, and utilize our
Developer Tools
.
To provide you with user support, including to perform troubleshooting and notify you about changes to the Partner Platform and service related notifications.
Personalize and customize certain features and content on the Partner Platform.
To facilitate sales, promotion, and purchases of goods and services and to provide user support.
To respond to your business inquiries related to our products, or to improve, promote, and develop your business on TikTok Shop, and provide you with personalized advice about the services we offer.
To enforce our Terms, such as the
TikTok Shop Terms of Service
,
TT4B Commercial Terms of Service
and the
Business Product Data Terms
,
Community Guidelines
, and other policies that apply to you.
To investigate and resolve complaints or disputes between you and your customers (such as where users order products from you via TikTok Shop).
To maintain and enhance the safety, security, and stability of the Partner Platform such as by identifying and addressing technical or security issues or problems (including detecting and preventing abuse, harmful activity, fraud, spam, and other illegal activities).
To verify your identity as part of our account registration, security and fraud prevention measures, and to conduct due diligence.
To review, improve, promote, and develop the Partner Platform, including by monitoring user interactions, performing A/B tests, conducting surveys, and by training and improving our technology, such as our machine learning and AI models and algorithms.
To send marketing communications that may be useful to you. You have the ability to opt out of receiving these communications by clicking a link in the footer of each marketing communication we send, or adjusting your marketing preferences in the privacy settings of the app.
To comply with applicable laws, regulations and legal obligations.
For any other purposes disclosed to you at the time we collect your information or pursuant to your consent.
3. How We Share Your Information
Business Partners and Service Providers
We engage partners that help us provide, support, promote, and develop our Partner Platform products and events, and understand how they are used. They provide services such as chat services, mailing, email, cloud hosting, content delivery, customer and technical support, content moderation, marketing, legal, accounting, analytics, financial services, fraud prevention, in-person event coordinators and services, and online payment. We share your information (as described in
What Information We Collect
) with these partners as necessary to enable them to provide their services on the Partner Platform. Some examples include:
Integrated Platform Providers.
We share limited information with third party platforms whose platform or services are integrated with the Partner Platform. This includes third party identity verification providers, so that we can verify your identity. This includes third party identity verification providers and fraud prevention providers, such as
Jumio
and/or
Ekata (MasterCard)
. In providing these services, Ekata (MasterCard) may also act as a controller of your personal information for purposes specified in their
privacy policy
. We also share limited information, including information you enter into the AI tools in the Creative Center, with third parties whose platforms or services power the AI tools, such as Microsoft.
Advertising Service Providers.
We share your information with advertising, marketing and analytics services providers, including advertising tracking services and business intelligence services, to assist us in promoting the Partner Platform.
Payment Processors and Transaction Fulfillment Providers.
When users make a purchase from you through the shopping features on the Partner Platform, we share purchase, payment, and transaction fulfillment information related to the transaction with payment processors and transaction fulfillment providers
acting on your behalf. For example, we share information with payment processors, such as Paypal, Stripe, PIPO and WorldPay, so that we can process payments and fulfill orders made on the Partner Platform. These companies may also act as a controller of your information to process your payments and for anti-money laundering and fraud prevention purposes.
Other Users
We share your personal information with other TikTok users (buyers, creators, partners and sellers), for the purposes of connecting you with those TikTok users for the receipt and/or provision of products and services. Where you are a seller on TikTok Shop, your shop details and product information, such as your shop ratings, as well as certain Profile Information (e.g. email address), are made available to other users and the public.
Where you are an advertiser on TikTok, information about your company name (or your real name where you are a sole trader) and country are available to users and the public.
Our Corporate Group
As a global company, the Partner Platform is supported by certain entities within our corporate group (“
Corporate Group
”). These entities process the information (described in
What Information We Collect
), as necessary to provide certain functions, such as storage, content delivery, security, research and development, analytics, online payments, customer and technical support, and content moderation. See
Our Global Operations and Data Transfers
for additional information.
Others
We share your information in other limited scenarios as follows:
Corporate Transactions.
Your information may be disclosed to third parties in connection with a corporate transaction, such as a merger, sale of assets or shares, reorganization, financing, change of control, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business.
Independent Researchers
: We share your information with independent researchers to facilitate research that meets certain criteria.
Legal Obligations and Rights.
We may access, preserve, and share the information described in
What Information We Collect
with law enforcement agencies, public authorities, copyright holders, or other third parties if we have good faith belief that it is necessary to:
comply with applicable law, legal process or government requests, as consistent with internationally recognised standards;
protect the rights, property, and safety of us, our users, copyright holders, and others, including to protect life or prevent imminent bodily harm. For example, we may provide information (such as your IP address) to law enforcement in the event of an emergency where someone’s life or safety is at risk;
investigate potential violations of and enforce our Terms, Guidelines, or any other applicable terms, policies, or standards; or
detect, investigate, prevent, or address misleading activity, copyright infringement, or other illegal activity.
4. Data Security and Retention
Security of your information is important to us. We maintain appropriate technical, administrative, and physical security measures that are designed to protect your information from unauthorised access, theft, disclosure, modification, or loss. We regularly review our security measures to consider available new technology and methods.
We retain information for as long as necessary to provide the Partner Platform and for the other purposes set out in this Partner Privacy Policy. We may, in accordance with the laws of your jurisdiction also retain information such as where necessary to comply with contractual and legal obligations, where we have a legitimate business interest to do so (such as improving and developing the Partner Platform, and enhancing its safety, security and stability), and for the exercise or defense of legal claims.
The retention periods will be different depending on different criteria, such as the type of information and the purposes for which we use the information. For example, when we process your information to provide you with the Partner Platform, we keep this information for as long as you have an account.
5. Integration With Other Services Operated By Us Or Third Parties
The Partner Platform may integrate with or contain links to other applications, websites, online platforms, software tools, or related services (collectively, “Other Services”), operated either by us or by third parties, that do not fall within the Partner Platform. This Partner Privacy Policy does not apply to such Other Services. Any information submitted by you directly to these Other Services, regardless of whether you arrived at such Other Service via a link provided on the Partner Platform, and any information TikTok shares with Other Services pursuant to the terms of this Partner Privacy Policy, is subject to their respective applicable privacy policies. Please check these policies before you submit any information to these Other Services
6. Partner Privacy Policy Updates
We may amend or update this Partner Privacy Policy from time to time. When we update this Partner Privacy Policy, we will notify you by updating the “Last Updated” date at the top of the new Partner Privacy Policy, posting the new Partner Privacy Policy, or providing any other notice required by applicable law.
7. Contact Us
Questions, comments and requests regarding this Partner Privacy Policy should be addressed to:
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/report/privacy
If you are based in any of the below locations dedicated local contact channels may be available to you. Please see Section 8 for more details.
8. Jurisdiction-specific terms
Some jurisdiction-specific laws contain additional terms, which are set out in this section. If you are a user to which the laws of the jurisdictions set out below apply, the terms set out below apply to you in addition to the terms set out above and, in the event of a conflict, the terms set out below prevail.
Australia
Brazil
California
Canada
EEA/UK/Switzerland
India
Indonesia
Japan
Malaysia
Mexico
Philippines
South Korea
Thailand
Türkiye
United Arab Emirates
Australia
If you are using the Partner Platform in Australia, these terms shall apply.
Certain entities in our corporate group located outside of Australia, are given limited remote access to your information so that they can provide certain functions, as described in the section on
How we share your information
. Please see
here
for further information on the countries in which our corporate group entities which receive personal data from Australia are located.
Access:
You have the right to access your personal information including information on how we use it and who we share it with. If you believe we hold any other personal information about you, please contact us at
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/report/privacy
.
Correction:
You have the right to correct your personal information where it is inaccurate. If you believe we hold any inaccurate personal information about you, please contact us at
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/report/privacy
.
Your rights:
If you have any questions, concerns or complaints in relation to our handling of your Information, you may contact the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner (Telephone +61 1300 363 992 or email
enquiries@oaic.gov.au
). We will respond to let you know who will be handling your matter and when you can expect a further response.
Brazil
By using the TikTok for Business
Platform, you acknowledge that you have read, understood, and agreed with the practices described in this Partner Privacy Policy, so the following additional terms apply.
Our legal bases for processing your Information:
According to the Brazilian privacy and data protection legislation (LGPD), TikTok is only authorized to process information collected from users when there is a legal basis. Examples of legal bases used in the context of Partner Platform are given below:
Execution of a contract: to enable us to administer, operate, and provide the Partner Platform to you so that you can create, submit and/or place business content (e-commerce, advertising, or sponsored) on websites, applications or services operated by us or our affiliates; to respond to business inquiries related to our products, to facilitate payment processing; to provide you with user support, including to perform troubleshooting and notify you about changes to the Partner Platform and service related notifications.
Legitimate interest:
to keep the Partner Platform safe and secure, including conducting due diligence, verifying accounts, and detecting and preventing abuse, harmful activity, fraud, spam, and other illegal activities; to send marketing communications, including promotional and advertising materials that may be useful, relevant, valuable or otherwise of interest relating to products and services offered; to improve and optimize our review process, for the purpose of identifying violating our policies.
Your Rights
: Users have the right to request TikTok information regarding the processing of their personal information, such as confirmation of the existence of processing, right to access to data/copies of data, right to correction of incomplete, inaccurate or outdated data, right to anonymization, blocking or elimination of unnecessary, excessive or processed data in violation of the law, right to data portability, deletion of personal data processed with the consent of the data subject, information from public and private entities with which the controller shared data; information about the possibility of not providing consent and about the consequences of not giving, right to withdraw consent.
Retention of Data
: TikTok will retain your personal information for as long as it is necessary to serve the purpose(s) for which such information was collected, for no longer than is required or permitted by law, or our records retention policy, reasonably necessary for internal reporting and reconciliation purposes, or to provide you with feedback or information you might request.
If there is a legitimate interest justifying the storage, the possibility of opt-out will be offered when applicable, such as in cases involving marketing communications.
Contact
: In case of questions, comments, or concerns about this Partner Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/report/privacy
.
California
If you are a Californiaa resident, you may submit a request to know, access, correct or delete the information we have collected about you at
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/report/privacy
. You can also update your account information directly through setting that may be available to you. Your right to know includes what personal information we have collected about you, including the categories of sources from which the personal information is collected, the business or commercial purpose for collecting or sharing personal information, the categories of third parties to whom we share the personal information, and the specific pieces of personal information we have collected about you. We do not discriminate based on the exercise of any privacy rights that you might have.
You may be entitled, in accordance with applicable law, to submit a request through an authorized agent. To designate an authorized agent to exercise choices on your behalf, please provide evidence that you have given such agent power of attorney or that the agent otherwise has valid written authority to submit requests to exercise rights on your behalf. We will respond to your request consistent with applicable law and subject to proper verification. We will verify your request by asking you to send it from the email address associated with your account or to provide information necessary to verify your account.
While some of the information that we collect and use may constitute sensitive personal information, we only process such information in order to provide the Platform and within other exemptions under applicable law. For example, we may process your financial information in order to provide you the services you request from us or your driver’s license number in order to verify your identity.
No Sales or Shares for Cross-Context Behavioral Advertising
If you are a California resident, we do not and have not in the last twelve (12) months sold or shared personal information about you as defined by the California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”).
Do Not Track. Some browsers transmit “do-not-track” signals to websites. Because of differences in how browsers incorporate and activate this feature, we currently do not take action in response to these signals.
Canada
If you are using the Partner Platform in Canada, the following additional terms apply.
Your Rights:
Subject to limited exceptions under applicable law, you have the right to access your personal information and to update, correct or rectify such information if it is inaccurate, incomplete or no longer up to date. You also have the right to request information about the processing of your personal information, such as whether we hold such information about you, the purposes for which it is used, and the third parties with whom we may share your information, subject to applicable law.
Where we rely on your consent to collect, use or disclose your personal information for a particular purpose, you also have the right to withdraw your consent at any time, subject to legal or contractual restrictions and reasonable notice. If you withdraw your consent to our collection, use or disclosure of your information, we may not be able to provide certain products, services or features that require us to process your personal information.
To exercise these rights, you may contact us using the contact information set out below. We may require certain personal information for the purpose of verifying the identity of the individual making the request.
Your Choices:
We may send you direct marketing messages about Partner Platform features, third party services, promotions, contests, campaigns and events that we think may be of interest to you. You can unsubscribe from our marketing emails at any time by clicking the “unsubscribe” link included at the bottom of each email we send. Please note that even after you unsubscribe, you may still receive other communications, such as transaction and service-related messages, account updates or other communications necessary for the proper functioning of our services or to maintain a business relationship with you.
Transfer Outside Your Jurisdiction:
We and our service providers (including members, subsidiaries, or affiliates of our corporate group) may access, store and otherwise process personal information outside of Canada (and, for residents of Quebec, outside of Quebec), including in the United States, Malaysia, Singapore, and other foreign jurisdictions where we or our service providers are located, in which case it will be subject to the laws of that particular jurisdiction. For information about how we or our service providers (including service providers outside Canada) process personal information, please contact us using the contact information set out below. We and our service providers may disclose your personal information if we are required or permitted by applicable law or legal process, which may include lawful access by foreign courts, law enforcement or other government authorities in the jurisdictions in which we or our service providers operate.
Contact:
If you have any questions or concerns about our information handling practices, inquiries about how our service providers (including our service providers located outside of your jurisdiction) treat your personal information, or if you would like to exercise your privacy rights, you can contact our Privacy Office at
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/report/Privacy-Office-Canada
.
European Economic Area, UK and Switzerland
(If you are located in the EEA, UK or Switzerland the section below applies to you)
Our Legal Bases and How We Process Your Information
We may only use your information when we have a “legal basis” to do so. We use different legal bases depending on why we use your information (in other words, the “purpose” of our processing). These legal bases are contractual necessity, legitimate interests (ours, yours or those of another party), consent, compliance with a legal obligation, performing a task in the public interest, and protection of vital interests.
Here we explain the legal bases we rely on when we process your information. This section also describes why we use your information, how this information is processed, the categories of information involved, and the associated rights (which always includes the right to access your information). For more information on how to exercise any of your rights, please check out the “Your Rights” section below.
Contractual Necessity
We use
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
,
Information from Other Sources
and
Transaction Information
where it is necessary to perform the contract you enter into (our Terms) when you register for, access, or use the Partner Platform. This means we use your information to:
Provide you with the Partner Platform.
We use your information to provide and operate the Partner Platform so that you can create and manage your advertising campaigns, open and manage your store(s), interact with Users with respect to your products, and integrate with TikTok technology. We also use your information to provide you with personalized and customized features, content, and advice about the services we offer and the Partner Platform.
Administer the Platform.
We use your information to enable us to administer the Partner Platform such as to communicate with you on service related matters, provide you with updates and support, and respond to and process your queries, investigate and resolve claims, complaints or disputes (including when you tell us about a problem, or ask for a copy of your information).
Support the purchase and delivery of products.
We use your information to handle orders, such as assist with processing payments, facilitate the delivery of products, and communicate with you about your products. This includes sharing your information with buyers, payment service providers, and transaction fulfillment providers.
Enforce our Terms, Guidelines, or policies.
We use your information to enforce our Terms, Guidelines, and policies. This may include removing content (including through automated means) or suspending or banning your account if we determine that you are violating our Terms or Guidelines.
Your Rights
: Whenever we use your information on the basis that it is necessary for the contract we have with you, you have the right to port information you have provided to us.
Legitimate Interests
We use your information where this is necessary to achieve legitimate interests - whether belonging to us, you, or a third party - provided these interests are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. We use the information we collect to:
Provide measurement and analytics services
.
We help Partner Platform users measure the effectiveness and distribution of ads, shopping listings, and other content viewed on TikTok.
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To enable Partner Platform users to view and understand how their ads or content performed and the audience that viewed or interacted with their ads or content. This is so that they can make informed decisions (such as what kinds of campaigns they may want to run, the type of audience they want to reach and the types of content that users enjoy the most). This helps keep the advertising and other content we show users relevant and entertaining, and keeps the Platform free for all users.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Transaction Information
.
Ensure the safety and well-being of our community
.
We use your information to ensure the safety and well-being of our community, including by reviewing Business Content (and if permitted under applicable law, Messages and associated metadata) for breaches of our Terms, Guidelines, and other policies.
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To keep our community safe, review compliance with our Guidelines, identify misuse of the Partner Platform, and to improve and optimize our review process, for the purpose of identifying Business Content violating our policies.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
,
Information from Other Sources
and
Transaction Information
.
Ensure the security and stability of the Partner Platform
.
We use your information to ensure the stability and security of the Platform, including analyzing user activity and performing A/B testing, verifying accounts, conducting user surveys, by identifying and combating technical or security issues (such as technical bugs, spam accounts, and preventing abuse, harmful activity, fraud, spam and other illegal activity).
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To ensure the ongoing stability and security of the Partner Platform and to ensure it is continuously available and functioning.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
,
Information from Other Sources
, and
Transaction Information
.
Review, improve, promote and develop the Partner Platform
.
We use the information we have to understand how people are using the Partner Platform and to develop and improve the Partner Platform, including to train, develop, and improve our technology such as our machine learning models and algorithms. We also use this information to better understand and promote the Partner Platform. For example, we review chats with our virtual assistant functionality to help improve our automated responses to provide you with a more helpful service.
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To improve, promote, and develop the Partner Platform in an informed way.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Transaction Information
.
Marketing communications
.
We may contact you by email, telephone, SMS, in-app or push notification about promotions, contests, products or services that we think will interest you or your company. We will obtain your consent to contact you where required by law.
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To promote the Partner Platform and its products and services or third party products and services you offer that may be useful, relevant, valuable or otherwise of interest.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
,
Information from Other Sources
, and
Transaction Information
.
Your Rights
: Whenever we use your information on the basis that it is necessary for legitimate interests, you can object to, and request restriction of, such usage.
Consent
We ask for your consent to access or use your information for specific purposes, which will be disclosed to you at the time we first collect your information pursuant to your consent. You’ll always be able to revoke your consent through your device permissions, or through your in-app or account settings.
Your rights
: Whenever we use your information based on your consent, you can withdraw your consent at any time. However, your withdrawal of consent will not affect the lawfulness of processing your information based on your consent prior to your withdrawal of consent.
You also have the right to port information you have provided to us that we use based on your consent.
Compliance with a Legal Obligation
We may use your information where it is necessary to comply with a legal obligation (including our tax reporting obligations under EU law).
Where you are a seller on TikTok Shop, this includes situations where we have obligations to:
collect certain Profile Information to verify that such information is reliable and complete before we can allow you to offer products and services on TikTok Shop; and
display certain Profile Information on TikTok Shop, in order to make it publicly visible to all users.
Your Rights
You have rights and choices when it comes to your information. Some of these rights apply generally, while others will only apply in certain circumstances. Depending on the scenario, these rights may be subject to some limitations. TikTok Ireland will be responsible for responding to your request within the relevant periods provided by law. If necessary to resolve your request, TikTok Ireland will liaise with TikTok UK.
Access your information
. You can ask us, free of charge, to confirm what information we process about you, to provide certain information about the processing, and for a copy of your information.
Delete your information
. You can delete or ask us to delete some or all of your information.
Rectify your information.
You can change or ask us to change or correct your information where that information is not accurate.
Port your information
. You have the right to data portability in circumstances where we rely on contractual necessity or consent as our legal basis. This means that you have the right to receive your information in a structured, commonly used, and machine-readable format and to share it with a third party.
Object to the processing of your information
. You also have the
right to object
to the processing of your information in certain circumstances. This right applies when we are performing a task in the public interest, pursuing our legitimate interests or those of a third party, or when your data is processed for the purpose of facilitating scientific or historical research in certain circumstances. In submitting an objection request, please provide all relevant information, including the processing activity you are objecting to, why you want to object and how the processing activity affects you, and any additional information that you think will help us review your request. We will stop the particular processing if we don't have compelling legitimate grounds to continue that processing or don’t need it for legal claims.
Restrict the processing of your information
. You have the right to request the restriction of the processing of your information where (a) you are challenging the accuracy of the information, (b) the information has been unlawfully processed, but you are opposing the deletion of that information, (c) where you need the information to be retained for the pursuit or defense of a legal claim, or (d) you have objected to processing and you are awaiting the outcome of that objection request.
To exercise any of the above rights, please contact us through our
webform
. Before we can respond to a request to exercise one or more of the rights listed above, you may be required to verify your identity or your account details or provide additional information so that we can understand your request.
We encourage you to “Contact us” if you are not satisfied with how we have responded to any of your rights requests. You also have the right to lodge a complaint with the Irish Data Protection Commission (TikTok Ireland’s lead supervisory authority) or with your local supervisory authority.
Our Global Operations and Data Transfers
When we transfer your information outside of the EEA, the UK, or Switzerland, we ensure it benefits from an adequate level of data protection by relying on:
Adequacy decisions
. These are decisions from the European Commission under Article 45 GDPR (or equivalent decisions under other laws) where they recognise that a country offers an adequate level of data protection. We transfer your information as described in
What Information We Collect
to some countries with adequacy decisions, such as the countries listed
here
; or
Standard contractual clauses
. The European Commission has approved contractual clauses under Article 46 of the GDPR, which allows companies in the EEA to transfer data outside the EEA. These (and their approved equivalent for the UK and Switzerland) are called standard contractual clauses. We rely on standard contractual clauses to transfer information as described in
What Information We Collect
to certain entities in our Corporate Group (as described
here
) and third parties in countries without an adequacy decision. For a copy of these adequacy decisions or standard contractual clauses, please contact us via the details provided in the “Contact us” section below.
Contact Us
You can contact us about this Partner Privacy Policy through our
webform
. You can reach TikTok's Data Protection Officer
here
.
You can also contact us at the following postal address.
For users in the European Economic Area and Switzerland
: TikTok Technology Limited, 10 Earlsfort Terrace, Dublin, D02 T380, Ireland.
For users in the United Kingdom
: TikTok Information Technologies UK Limited, Kaleidoscope, 4 Lindsey Street, London, EC1A 9HP, United Kingdom.
India
If you are using our services in India, the Partner Platform is provided and controlled by Bytedance (India) Technology Private Limited. TikTok is our brand for providing and promoting the services. When using these services from India, please accordingly read “TikTok”, “we” or “us” in this policy to refer to Bytedance (India) Technology India Private Limited.
Indonesia
If you are using our services in Indonesia, the following additional terms apply. In the event of any conflict between the following additional terms and the provisions of the main body of this policy, the following terms shall apply.
Data Controller.
The E-Commerce Services provided through the TikTok platform in Indonesia operates as “Shop.” References in this Partner Privacy Policy to “TikTok”, “we” or “us” shall, where appropriate, be taken to refer to PT Tokopedia and TikTok Pte Ltd which are the data controllers responsible for your personal data, including for the purpose of providing E-Commerce Services.
Age, Parental and Guardian Consent.
By accessing and/or using the E-Commerce Services, you represent that you are at least 21 years of age or married or not under guardianship. If you are below 21 years old and you are not married, or under guardianship:
you must obtain approval from your parent(s) or legal guardian(s); and
your parent(s) or legal guardian(s) are responsible for: (i) all your actions in connection with your access to and use of the E-Commerce Services; (ii) your compliance with this policy; and (iii) ensuring that any of your participation in the e-commerce services will not, in any event, result in any violation of applicable laws and regulations relating to child protections.
If you do not have consent from your parent(s) or legal guardian(s) and your parent(s) or guardian(s) is not willing to open the account under their name, you must cease accessing the E-Commerce Services.
Your Choices
. You may withdraw your consent to our disclosure of personal data to third parties. Upon your request, we will cease to display, publish, transmit, disseminate, and/or open the access to your personal data to third parties. Please note that by withdrawing your consent to the disclosure and/or collection of your personal data, we may not be able to fulfill your requests and you may not be able to use some Partner Platform features and functionality.
You may request that we (i) disclose the history of personal data that we have collected; and/or (ii) erase and dispose of your personal data that we have collected on our server. Please note that by requesting us to erase and dispose of your personal data, you may not be able to use some Partner Platform features and functionality.
To exercise any of your rights, contact us at
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/report/privacy
.
Notification.
In the event of any breach of personal data, we will in accordance with applicable law, notify you and provide you with information regarding such breach of personal data.
Data retention.
We retain your information for as long as it is necessary to provide you with the service. Where we do not need your information in order to provide the service to you, we retain it only for so long as we have a legitimate business purpose in keeping such data. However, there are occasions where we are likely to keep this data for five (5) years (or longer if required) in accordance with our legal obligations or where it is necessary for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims.
After you have terminated your use of our Partner Platform and a five (5) year retention period has lapsed, we store your information in an aggregated and anonymized format. Non-personally identifiable information may be retained indefinitely for analytics.
Japan
If you are using our services in Japan, the following additional terms apply. In the event of any conflict between the following additional terms and the provisions of the main body of this policy, the following terms shall apply.
Requirements for sharing and collecting your information:
TikTok will conduct necessary and appropriate supervision of our employees, such as educating or training employees processing your information. Where a data breach has occurred or where TikTok has determined that it is likely that such a breach has occurred by us or our service providers, TikTok will report the relevant facts to you promptly, investigate and report thereon, and implement recurrence prevention measures.
When outsourcing or subcontracting the processing of your information, TikTok will enter into a contract imposing the same level of data protection obligations as set forth in the terms with the outsourcee/subcontractor who has been retained by us for the processing of all or part of your information, and shall perform appropriate supervision and be responsible for the performance of the contract by the outsourcee/subcontractor.
If TikTok transfers your information or audiences you create to third parties or TikTok affiliates that are located outside Japan, TikTok will impose on such third parties and TikTok affiliates the same level of data protection obligations as our obligations under TikTok Business Product (Data) Terms by way of a written contract or legally binding rules, except as otherwise permitted under the applicable laws, regulations, and applicable industry guidelines.
TikTok is responsible for the accuracy, or deletion of any, of your information, as well as the authority to respond to any claims of rights under applicable laws and regulations. TikTok will provide disclosure regarding the processing of your information,, and TikTok will be responsible for responding to the exercise of data subject rights and complaints from users.
Malaysia
If you are using our services in Malaysia, the following additional terms apply. In the event of any conflict between the following additional terms and the provisions of the main body of this policy, the following terms shall prevail.
Data Controller
. If you are using the E-Commerce Services in Malaysia, the data controller responsible for the processing of your personal data including for the purpose of providing E-Commerce Services is TikTok Shop (Malaysia) Sdn Bhd. However, certain activities relating to the operation of the TikTok Shop platform may be performed by TikTok Pte. Ltd., which will be the data controller for these processing activities. For example, TikTok Pte. Ltd. may be responsible for the development and improvement of the TikTok Shop platform within the TikTok application and will be a data controller for such purposes. When we refer to “TikTok”, “we” or “us” in this Partner Privacy Policy, we mean TikTok Pte. Ltd. and TikTok Shop (Malaysia) Sdn Bhd.
Mexico
If you are using our services in Mexico, the following additional terms apply. In the event of any conflict between the following additional terms and the provisions of the main body of this policy, the following terms shall apply.
Mexico Data Controller
: If you are using the E-Commerce Services in Mexico, the data controller responsible for the processing of your personal data is TikTok Pte, with its registered address at 1 Raffles Quay, #26-10, South Tower, Singapore 048583.
Consent
: By registering or using the Platform services, you provide your express consent to the processing of your personal data for the purposes indicated in this Privacy Policy. In addition to the purposes included in this Privacy Policy, you provide your express consent so that TikTok can process your data for marketing activities, promotions, advertisements and/or creation of personalized content, as well as other uses compatible with the authorized purposes.
How we share your personal data:
TikTok may share your personal data with third-parties, such as commercial partners, affiliates, and other third parties which have a legal or business relationship with us, for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy. By providing your personal data and using the Partner Platform you agree to the mentioned transfers. You can always revoke your consent and exercise your rights, as stated below.
Your Rights:
You have the following rights with respect to your personal data: access, rectification, cancellation and objection. You may also withdraw your consent and limit the use and disclosure of your personal data. The exercise of your rights should be in accordance with the data protection law; you may send your request through https://www.tiktok.com/legal/report/privacy , including at least the following:
The data subject's name and address, or other means to notify him/her of the response to his/her request;
Documents establishing the identity or, where appropriate, legal representation of the data subject;
A clear and precise description of the personal data with regard to which the data subject seeks to exercise any of the abovementioned rights;
Any other item or document that facilitates locating the personal data.
Philippines
If you are using our services in the Philippines, the following additional terms shall apply pursuant to the relevant laws, rules and regulations and issuances by the Philippines National Privacy Commission (“NPC”) on data privacy.
Data Controller
. If you are using E-Commerce Services in the Philippines, the data controller responsible for the processing of your personal data including for the purpose of providing E-Commerce Services is ByteDance Philippines Inc. However, certain activities relating to the operation of the TikTok Shop platform may be performed by TikTok Pte. Ltd., which will be the data controller for these processing activities. For example, TikTok Pte. Ltd. may be responsible for the development and improvement of the TikTok Shop platform within the TikTok application and will be a data controller for such purposes. When we refer to “TikTok”, “we” or “us” in this Partner Privacy Policy, we mean TikTok Pte. Ltd. and ByteDance Philippines Inc.
Your Rights
. To the extent that the relevant laws, rules and regulations on data privacy recognize your rights and freedoms as data subjects, you shall have the right to information, object, access, rectification, erasure or blocking, lodge complaints before the NPC, damages and data portability. Before we can respond to a request to exercise one or more of the rights listed above, you may be required to verify your identity or your account details.
South Korea
If you are using our services in South Korea, the following additional terms apply. In the event of any conflict between the following additional terms and the provisions of the main body of this policy, the following terms shall prevail.
Data retention.
We destroy personal data whose purpose of collection as consented to by you have been achieved, or whose periods of and use to which you consented to or which were provided in this Partner Privacy Policy have expired; provided, however, we will continue to store your personal data for the following statutorily-prescribed periods, where applicable, including, but not limited to:
Act on Consumer Protection in Electronic Commerce;
Records on your cancellation of an order, your payment on a purchased item, and our supply of a good/service: 5 years;
Records on the handling of consumer complaints or disputes: 3 years;
Records on advertisements and labels: 6 months;
Protection of Communications Secrets Act;
Records on your visits to our website: 3 months.
Destruction of Personal data
. We destroy your personal data in a manner that renders it unrestorable by the relevant department.
Data rights
. You have the right to access personal data we hold about you, to rectify any personal data held about you that is inaccurate, to request the deletion of personal data held about you, and the right to request the suspension of the processing of your personal data. You can exercise your rights by contacting us at https://www.tiktok.com/legal/report/privacy.
Data Security
. We work hard to protect the Partner Platform and our users from unauthorized access to or unauthorized alteration, disclosure or destruction of information we hold. To this end, we have in place technical, managerial and physical safeguards, including internal policy for data protection, limiting the access to personal data on a need-to-know basis and controlling access to the facilities where personal data is processed.
Entrustment and/or Overseas Transfer of Personal Data
. We entrust your data to our affiliates, cloud storage providers, IT service providers, and data centers, some of whom are located abroad, subject to your consents or notifications to you, if applicable. The entities receiving and processing your data are committed to using and storing personal data in compliance with domestic and international regulations and to taking all available physical and technical measures to protect personal data. You may opt-out of such transfer so long as the transfer is not necessary to provide you with the Service, by contacting usat
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/report/privacy
.
Local representative pursuant to the Personal Information Protection Act
. Please send your inquiries concerning privacy issues in South Korea to our local representative pursuant to the Personal Information Protection Act. Contact details are as follows.
Bae, Kim and Lee LLC
Representative: Yangho Oh
Address: Tower B, Centropolis, 26 Ujeongguk-ro
Jongno-gu, Seoul 03161, Korea
Phone: +82-2-3404-0108
Email: privacytiktok@bkl.co.kr
Thailand
If you are using our services in Thailand, the following additional terms apply. In the event of any conflict between the following additional terms and the provisions of the main body of this policy, the following terms shall prevail.
Data Controller.
If you are using the E-Commerce Services in Thailand, the data controller responsible for the processing of your personal data is TikTok Shop (Thailand) Ltd., whose address is at No. 1 Park Silom Building, 9th-10th Floors, Convent Road, Silom Sub-district, Bangrak District, Bangkok. However, certain activities relating to the operation of the TikTok Shop platform may be performed by TikTok Pte. Ltd., which will be the data controller for these processing activities. For example, TikTok Pte. Ltd. may be responsible for the development and improvement of the TikTok Shop platform within the TikTok application and will be a data controller for such purposes. When we refer to “TikTok”, “we” or “us” in this Partner Privacy Policy, we mean TikTok Pte. Ltd. and TikTok Shop (Thailand) Ltd.
Processing for Legal Obligations
. In certain circumstances, we may require you to provide personal data where this is necessary for us to comply with applicable law, or to enter into or perform a contract between us and you. If you do not provide the required personal data, we may not be able to proceed with your request or provide our services to you.
Your rights
. Subject to applicable Thai personal data protection law, you have the right to withdraw consent for the collection, use and disclosure of your personal data, right to access your data, right to receive your personal data including in a format which can generally be read or used by an automatic tool or device or have this transmitted to another data controller, right to object to the collection, use or disclosure of your personal data, right to request that your personal data is deleted or de-identified, right to request the suspension of the use of your personal data, right to restrict the use of your personal data, right to correct, update, or complete your personal data, and right to lodge a complaint to the Personal Data Protection Committee if there has been non-compliance with applicable Thai data protection laws.
Türkiye
If you are using our services in Türkiye, the following additional terms apply along with the contents of the foregoing Partner Privacy Policy. In the event of any conflict between the following additional terms and the provisions of the main body of this Partner Privacy Policy, the following terms shall prevail.
Data Controller Representative. You may contact our data controller representative in Türkiye by email or mail to handle questions and complaints in connection with the processing of your personal data if you are in Turkiye.
ESİN ATTORNEY PARTNERSHIP
tiktok@esin.av.tr
AKAT MAHALLESİ GÜL SOKAK NO: 2/1 34335 BEŞİKTAŞ/İSTANBUL, TÜRKİYE
Legal bases for the processing your personal data. We rely on the following legal bases while processing your personal data in accordance with Article 5 of the Law No. 6698 on Protection of Personal Data:
Processing is explicitly laid down or dictated by laws;
Processing of your personal data is necessary provided that it is directly related to the conclusion or fulfilment of the contract between us;
Processing is mandatory for us to be able to comply with our legal obligations;
The relevant data is made available to the public by yourself;
Processing is mandatory for the establishment, exercise or protection of a right;
Processing is mandatory for our legitimate interests, provided that it does not violate your fundamental rights and freedoms;
Your explicit consent (Please note that we rely on this legal basis only when we require your consent for the processing and we do not rely on this legal basis if and when we rely on one of the other legal grounds above)
Your rights. According to Article 11 of the Data Protection Law, you have the following rights with respect to your personal data:
The right to learn whether we process your personal data;
The right to request information with regard to such processing, if we process your personal data;
The right to learn the purposes of the processing and whether they are used for such purpose or not;
The right to know the third parties within or outside the country, to whom we transfer your personal data;
The right to request correction of incomplete or inaccurate personal data;
The right to request deletion or destruction of your personal data under the conditions set forth in Article 7 of the Data Protection Law;
The right to request that we notify the third parties, to whom we transferred your personal data, about the correction, deletion and/or destruction of your personal data per your request within the scope of the foregoing two items;
The right to object to the negative results about you that are due to the analysis of your personal data processed solely by automated means; and
The right to claim indemnification for damages incurred due to illegal processing of your personal data.
You may exercise your rights listed above by contact us at:
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/report/privacy
.
The requests found in your application will be resolved as soon as possible according to the nature of your request and within thirty days at the latest free of charge. However, if your request incurs additional cost to our company, then you may be charged over the tariff fee determined by the Turkish Personal Data Protection Board.
Amendments. The following sections of the Policy do not apply to individuals in Türkiye:
Language. This policy is available in English and Turkish. If there is any inconsistency or different interpretation between the English and Turkish versions, the Turkish text shall prevail.
United Arab Emirates
If you are using the Partner Platform in the United Arab Emirates (“UAE”), the following additional terms apply. If any conflict arises between the main Partner Privacy Policy and the additional terms, the following terms shall prevail:
How we share your personal data
In addition to the main text of this policy, by using the Partner Platform in the UAE you agree to the terms of this Partner Privacy Policy and consent to our sharing of your personal data in line with the main text of this Partner Privacy Policy.
Governing law and dispute resolution
By using the Partner Platform in the UAE, this Partner Privacy Policy will be governed by and interpreted in accordance with the laws of the UAE. In the event of a dispute arising between the parties in connection with this Partner Privacy Policy:
Where the dispute relates to a claim for a sum within the limits specified by the DIFC Small Claims Tribunal from time to time, then the dispute shall be referred by either party to the said Tribunal; and
For all other disputes, the parties shall seek settlement of that dispute by mediation in accordance with the Mediation Rules of the DIFC-LCIA Arbitration Centre, which Rules are deemed to be incorporated by reference to this clause. If the dispute is not settled by mediation within 30 days of the commencement of the mediation, or such further period as the parties shall agree in writing, the dispute shall be referred to and finally resolved by arbitration under the Arbitration Rules of the DIFC-LCIA Arbitration Centre, which Rules are deemed to be incorporated by reference to this clause. The language to be used in the mediation and in the arbitration, shall be English. In any arbitration commenced pursuant to this clause the number of arbitrators shall be one and the arbitration shall be conducted in Dubai.
Complaints
In the event that you wish to make a complaint about how we process your Information, please contact us in the first instance at
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/report/privacy
and we will endeavour to deal with your request as soon as possible. This is without prejudice to your right to launch a claim with the data protection supervisory authority in the country in which you live or work where you think we have infringed data protection laws(where applicable).